VOL. II. 2
CHAPTER I.
`It is not that I dread the death;
`For thou hast seen me, by thy side,
`All redly through the battle ride.'
`
Captain Oadley
,' said Washington, to my brother,
as we entered his quarters, about an hour after our
arrest
;
there was something exceedingly solemn in his
tone; `how happens it, sir, that I see you with your
side arms?'
Archibald stood proudly, yet reverentially, before
him, pale as deathhis brown hair saturated with
sweat, and frozen upon his white forehead; his large,
deep blue eyes fainting not, nor fading, in the awful
presence. He replied.
`I refused to give up my sword to any body but the
commander-in-chief.'
Washington raised his head; a slight movement of
his nether lip, seemed to betray an inward agitation, as
slight; but he merely stretched out his hand in silence;
and Archibald obeyed it, by unbelting his sword, with
a resolute hand, and laying it, respectfully, upon the
table.
Washington then turned, and made a motion to a fine
spirited looking officer (Colonel Reid,) which he
obeyed
,
by leaving the room.
A deep silence, of some minutes, followed; during
which, the commander's steady look was never taken
from the sword, except to glance, for a moment, at my
brother, who stood, rather haughtily, I thought, after he
had given it up; and then at me.
`You are brothers, I believe?' continued
Washington
.
`Yes, Sir,' said Archibald.
`You knew that duelling was prohibited in the
army?'
`Yes, Sir.'
There was another silence of some moments, in
which I could see the lip of Washington writhe again,
and his broad forehead darken with thought; yet it was
but just visible, like the emotion of one, that, great as
he is, cannot, when his bones and blood are jarred,
cannot
forbear showing it, in the calm of his eye, or the
hue of his lip.
`Am I to believe that the death was
accidental?
'
`No, SirI slew him, deliberately,' said Archibald.
`What!' answered the general, raising his arm in
wrath, and then letting it fall upon the table, before
him, as if his great nature had rebuked him; and
then he continued in a deep, tranquilized tone, to
speak, as follows:
`I have been assured, that the affair was an accident
that several gentlemen, had assembled for fencing
that, by some accident, Col. Clinton was slain. Yet,
it was intimated to me, that there had been a growing
hostility between you for some time. It was for that
reason, that I have ordered your arrest. It is no light
matter, young man, to have put in jeopardy, the lives
of eight meneight officers. But my duty is a plain
one. The law shall be enforced. Is it not enough,
that we have the enemy upon us, from without; but we
must be murdering each other in cold blood!
He was evidently very much disturbed; either, at
the thought of putting seven young men on trial for
their lives, before a court-martial; or at the death of
Clinton, who had long been a member of his family.
`I
did
hope,' continued Washington, with a
temperate
fervency of manner, that brought tears into
Archibald's
eyes; `that this would prove, what it has been
represented to mea hasty, accidental affair; and
that a young man of such promise, would not have been
the first, to set that discipline at naught, which he has
been so long conspicuous in the support of.'
`May I be permitted,' said Archibald, faltering a
little in his voice, less, it was evident, from any terrour
of punishment, than the fear of having offended his
commander, `to '
Washington signified to him to proceedand he
continued
,
standing before him, with his arms folded, and
his slight frame shaking with emotion, till he had told
the tale as it was; and till the face of Washington
altered
first to compassion, then to sorrow, then to
admiration
.
I do not mean to say, that he told the
cause
of
the quarrel; but the whole of the quarrel, which ended
so fatally, he did tell, modestly, but manfully, till
Washington himself changed colourand then, turning
slowly to us both, said:
`I shall enquire into this. In the mean time, you
will remain under arrestbut not in confinement.'
We bowed, for the motion of his hand was not to be
misunderstood, or resisted; and withdrewjust as
Colonel
Reid was returning. He stopped, as we passed
himwiped a tear from his eyes, and gave his hand to
Archibald; `poor Clinton,' said he.
`Poor Clinton,' said Archibald, from his heart; and
we passed on.
The whole encampment was in an uproar; soldiers
and officers were crowding about us, at every step,
some with menacingothers with compassionate
looks, for Clinton was an universal favourite with the
southern men, and universally execrated by the
northern
ones; nay, so far had things gone at times, that a
mischievous spirit might have made a drawn battle of
it, more than once, by a little meddling.
`Dear brother,' said I, seeing him stop, and put his
hands to his head, as if in extreme pain, after we had
passed the crowd, `you look wretchedlyare you
wounded?'
`I feel so,' said he`put your hand here'I gave it
to him, and he laid it on his templesthey beat
furiously
but,
as he moved his neck under the pressure, I
observed
that his bosom was full of blood. I was
terrified
at the quantityit was coagulated, and I could
have taken it out by handfulls. I hurried him to the
tent, and found that, at every movement of his head, it
gushed out again, like a little spout; but the surgeon
who examined it, put me out of all apprehension
immediately
,
as to the wound. `
That
is nothing,' he said,
with emphasis; `but  God bless me, what a fever
he is in!'
He
was
in a feverand, for two weeks, I never
left his bed side; but at last, I had the happiness to see
him on the saddle againpaler, a little, than usual
weaker, but not sadder, for that were impossible.
`There is your sword,' said an officer, entering one
day after dinner, and handing a sabre to Archibald;
`the commander bids you use it, hereafter, not against
your friends, nor his friends, but the enemies of your
country.'
Archibald bowed, and, the moment that the officer
had left the room, threw the weapon from him, saying:
`Brother! I have half a mind never to buckle it on
again.'
`Why?' said I, in surprise.
`I am weary of the trade of bloodit wears me to
death.'
`Archibald!' said I, `hear me; we have gone too
far now, to retreatwe have sinned, and have been
dishonoured
.
Let us first atone for our transgressions
recover our nameand then! there is my handgo
where you will, when you will, I will follow you.'
`How atone for them?' said he, `how recover our
name? By spilling more blood! fighting more battles!
killing more human creatures! Brother, I am not
very surenot so sure, as I have been, that this war is
a righteous one.'
`For shame Archibald,' I cried, `for shame! would
you have your children slaves!'
`God can make them free,' he replied`and they
were better and happier, as
slaves
than if their
freedom
that
princeless heritage, were bought with
blood.'
`But God will not, cannot be hoped to work miracles
for uswe must labour?'
`God hath saidthou shalt not kill; we dare
to say thou
shalt
kill? God hath bowed the heavens,
and come down to us, and taught us that we are one
great brotherhoodyet man, presumptuous man
hath dared to set his majesty at nought, trample on
his law, and make the nations of the earth murderers.
No! I must think of this. What I do, shall be done,
not rashly, not unadvisedlybut temperately. There's
much blood upon my handstoo much, it may be, for
me ever to sleep quietly againbut all of it, all!
that I have hitherto shednay, not even my ownis
so loathsome and sickening, so terrible and blinding,
as that of poor Clinton; yetyet!as I am a living
manbrother, were it to do over again, I would do
precisely what I have done, though I went to hell for
it.'
I shuddered from head to foot`brother,' said I
`what devil possesses you! You have been, at
intervals
,
since that affair, frightfully blasphemousyet you
used to be somewhat solemn of thought, at times, and
humbleand would pray, now and then; but since
Clinton's death.'
`I cannot prayI
cannot
,' he said, turning
abruptly
away from me, `
I dare not
.'
`But, whatever be your resolution,' said I, `you will
not think of abandoning the army, while it is in
danger
.'
`What danger?'
`Sir William Howe has taken the fieldleft New
York; put all his troops in motion, and we are hourly
expecting an attack. Lord Sterling has just been sent
out. La Fayetteand, if the enemy does not attack
us
, we shall have the finest opportunity in the world,
for distinguishing ourselves; for, his line of march,
encumbered as it is with baggage for an army of
eighty
or a hundred thousand men, we are told, reaches
nearly twelve miles along the road.'
His eye flashed fire. `The sooner the better,' he
cried, `I only want to hear the stirrups ringing again,
the trumpets blowing, and I shall be happy, happy!
alas poor Clinton!to die may be very terrible
to die so suddenly,
is
sobut to surviveOh!
that
is
to suffer. Every thing that I touch feels of blood.
Every thing that I see, or smelllooks and smells of
blood, detestable hot bloodfoaming and smoking
from the groundHa! was that lightning!'
`No,' said I, `hark!it is one of the cannon at
the northah! that's the report.'
`By heaven,' he exclaimed, putting his hand before
his eyes, `I have become the veriest coward that
breathes. Strange delusions are upon me. I thought
just then, that I was upon the Delaware againthat I
saw a horse, drowning, in the black waterthe body
of Clinton, entangled in the trapping. I was just on
the point of leaping in, when the thunder broke about
my heart; and the blue lightning flashed like a
serpent
of fire, hissing, through the waterare you sure
that it was a cannon?'
`Certainly,' I replied`I'll lead to you the very gun
in five minutes.'
`And
this!
(striking the snow with his foot,)
this
is
the solid earth? You would persuade me of that, I
suppose; why, John, I can feel it heave under my
tread like the oceanno! like graves about to give
up their deadand, when I strike my foot upon it
thus,
hark!
do you not hear a moaning? a jarring
too, as if you leaned against a great organ, while it was
in full play?'
`You distress me, exceedingly, dear Archibald,' said
I, `rouse yourself. These humours will be the death
of you, yet.'
`The sooner the better, brother.'
`That is impious,' I replied. `You are young
full of high thought, and.'
`Weltering in human bloodgo on.'
`And fitted,' said I, `for much blessing to
mankind
.'
`Rouse yourselftear away the grave clothes that
are about you, and come forth!'
`
Come forth! come forth!
speak to Clinton,
brother
.
Bid him
come forth;
bid him
come forth
from the
holes of the rock, the charnel house; and I, by heaven!
I will take his place joyfullyyou weep! Brother
it is unmanly to weep. Unmanly of youyet I, I,
would give the world to weep, but I cannot; there
is nothing but molten lead, at my heart, no tears, none;
they are all dried up; the fountain is full of dust and
reptiles.'
`A fierce and wayward spirit, brother,' said I,
deeply
affected by his manner.
`A wayward spirit, brothernot a fierce one;a
melancholy spirit, weary of slaughter, bowed down
not by calamity, not by peril, not by sickness, but by
doubt and sorrow. That skylook up, brotherso
blue and beautiful, sweeping darkly above us, with a
swiftness of motionso uninterrupted and eternal
that we mistake it for an immoveable vaultso swift!
that we mistake motion for solidity! Brother I never
look up to that sky, when the stars are in it, but, there
comes, rushing over me, a flood of brightness and
disorder
I
hear the neighing of horses, the clashing of
armed men; the breaking of water about me, and
under
meand all the earth in commotionwind
and firewhile that serene and beautiful dome above,
thickly beleagued with God's bright Cherubim, rolls
forever above us, undisturbed, unmoved, in its sweet
and awful repose.
`At this moment brother, dark as it isI can see a
troop of horsemen, racing like a disorderly rabble,
over the white snow; and wheeling and galloping in the
moonlightI can see their faces, count them, one by
one; distinguish all their horses; see the dark eyes of
Arthur, streaming with firehear my own voice in
the windall this, with my ears stopped, and my
eyes shut, as plainly as I saw it, and heard it all, the
night before that inroad of murderers, upon our house;
the night before!no, the very nightbrother!
O brothercould we but have met them!and
nowah! a storm.'
`No, dear Archibaldno, it is is only the noise of
distant cannonsurely you can see as well as I!'
`No, I fear notI am blind and dizzy, shattered, I
fearlet me lean upon your armdark shadows are
about me, unpleasant faces they jar my blood,
andHa! there! that splash of the water! O, it was
precisely the same that sounded on my ears, when the
mare leaped out of the boat.'
`It was not water, brotherit was the broad striped
flag there, flapping in the wind.'
`We were just under itit was the red and blue flag,
striped and stainedand that was the first day of its
floating.'
`Where,' said he`it is very darkthere was a
beautiful starlight, when I came out.'
I stopped. There was something in his manner,
more than in his words, that frightened me; for lie
leaned upon me, with his whole weight, like a sick man.
`I see no stars,' said he`let us go back, I know
not where I am. The ground is unsteady, and I
expect
it to fall in, at every step. And while I hear a
continual hum of voices, rattling of armoura flapping,
like many eagles above meyet I can hardly persuade
myself that we are not upon the Delaware again: it is
a strange phantasy; but I can hear the quick sound of
the rifles along the bankand almost distinguish the
horses that dash, hither and thither, as they did, on the
night of our first embarkationand there too is the
same cold, troubled moonlight, away at the north
east, gushing over the barrier of black clouds, like a
white torrent, bursting in the windand now!by
heaven! brother, you are weaker than Ihow you
tremble?does it snow?I can feel it driving in my
faceor rain?orwhat! are you weepingStop!
speak to meam I awake! or not?Are we going on;
speak!
are
we upon the water?or the land?
going, or coming from Trenton?'
VOL. II. 3
I was utterly overcomeunable to articulate a word.
And it was only when I had led him back to our
quarters
,
and sent for our good physician, that I was able to
step without reeling. The doctor looked alarmedbut
attributed the sudden blindness of Archibald, to a quick
rush of blood into the brain, after sitting in a
recumbent
posture for a long time; yet, with all our care,
it was some days before we were able to repeat the
experiment
of leading him into the open air.
But when we didhe took a new and firmer aspect.
And when Arthur returned, (for he had been absent
several days, on a visit to Mary) he was able to
mount his horse, and accompany us in our little
scouting
parties.
At last, however, the signal was given. Our tents
were struck. Our log huts demolishedand our whole
army put in motion. At the first sign of preparation,
the noble fellow started up, as from a trance,leaped
into the saddle, and dashed away to the head of his
men, with all that high, heroick expression of
earnestness
,
which used to characterise him.
`Now John,' said he, plucking out his sword
`
now!
for something better than complaint!'
Yet, though we were constantly under arms,
marching
and countermarching, it was not until the nineteenth
of June, that we were able to make any calculation
from the capricious movement of Sir William Howe.
At first, we thought that he would cross the Delaware,
and pour into our entrenchment, man and horse,
without
giving us time to breathe; but, we soon found that
he had left all his boats, and bridges, and heavy baggage
at Brunswick, and come, after a rapid march,
unparalleled
indeed for himall at once, to a
full stop
.
Washington, himself, we could perceive, was
confoundedly
puzzled; but, neither alarmed nor intimidated by
these contradictory operations of his antagonist; and
finally, when that antagonist had, after having thrown
up a chain of redoubts, extending from Somerset to
Brunswick---suddenly abandoned them, as soon as they
were completed---retreating to Brunswick---and thence
to Amboy, without striking a blow---except at the
churches, court houses, and other buildings upon the
road---which he left, reddening and smoking with
devastation, our perplexity was increased to a
distressing
degree. We were willing to fight, anxious to
fight---but few men could have borne, as we did, the
uninterrupted tension of their faculties, for such a length
of time, as we did---bodily and mental, during the
period of indecision. All felt it, but no man more than
Archibald;---his sinews were strung to snapping, again
and again during the day. Again and again, would
the drum roll `at dead of night'---and we would hear
the trumpet ringing over our faces, as we lay, each
man by his own horse---while the trooper that blew it,
galloped along the darkly mustering battalions
we would leap into our saddles---form, and await the
signal of battle, in the expectation that the enemy were
upon us---a few vollies would roll over the clouded sky
---a distant drum or two, rattle for a moment--a solitary
cannon peal like an earthequake, along the trembling
groundand we would be ordered to our repose
again.
To Archibald, more than to any of us, this trial was
terrible!naturally impatient, he was(chiefly, I
believe
,
that the uproar might drown certain recollections
of Clinton)unspeakably so, about this time. And, at
last, when General Greene had been advanced, to fall
upon the enemy's rear,and Wayne and Morgan, upon
their flanks; with Washington, and the whole main
body to support themArchibald could be restrained
no longer;and, just at day light, when Morgan's
infantry
attacked the Hessian pickets, and drove them
in, he rode suddenly down upon them, at the head of
his troop, without waiting for ordersheedless, it
would seem, of every thing but employment; for, such
was the disorderly nature of his attack, that, but for
Morgan, who, for a moment, mistook him for an enemy,
and suddenly called in his men, to receive him, he would
probably have been sacrificed for his impetuosity.
I heard Morgan speak of it, afterward. `Damn the
young mad-cap,' said he, in his broad, fearless way
`I had brought my men off, and was just ready to give
him a volley, that would have left half his troop upon
the fieldwhen he came round upon the enemy in such
a style, that it took my breath awaybroke in upon
themcutting and slashing, like so many devilsand
would have been shut up, but for a company of my
boys that poured in a round or two upon some infantry,
who were rallying to support the picket.'
Morgan, literally, rained fire upon the enemy that
day;and so hot and fierce was the tempest, that they
crossed the bridge (at Brunswick) and threw themselves
into redoubts on the eastern side of the river; and then,
without waiting our approach, abandoned
them
, and
hurried, with unspeakable precipitation, along the
Amboy road.
What possessed Sir William Howe to cut so many
flourishes, before a handful of men, and afterward to
retreat
so precipitately, without coming to actionhas
always been a question with military men. The
uncharitable
have attributed it to every thing but a want
of courage; but II am not uncharitable to a brave
mannor unkind to the memory of an honorable one.
My notion is that he overrated our strengthand
what wonder? our own countryman did so, at least
five hundred per cent!that he had been electrified by
some recent operations of Washington, when, he was
literally
alone
, standing up, amid the war of darkness
and ice that thundered upon Americadeserted,
doubted
,
and
alone
. This had taught Sir William a wonderful
degree of wisdom and circumspection.
Our army now moved to Quibbletown; and Howe
passed over a part of his troops, and his heavy baggage
to Staten Island, evidently with the hope of perplexing
us still more. But Washington was too many for
him; he drew in his light parties, and kept possession
of the high grounds, determining not to avoid a battle,
if it were offeredon such terms as would donor to
invite one, unless at some manifest advantage of position,
that should counterbalance the difference in number.
Yet, nothing effectual could be done. Lord Sterling,
it was true, had a scuffle with the enemy, for two or
three hours, in which he manifested infinitely more
courage than generalshipmore rashness, I should say.
His lordship was a brave manbut(and a bitterer
thing could not be said of a soldier, though we have
chosen to take it as a compliment, in the late war)he
did not know when he was beatennay, nor when he
was in mortal peril:Some changes in the
northern
army had taken place about this time; the long
pending dispute, between General Gates and Schuyler,
was brought to a precipitate and foolish termination
by the block-heads in Congress, who turned, first one,
and then the other out of command, neck and heels,
without trial or examination. And Howe finally
passed
over to Staten Island, leaving us in possession of
the Jerseys againwith nothing to do, but to listen to
frightful stories of Burgoyne, who, it was believed, had
already begun to pour in his legions upon us, like an
inundation, from the north. I remember my own
feelings
;
and love to recall the bright eye and clouded
aspect of Archibald at this time, who was, reallyI
believe it in my soulthe only man within our
entrenchments
,
whose heart did not stop sometimes,when the
tale of Burgoyne and his army of veterans, his world
of artilleryhis own reputationand the hordes of
Indian marksmen that followed his campcame to
our ears.
But we were becalmed.
We
had no power to get up,
and stir our limbs. The enemy stood aloof from us;
and we had the mortification to lie, like chained giants,
ironed ancle and wrist, upon our beds; and hear clap,
after clap, from the North and Eastthe capture of
Prescottthe retreat of St. Clairthe affair of
General Herkimer, and Staten Islandthe valiant
conduct of Arnoldand, finally, one report, that
shook us to the dust, and jarred the whole country,
the battle of Bennington, where farmer Stark, served
VOL. II. 3*
the enemy, hour after hour, with bayonet and ball;
and brought them down, at last, a thousand men of war
prisoners and dead, to the sturdy yeomanry of the
north. I remembered the noise in our camp, when
the news came, as if it were but yesterday. There
was a great outcry and tumult.
Archibald leaped upon his feet, struck his hands
together
,
with a loud shout;and then, the tears gushed
out of his eyesand he shook from head to foot,
with shame and vexation. One only thing found we to
relieve us.
*
*
A young fiery Pole, had got a footing in our armyand (it was
the count Pulaski,) Washington had permitted him to form a body
of light horse,from that hour Archibald and he were inseparable.
Pulaski was decidedly the best horseman, and the most daring,
beyond all comparison, that I ever saw; and, after awhile, he seemed
to attach himself to Archibald, with a feeling more like the
passion
of brotherhood, than that of common friendship. Every day,
I could perceive the advantage of it. Every day, were we taught
some evolution that was knewor corrected in some mistaken
practice of our own;indeed, at last, the Count was pleased to say,
I heard him as he sheathed his sword, after manuvering us for a
whole afternoonthat he would put his legion
now
, man for man,
against any upon this earth. Archibald's mare stood upright, at
the soundbut not of her own accord, I imagine, for her flanks
were reeking, dismally, when she passed me, a moment
afterward
.
Again we were put upon the march. For nearly a
month, by continual and contradictory evolutions of
Sir William's army, and the fleet of Lord Howewe
were kept in a state of perpetual anxiety and doubt, not
knowing whether the enemy meant to strike at the
north or south; one was as probable as the other;
and we, unluckily, had no army of observation, but
our main body, which we dared not move, a day's
march from the centre, between what we believed to be
the points of attack, meditated by the enemy; lest, the
moment that we had turned to the right, he should
dash to the left; or, if we turned to the left, for the
choice was always in his power, as it generally is,
with the assailant, he should face suddenly about, and
play the devil with our right. Yet, for a whole month,
from the 23d of July, to the 22d of August, this state
of suspense and trial continuedaltogether more
painful and discouraging, I am sure, not only to the
army, but to Washington himself, than any time of
the sam duration during the war.
But, at length, we were done with feints and
manuvres
and
were put, seriously, upon the march for
Philadelphia
;
for intelligence that could be depended upon,
had arrived. The enemy were in the Chesapeake.
We were about eleven thousand strong, then; and, at
last, on the 10th of September, we took possession of
a commanding ground on the east side of the
Brandywine
our
main body at Chadsford, with General
Maxwell, occupying a hill on the opposite side, on
which he entrenched himself, tolerably, the same night.
`Now,' said Pulaskiriding up to Archibald, and
saluting him with a motion of his keen weapon, that
looked very like a play of fire work, for a moment,
`now! my brave friend, we shall have an
opportunity
to try your metalhorse and blade.'
`And temper?' said Archibaldwhistling the sword,
in a circle of light (that one of the men swore was to
be seen there, after he rode off,) about his head.
La Fayette was riding slowly by, at the moment, and
smiling, with that expression of calm benignity which
made him the favourite of the whole army, reined up,
and exchanged a few words in French, (which I did not
well understand, then,) with Pulaski, whose eye
flashed
fire, as he exclaimed, in downwright English.
`Aye! by the virgin, as brave a heart as ever beat!
He only wants age,' (glancing at Archibald.)
We were soon after abreast of each other.
`A battle, is at hand now,' said I, `brother what
are your feelings?'
`Calm, unutterably calm.'
`Do you ever
think
of home now? You have done
speaking
of it.'
`You,' he smiled, `you have a round about way
asking a question. But I understand you; yes, I do
think of home, my only home, night and day.'
`I am glad of it,' said I, cheerfully. `We seemed by
a common consent to have abandoned all conversation,
and even all allusion to it.'
`You do not understand me,' he said, `I do not
speak of our motherGod be merciful to her! nor of
Mrs. Arnauld, Mr. Arnauld, Mary Austin, Clara,
your
Clara; what! a blush, a thrill! well brother, if
we pass through this trial, a way
must
be found to
make her acquainted with this; I thought that you had
forgotten her.'
`No,' said I, resolutely, `no! if we ever meet
again, it must be by accident. I will have no
interference
.'
`Nor I,' he replied, `and henceforth, when you
mean to ask me, if I have forgotten Lucia Arnauld,
do not put your question in the shape of `Do you ever
think of
home
now?' Be frank with me, and I will
with you. Artifice defeats itself. I hurt you; but it
is well that I should. You will be the better for it.
Deal plainly with me, like a soldier, like a man, John,
and I will conceal no thought of my heart from you.
Would you have me believe that you are a wily, love
sick fellow, toiling to win another into some talk of
her that you love, without the manhood to speak boldly
about her? For shame brother! You love her; and
you pay her a poor compliment, if you deal thus with
her. No, speak out, speak boldly, however she may
have treated you; and, whatever happen, she will be
proud of
you, and that is better than her
love
.'
CHAPTER II.
`Ah, few shall part, where many meet;
`Their
blood
shall be their winding sheet,
`And every turf, beneath theirfeet
`Shall be a soldier's sepulchre.'
The
battle of Brandywine was fought on the eleventh,
of September 1777; and lasted all the day long. It
was a bloody affair to us; and had well nigh been
fatal
to Greene and Sullivan.
We had been in the saddle about four hours, under
the intrepid Pulaski, who, with his own hand,
examined
our points, pistols and furniture, as if assured that
the struggle would be a deadly, and long continued one.
The dayby heaven! it was one of the most beautiful
that ever broke over the earth.
*
*
For a whole hour before, the sky was all in commotion. From
the north to the ease, a soft troubled gleaming here and there with
incessant
flashes, appeared a vast shadowy, broken and disordered
moveas
if the Heavens were in travail; and all the elements of creation
were separating into shape and loveliness, and some new planets
were about to roll out, with a rush of brightness and verdure, from
the disquieted east.
We were about half
a mile from the main body, ranged along a green slope,
facing the west; our horses, in number about four
hundred
,
standing as patiently as so many marble
creatures
until,
just as the eastern sky began to redden
and undulate; and cloud after cloud, to roll up, and
heave, like a great curtain, upon the wind; and the
whole heaven seemed discharging all its beauty and
brightness upon one spotI happened to turn about
and saw the tall Pole, bareheaded, tilting his horse, like
some warlike presencecome up out of the solid earth,
to worship upon the very summit of the hil! behind us;
it might be, for the noble carriage of the manthe
martial
bearing of the soldier, would permit either
interpretation
;
it might be, in the awful employment of
devotion
orin
the more earthward one, of martial
observation
.
But, suddenly, he reined up his charger,
shook the heavy dew from his horseman's cap
replaced
it, and leaped, headlong, down the hill, just as a
bright flash passed away on the horizon, followed by a
loud report; and, the next moment, a part of our ranks
were covered with dust and turf, thrown up by a
cannon-ball
that struck within a hundred yards of the
place that he had just left. Our horses pricked up
their ears at the sound; and, all at once, as if a
hundred
trumpets were playing in the wind, came the noise
of the enemy in his advance.
Pulaski unsheathed his swordcalled out a select
body
,
and set off at a full gallop to a more distant
elevation
,
where we saw the enemy advancing in two
columns
;
one, under Knyphausen, which moved in
tremendous
steadiness, like a dark, solid mass, in a
direction
toward Maxwell; the other, under Cornwallis,
which seemed to threaten the right flank of our main
body. Intelligence was immediately sent to
Washington
,
and reinforcements called in, from the horse that
we had left.
We kept our position, awaiting, for a whole hour,
the sound of conflict: at last, a heavy volley rattled
along the skya few moments passed, and then
another
followed, like a storm of iron upon drum-heads.
The whole air rung with it; another, and another
followed, and then, gradually increasing in loudness,
and loudness, came peal after peal upon us, till it
resembled
one continual clap of thunder, rolling about
under
an illuminated vapour.
Archibald could not sit stilland his mare seemed
possessed with a devil; in her effort to rush toward
the quarter, where the white, fiery, transparent smoke
evolved, and eddied, like that of a furnace, in a high
windwith one uninterrupted reverberation, she
struggled
and snorted, and plunged, till the clear bright
blood ran out of her nostrils, and frothed and foamed
about her lips: there was rebellion in her very eyes.
But Pulaski, with all his impetuosity, was a general;
and knew his duty too well, to hazard any movement,
till he should be able to see with certainty, the
operation
of the enemy in the vapour below. Meanwhile,
several little parties that we had sent out, came in, one
after the other, in full gallop, with the intelligence, that
Knyphausen had broken down upon Maxwell in
magnificent
stylebeen beaten back, again and again; but,
that he had finally prevailed, and that Maxwell had
retreated across the river.
A thin vapour now rose from the green earth below
us, and completely covered the enemy from our view.
It was no longer possible to follow him, except by the
sound of his tread, which we could feel in the solid
earth, jarring ourselves and our horses; and now and
then, a quick glimmering in the mist, as some standard
was raised above itsome weapon flourished, or some
musket shot through itlike a rocket.
About an hour after, a horseman dashed through the
smoke, on the very verge of the horizonand after
scouring the fields for a whole mile, within view,
communicated
with two or three others, who set off in
different
directionsone to us, with orders to hurry down
to the ford, where the commander-in-chief was
determined
to fall upon Knyphausen with all his power, before
Cornwallis could come to his aid. It was a noble but
hazardous game. And Pulaski, whose war-horse,
literally
thundered and lightened along the broken and
stony precipice, by which we descended, kept his eyes
warily to the right, as if not quite certain, that the
order
would not be countermanded.
We soon fell in with Greene, who was posting, all on
fire, to give Knyphausen battle; and, the next moment,
saw Sullivan in full march, over a distant hill, (upon
which, the morning sun broke out just then, as if
leaving
the heavens for a while,) to turn the enemy's flank.
This arrangement would have been fatal to
Knyphausen
;
but, unluckily there was a stop put to it, almost
in the very moment, when we were ready to fall upon
him, man and horse, by the alarming intelligenee, that
Cornwallis had moved off to another quarter. There
was a moment of irresolutiondoubt. It was the death
of us. Greene was recalled; and Sullivan commanded
to halt. Hardly had this happened, and our horses
were covered with sweat and frothfretting like
chained
tigers upon the bit; our men, covered with dust, and
blinded with the wind, and sunfor it was extremely
hot and sultrywhen a heavy cannonade was heard on
our right flank; and Greene, whose division we had
been attached to, was put in motion for the support of
Sullivan, whom we had left some hours before. The
truth now broke upon us like a thunder clap. The
enemy
had passed, concentrated, (as we supposed,) and
fallen upon our right. Lord! I never shall forget
Greene's countenance, when the news came; he was
in the road side, upon a very steep bankbut he
wheeled
where he wasdashed down the bankhis face
white as the bleached marbleand calling to us, to
gallop forward for encouragement, without throwing
ourselves into the enemy's power, put his division
forward
,
with such a tremendous impulse, that they
marched four miles in forty minutes: we held on our
way, in a cloud of dust, and met Sullivan, all in
disorder
,
nearly a mile from the field, retreating, step by
step, at the head of his men, and shouting himself
hoarsecovered with blood and sweat; and striving, in
vain, to bring them to a standwhile Cornwallis was
pouring in upon them, an incessant volley.
Pulaski dashed out to the right, over the broken
fences; and there stood awhile, upright in his stirrups,
reconnoiteringwhile the enemy who appeared by the
smoke and dust that rolled before them, in the wind, to
be much nearer than they really were, redoubled their
efforts: but, at last, he saw a favourable opportunity.
The column wheeledthe wind swept athwart their van,
revealing them, like a batallion of spirits, breathing
fire and smoke: he gave the signalArchibald
repeated
itArthurand myself. In three minutes, we were
ready for the word; and, when Pulaski, shouting in a
voice that thrilled through and through us, struck
spurs to his chargerit was half a minuteso fierce
and terrible was
his
charge, before we were able to
come up with him. What could he mean! gracious
heaven! my hand, convulsively, like that of a drowning
man, reined up for a momentwhen I saw that we
were galloping straight forward, into a field of bayonets
yet he was the first man! and who would not have
followed him! We did follow him, and with such a
hurricane of fire and steel, that, when we wheeled, our
whole path lay broad and open before us, with a wall
of fire upon the right hand and the left but not a
bayonet
nor a blade in front, except what were under the
hoofs of our horses. My blood rushes now, like a flash
of fire, through my forehead, when I recal the
devastation
that we had madealmost to the very heart of the
enemy's column. But Pulaskihe, who afterward
rode into their entrenchments, on horseback, sword in
hand, was accustomed to it; and, having broken over
them onceaware of his peril, if he should give them time
to awake from their consternation, he wheeled in a
blaze of fire, with the intention of returning, through a
wall of death, more perilous than that which shut in
the children of Israel, upon the red seabut no! the
walls had rolled in upon us, and we were left no choice,
but to continue as we had began. The undaunted Pole
rioted in the excess of his joy; I remember how he
passed me, again and again, recking with blood
riding
,
absolutely, upon the very bayonets of the enemy;
and, at last, as they pressed upon himand horseman
after horseman, fell from our saddleswhen we were
all faint and feeble, and even Archibald was fighting
on foot, over his beautiful mare, with Arthur battling
over his head, we heard the joyful cry of
succour!
succour
!
and felt the enemy give wayheave, this way
VOL. II. 4
and that, and finally concentrate, beyond us: `Once
more!' cried Pulaski, `
once more!
' and away he went
again, breaking in upon them, as they were forming;
and trampling down whole platoons, in the charge,
before
a man could plant his bayonet, or bring his piece
to an aim: and, the next moment, we were scouring
over the ground, where I could yet see Archibald and
Arthur battling it, with four or five of the enemy's
horse; but our aspect, as we came thundering round
upon them, proved sufficient. They took to their heels,
and we brought them both off, unwoundedunhurt.
It was getting dark now, but the hour was that of
sunset; when, in this climate, the sky is like a mass of
coloured vapour floating over a bath. Greene was
forming in our rear, with that fearful calmness, which
boded a terrible time, always, to him that ventured
upon
it. The ground was favourable to him; and the
half hour that the enemy lost by our charge, a mere
handful, into his solid column, was of inconcievable
benefit to Greene; for his men were literally out of
breath, and ready to drop down, at the first onset. But,
that half hour gave them an opportunity to see their
commander's face, and hear his voice; and, from that
moment
,
they would have stood their ground, though the
heavens had rained fire upon them
I have been in many a battlemany a one, that
made my hair stiffen afterward in my sleep, when I
dreamt of itbut never in one, where the carnage
was so dreadfulthe rush of blood and fire so
incessant
,
as that which followed the arrival of Greene: we
were unable to strike a blow. The enemy imagining
us, no doubt, to he much more formidable than we were,
had hedged in all his exposed points, by a rank of men,
kneeling with planted bayonets; and, though we rode
upon them, again and again, discharging our pistols in
their facesyet not one of them shut his eyes, or fired
a shotbut, where he knelt, he died; and his place was
immediately filled by another, as resolute, so that we
could not, the thing was impossible, repeat the blow
that we had given.
But one thing happened, within my own sight and
hearing, that nearly brought me to the ground, in
terrour
and helplessness. Two horsemen had set upon
me; and, while I was doing my best to return their
visit
.
I saw that they were only a part of a squadron,
whom we had not seen before, or who had but just been
brought into action; and that several were upon
Archibald
,
who, while I was looking upon him, recled in the
saddle, and took a blow, I thought, that cleft his head
for his bear-skin cap flew, and his horse broke from
the encounter, and dashed off to the right; I followed,
and soon came in contact with Weedon's Virginia
brigade, which soon relieved me from all apprehensions
on my own account; for the enemy fell before them, rank
after rank, like flax in the blaze; they were supported
by a body of the Pennsylvania militia, near the head
of whom, I saw La Fayette; the reins all loose
wounded in the armhis red scarf shot away, and
streaming in the windyet showing the same
unaltered
front; and leading the raw militia up to the very eyes
of the enemy, while a sheet of fire scorched their faces.
I continued my course, and soon discovered a
horseman
staggering in the darknesswhom, I knew, from
the shape and bearing, to be Archibald, long and long
before I could get to him. It was heand he was faint,
very faint, from the loss of bloodII spoke to him,
and was reaching out my hand to catch the rein of his
unmanageable horse, when the animal stumbled
rolled
oversnorted, so as to cover me with a shower of
blood, and died. Archibald fell with her; and for
some minutes, I stood over him, utterly unable to
hear if he answered me, or not; such was the terrible
noise from the place of contentionso deafeningso
blinding; and such, the low, deep, inarticulate sobbing
of my poor brother: at last, however, O, how
unspeakably
dear was the first sound of his voice! at last
he spoke.
`Arthur?John?'
`Yes, brother,' said I.
We were sitting upon a wet bankand it was quite
dark.
`Brother, is it you? I would give the world for a
drop of cool water.'
I left him, and ran about for a long time, before I
was able to find anyand, after all, was only able to
bring him a small quantity in my leather capthat I
dare say, had been trampled into, and bled into, by
dying
horses and men that day.
`God bless you!' he crieddrinking it every drop,
before he returned the capand, without stopping to
breathe. `Ha! the cannon still! will they fight
forever
?
Let us go back.'
`What! are you able to go back?'
`
Able!
' he criedleaping upon his feet`able! aye,
and willthough a whole regiment of horse had been
shot under me. II'
He staggered, and fell athwart the trodden turf; and
lay for some minutes, without speaking; so long
indeed
,
that the firing had ceasedand we heard the two
armies moving away. Heard, I saybut I mean that
we felt them; for, inconceivable as it may seem, to
those who have had no experience, it is true, that the
tread of a battalion, heavily armed, may be felt many
miles by a person lying upon level ground in a
serene
day. The Indians know this, and profit by it.
But the battle was now over; and we were at last
discovered by a party of our own troop, who, ignorant
of their loss, were scouring the open country, to
protect
the wounded, and cut off the stragglers.
We then crossed the river, and moved up toward
Sweeds ford; while Sir William Howe, who seemed to
be satisfied, whenever he had fought us, without being
beaten, and was never prepared to follow up any
advantage
,
halted three days upon the field of battle, to
contemplate the havock that had been made; while
our cause was never in greater danger. We had lost
nearly twelve hundred men, and ten brass field pieces.
Arehibald had been sorely bruised, and fatigued
beyond
all example, in the strife; but, in no other way
was he materially injured.
Again we were upon the riverArchibald and I,
sitting together; and he, poor fellow, lamenting the
loss of his mare, as if she had been his wife: by this. I
mean,
not
, that he whistled and sangbut, that he wept
aye, wept, for the loss of the noble beast, and
believed
,
I am sure, to his dying day, that she died of a
broken
heart. `Would that I had let her have her own
way!' he said.
While we were ruminating on the event and I was;
watching his full eyes, and almost mocking at his
griefwe heard a loud cry, and a plunge; we turned,
and saw Du Coudray, whom we instantly knew, by his
beautiful uniform, in the middle of the current, upon
the back of his furious horse: unluckily, in the
animal's
terrour, he had entangled his feet in the reins, so
as to keep his mouth and nose under. The gallant
Frenchman lost not his presence of mind, for a moment,
but threw himself from the saddlewhile the fiery
horse was beating the dark water all into foam about
him, and attemped to gain the shore. In vain, in vain
he faintedstruck, as we always thought it
probable
,
by the hoofs of his horse; he gasped a moment
made two or three desperate plungessobbedthe
water
rushed into his throat, and he gradually sunk, till
nothing but his beautiful hair was seen floating upon
the wave, and the motion of his hands, blindly toiling
under the water for a moment longer. Many an arm
was near himmany a voicehe heard themtried to
reach them; put his hands out of the water for a little
distancethe fingers wide apart, and went down then
forever!
Poor fellow! Archibald was near to himbut not
the nearestand, when he went down, he uttered a loud
cry, threw himself half out of water, and sunk.
Archibald
plunged after himbut it was too lateDu
Coudray
had been swept away.
Again were we on the point of battle. It was the
17th of Sept. We were on the Lancaster roadnear
the Warren tavern. Archibald was just able to sit his
VOL. II. 4*
horse, and felt particularly solicitous to do his duty
again; for Washington had been pleased to speak to
him, face to face, for his good conduct; and he was
now to battle under Washington's eyes. Our van was
already engaged; and Pulaski, all on fire, for another
dash at the enemy, was beginning to shew the usual
symptoms of onset, when, all at once, the windows of
heaven were opened; and the rain poured down in such
torrents that both armies drew offours with every
cartridge that they had, spoilt,theirs, to march on to
Philadelphia, of which they took possession
immediately
.
And here an affair took place, in which Arthur was
personally concerned. He had been detailed, with about
twenty of our troop, to the aid of Captain Lee's
dragoons
,
for the purpose of destroying some flour.
Colonel Hamilton was with us. We had succeeded in
our purposeand were about returning; when our
videttes, that we had left out, came down upon us, at
full speed, with the enemy at their heels. I was near
Hamilton, who immediately ordered us into a flat
bottomed boat, leaping his own horse in at the same
time. I obeyed; and, as we put off, under several
successive
vollies from the enemy, poured into us like
hail from the bank and bridge above usI saw Lee
and Arthur. They faced suddenly with one other
dragoon in the rearupon the advancing column, and
dashed athwart the bridge, in their very faces, under a
general discharge. Over they wentwith the fire
streaming from the heels of their horses---and all eyes
upon them---I, for one, holding my breath---and
expecting
to see their bodies fall off, at the first turn of
the horses. But no---not a bullet struck them. It
seemed miraculous---yet so it was. And when I had
hold of Arthur's hand, a few moments afterward, and
saw his unaltered countenance, and handsome eyes
bright with his deliverance---I could scarcely believe
my own senses---nay---scarcely refrain from tears.
`The enemy are in Philadelphia,' said I.
`No, not yet'he replied; `but on their way
there. What mean you?'.
`I mean,' said I, `thatthatare you entirely
at ease about Mary?'
`Perfectly,' said he, smiling. `Do you know where
she is?'
`In Philadelphiais she not?'
He shook his head. `No,' said he`no, I thank
you. She is in better quarters.'
`By heavenArthurit is'nt possible; that young
man with youcan it be, that he.'
A young, handsome fellow, had lately joined Arthur;
and, for a moment, I was childish enough to think
what I am ashamed to utter. He understood me
coloured, and frowned.
`No,' he exclaimed`
no!
I do not ask you what
you thought. I should not like to hear it. But Mary
is safeat Mr. Arnauld's. Ha!you are strangely
disturbed. Mark me, they are all well,
very
well
all
except Clara, and Lucia. They have heard of
Clinton's
death.'
CHAPTER III.
`Through tangled juniper, beds of weeds;
`Through many a fen, where the serpent feeds,
And man ne'er trod before.
`And near him the she wolf stirred the brake,
`And the copper-snake breathed in his ear.'
In
hurrying rapidly over the events of this period,
which related to the operations of the army, I have
omitted to mention an incident, which, at the time,
made little impression upon us, (Archibald and myself
I mean), but which, from the consequences that
afterward
grew out of it, became exceedingly important.
I have alluded already to the jealousies and heart
burning, between the eastern and southern troops; and,
it is a fact, not now to be denied, that the New
Englanders
,
with a few exceptions, were the most substantial
men for the service. There was scarcely a foreigner in
their ranks; all were natural born Americans. But
the levies of our southern brethren were sadly
adulterated
with such rabble, as could be bought cheapest.
There were some noble exceptions, of course
Smallwood's
regiment, and Morgan's were full blooded
southerners; their arteries running with fire and chivalry.
About the time when these discontents first broke
out, Archibald came accidentally in contact with a
yankee named Copely, Chester Copelya strange,
cold blooded fellow, with resolute features, light grey
eyes, and a remarkably muscular, sinewy frame; of
the middle sizewith a little twist in his neck, to the
left, that cost him many a pleasant gibe. He was a
man of few wordsbitter and sarcastickand no
companion
.
There was something mysterious, too, in his
manner toward Archibald; for, contrary to his known
habits, he seemedto court the acquaintance of my
haughty
brother. And in timesuch was the nature of his
temperthe cold, silent dominion that he exercised over
all about himthat Archibald himself, a creature,
whose very tread was rebellion to all that looked like
an assumption of authority over himbecame so
infatuated with this man, that he would put up with any
thing from him. I never liked himnor did Arthur;
yet it would have been impossible to give a reason for
itexcept that there was a sullen, implacable
steadiness
;
a sort of passionless insensibility in all that he
said and did, which bore hard upon us, I confess; with
an expression of superiority. Nothing seemed to move
him. He would say the bitterest things, and the
pleasantest
,
with precisely the same tone. Why he had
sought Archibald's acquaintance, was a matter of
inquiry with all our division. He was known and
shunned; and, when they appeared together, there was
a general expression of surprise. I suspected some
design in it, yet, what could it be? Archibald was not
popularnor richnor powerful.
This thing had continued about two months, until
Arthur and I had forgotten to speak of it, even to each
other; and the troop, who were passionately devoted
to Archibald, had become, in a measure, reconciled to
the cold evenness of temper---so unlike what it had
beenthat characterised him, and grew upon him, day
by day, after his acquaintance with the Yankee.
I have seen Copely, when I thought him handsome;
no, not handsomesomething better, higher, nobler.
There was a remarkable expression of manhood and
strength in his manner of sitting, standing, or even in
folding his arms. His forehead was very high, but
sunburnt, and hard. So knitted were his joints; so
compact his frame, so firm his tread, and so confident
and cool were all his movements, that there was not a
man in the army whom I would not sooner have
encountered
,
than Chester Copely. I have never seen a
herofor Washington was of a race above heroes; but
my notion has always been, that Copely was intended
for one. But let me give you some example of his
conduct and conversation. They will enable you to
judge better of his true character, than any general
description
.
After we had first seen him, and noted him for the
cold, strange indifference of his look, on all occasions
in battle and outit was remarked that he would be
absent, for a week or ten days at a time, in the
neighbouring
country, without any notice being taken of it;
nay, it would almost seem, without asking leave; for,
when nobody else was permitted to move beyond our
entrenchments, the yankee captain used to come and
go, as freely as if our camp had been a publick market
place. At last, a rumour came among us, that he was
in the confidence of Washington, to a degree passing all
belief; and that he was consulted, whenever any affair of
moment, was in agitationalone, and apart from all the
favorites of Washington. How true this was, I
cannot
take upon myself to say; for he never spoke or
hinted of any such power or confidence; and, when
others hinted at it, pretty broadly too, at times, he
paid precisely the same kind of attention to it, that he
did to every thing else; neither affecting concealment,
nor franknessbut wearing always the samenot
haughty, it was not haughty, but proud, insensible
regal front, as if the things that troubled other men,
were beneath his attention, except in the mechanical
routine of his duty, and
there
he was unrivalled. His
discipline was stern, implacable, unrelenting, less
from any feeling of ambition, or because he coveted
the name of a disciplinarianbut merely, as ifhe
scorned to be outdone, even in what he regarded as
beneath
him. That he was on a footing, different from
that of any other young man, in the army, with
Washington
,
I can testify to, from my own knowledge. I
was eye witness once, of a scene, where Washington
stood before him, with a troubled countenanceand an
agitated frameand seemed, for a whole minute,
unconscious
of my presence: while Copely eyed me, with
his cold bright balls, all the while, as if he had been
expecting me.
It was just about this time, that he formed an
acquaintance
with Archibald; and, there were hours,
when, as they passed me in the dark, or at night,
treading
in time, upon the snow before our tents, I should
have believed that
they
were brothersand I a
stranger
.
More than once, have I heard a suppressed sob;
from, I dare not say, that it was from Copely, for his
unalterable nature never showed a symptom of
feeling
equal to that, in the day timeno tear, no smile,
no laugh. Happen what would, he was the same, to
all outward appearance; collected and distant, not
from affectation, or melancholy, or reserve, or sorrow,
but, perhaps I am wrong, but such was my thought at
the time, from a natural feeling of superiority
misplaced
.
He was deeply read, and had travelled; but this was
not to be discovered by a common man. He disdained
to parley with a common man; not because he
despised
,
or pitied him; or was proud of his own character;
but from a natural incapacity to herd with him.
It was thought that he never slept during the night;
for, pass his tent, when we would, he was always
sitting
at his table, if in camplike one employed on
forbidden matters, about which he was careless,
because
there was none but himself, to understand them.
At last, a report reached us, after one of his longest
absences, at a time when we were just about breaking
up, in the hope of a battle from Sir William Howe,
that he was to be marriedand that too, immediately,
to one of the most extraordinary women in the country.
How the report came, where it originated, we know
not. But there was a cloud upon his face, at his
return
;
and his conferences with Archibald were more
frequent than ever. I remonstrated; and mentioned
something of my suspicion, and thought, concerning
him. Archibald smiled; but his lips were agitated; I
saw
that
. Arthur observed too, that he always went
armed, beyond what seemed required by his situation;
that the door of his tent was always secured, and
that he never admitted any person, till he had first made
a bustle within. These were trifles, but they all
served
to quicken our observation and wonder. We learnt
too, that he was the subject of especial animosity to
several southern officers; and, one day, it was just
after
the report of his intended marriage had reached us,
we made an attempt to rally him about it. He had been
riding out with Archibald; and, when they returned,
whether it was that their faces had become flushed with
the exercise, or that something had happened to disturb
them, I knew notbut I thought that I had seldom
seen two heads more unlike each other, and, at the same
time, so full of character. Copely too, had equipped
himself in a new uniform, that laced athwart his broad
chest, so as to exhibit all its manly proportions; and
the contrast between his marked and athletick frame
and the delicate expressiveness of Archibald's, would
have been worthy of a painter. Copley was a little the
tallerbut, in every movement, there was the strength of
a lionbut that of a lion sleeping; while every
movement
of my brother was that, in the quietest time of a
young catamount, her sinews always crouchingwhile
her joints are all loose and supple.
But, before I relate what I am about to, you will
bear this in mind; that Copely talked to all men, on
all occasions, in the same manner; saying, with a
face like cast iron, the severest things in the world,
without appearing to intend it. And yet, there was no
affectation of dry humour, or simplicity, or gravity in
him. All was natural, and uniform, like the
expression
of a strong brain, and solid heart; and, when we
were, sometimes, all struck aback at the abrupt
plainness
of his manner; he would look round upon us, as
if he pitied our amazement, and knew that what he
had
donewas nothingin comparison with what he
could
do. He had a strange faculty too, of facing upon
you, and throwing all your thought into disorder, by
some short remark, that you could not forgetto your
dying day; were anxious to resentbut could not.
Add to all this, that, without appearing to intend it,
he always appeared to take his stand exactly upon that
line, which separates impunity from accountability.
Time and again, have I seen dark eyes flashing,
swollen
lips writhing, and brave hearts, throbbing under what
he had saidwhile it would have been impossible to
quarrel with him for it. He was hated, hated, with a
deadliness and steadiness, by the Virginia interest,
surpassing
all that I have ever seen. Yet my brother
adhered
to himand held aloof even from his beloved
Virginians, to consult with him.
And now, I will attempt to give you an idea of his
manner, from a conversation that he held with us on
that very evening, after he appeared, for the first time,
in a new uniform, which had probably given rise to the
report that he was to be married. It was a few weeks
before the battle of Brandywine.
Arthur, Copely, a Captain Henshaw, (one of the
most quiet creatures, that ever breathed, but the devil
in battle) and myself, were forming a party in the new
quarters of Archibald, which, by the united effort of the
troop, after his recovery, had been made very
comfortable
.
Copely sat facing me, the red fire light flashing
in his face,his elbows square, and toes turned in,
exactly as if he were on horseback.
We had been admiring the cut of his uniform.
`Well Copely,' said Henshaw, in his pleasant,
deliberate
way, `so you are to be married?'
`God forbid!'was the reply.
`Why so?'said Arthur.
Copely made no answer, except by shrugging his
shoulders.
`Do you deny it?' said ArchibaldI thought, with
a slight agitation about the mouth.
`
Yes
,' said Copely.
`What!' retorted Archibald, leaning toward him.
`Do I not know, that you are courtingand preparing
for itand, that the day is fixed?'
VOL. II. 5
`True,' answered the impenetrable man.
`Then, why deny it?' said I.
`I do not deny
that
. I only deny that I shall be
married
and
I recommend the same conduct to every
other man.I would never own it, till the
benediction
had been pronounced, unless I were sure that there
was not another man in the world.'
`You are very bitter?' said Archibald.
`No; I may be very
honest
. But
you
look (
addressing
himself to me,) as if
you
had something at
your
heart.'
`Delight, and astonishment,' said I.
`Pho, you dont mean any such thingyou may feel
surprise and pleasurebut few things would delight or
astonish such a man as you.'
`But why marry,' said Arthur, `with such an
opinion
of women.'
`Why spill my blood, at sixpence a day? Because, I
must be occupied in one way or another.'
`But why rail at marriage?' said Henshaw,
laughing
`where
there is such a charming example before
youColonel R, he has married three wives.'
`Yesand that is not all.'
`What else has he done?'
`Survived them. I reverence himI never let him
pass me, without taking off my hatrain or shine. I
gaze upon him, as I would upon the Duke of
Marlborough
,
or Turenne, or Eugene. The veteran!'
`Copely,' said Archibald, changing his whole
manner
.
`Do you know why I have called you together
this evening?'
`No.'
`There is a conspiracy against you.'
`I know it,' said Copely.
`They are determined to provoke you; and put you
out of the way, if they can.'
`I know it.'
`You had better keep out of the way awhile'said
Archibald, with some emotion`will you?'
`No.'
`But what will you do?'
`Exactly what I have always done.'
`But they will insult you.'
`I expect it.'
`Challenge you.'
`Undoubtedly.'
`Cut your throat.'
`I don't believe it.'
`Shoot you.'
`Probably.'
`And yet, dear Copely,' said Archibald, drawing
his chair up to him, and leaning upon his shoulder,
while Copely's stern featuresno not sternhis steady
features were red with the fire light`of what avail
will it be? what can you do? You do not expect, alone,
to fight up the New England characterdo you?'
`Yes.'
`You are madthere are thirty of them, and not
more than six or eight of your side, whose principles
will permit them to fight a duel.'
`I
am
mad.'
`But what will you doif the whole thirty
challenge
you one after the other?'
`Fight the whole thirtywhen I have nothing
better
to do.'
`But why not keep out of their way?'
`Because they have threatened me.'
`And so, you throw yourself into their way.'
`Nonot a step. I behave just exactly, as if I had
never heard of the matter.'
The above will give you some idea of the man. I
will now relate an affair or two, which will give you
a better one.
Just before the battle of Brandywinenay, before
the encampment broke up at Morristown, Archibald
and I, were tilting at a ring, in a large circular
enclosure
,
which we called the riding school. Copely was
there; but he seemed to take no interest in the sport,
until a Virginianhe, of whom I have already spoken,
Major Ellisas the tall, martial, blackeyed fellow,
that was with Clinton at the time of his death, after a
hard game, had borne off the ring, repeatedly, in better
style than Archibald, who, before his illness, had no
match in the troop. Archibald was vexed not a little,
by the airs of the conqueror; and, as he backed his
horse just in front of me, and caught my eyes, he struck
his blade into one of the wooden posts, with a force
that astonished me; saying, at the same time, that he
could bear to be beaten by anybody better than that
man. The Major scowledand my brother, in a pet,
swore that he was ashamed of himself and his troop.
I saw the cloud gathering. But Copely, turning
to Archibald, asked him what he would give
him
to
beat the victor?
`Give you!' said Archibald`a pair of pistols
such as haven't their match in the army.'
`Dismount a moment,' said Copely, in reply, with
his head on one side.
Archibald could not believe him to be in earnest;
and none of us had ever seen him in
heat
, as he used to
call it, when a good swordsman went handsomely
through his divisions.
`Mind the stirrup!' said Archibaldas Copely
reined up the horse, and grasped the mane with his left
hand, preparing to mount, as if on parade`if you
touch the stirrup, you'll never touch the saddle.'
Copely made no reply; but was in the seat, and
running
full speed at the ring, which he took off, and
replaced
at every successive evolution, till the whole
circus
rang with huzzaz. When, he dismounted, and
returned
to the same position, which he had occupied
before
,
and there stood, with his arms folded, precisely
as if he had no concern in what was going forward.
Archibald could hardly forbear embracing him on the
spot; but the Major was overflowing with wrath and
blackness.
`We shall have a quarrel out of this;' said
Archibald
,
turning a little pale, `I perceive it.'
`
Yes
,' said Copely, just as if he had been asked to
take a pinch of snuff`it is very probable.'
And so it happened; for the major began abusing
first
, all mankindthen,
all
horsemanthen, all
strangers
then,
all captainsand finally, all
Yankees
.
Finding that nobody was disposed to answer him; and,
when he had fairly run out of breath, after working
himself into a passion, that I expected every moment
for he grew black in the facewould end in an
apoplexy
he
stood still, fumbling about the hilt of his
hanger.
There was a dead silence. Copely stood, with his
arms folded, looking him in the face, as if he had been
some object, rather of curiosity than fear. `Did you
know, sir,' said he, in his natural cold tone; `that I
am a Yankee.'
`Did Iyes, and be damned to you,' said the other,
riding fiercely up to him; `and what then?take it
as you like.'
`Thank you,' he replied, `I admire your courtesy.'
For the world, I would not have undergone the look
that Copely gave him. There was neither contempt,
nor scorn, nor pity, nor defiance, nor compassion in
it; but it was a compound, thatwould have made me
feel like a fool, for years afterward, had I thought of
it, as having been levelled at me.
`Stop sir,' continued Copely, seeing the other about
to wheel off, as if to hide his perturbation`I have a
word to say to you,'this was in the same tonethe
same attitudeand he was unarmed. `You have said
what I hope you will be sorry for. At present, I have
no more to say to you. But, once for all, I would
have you understand that this language is never to be
repeated in my presence. I shall be happy to see you
here to-morrow, at the same hour, with the same
company
.'
`With all my heart!' said the other, `now or then,
it is all the same to me.'
`Nayyou appear to misunderstand me. You are
in a passion. I cannot permit myself to retort now.
VOL. II. 5*
I give you till to-morrow to think of your conduct.
RememberI do not challenge you: I do not come
here to-morrow, to fight you. But, I shall meet you
here.'
The major looked down upon him for a moment, as
if he would have ridden over him, in the scorn and
detestation
of his heart. But nothing moved Copely
nothing, though Archibald appeared exceedingly
disturbed
,
and had been several times on the point of
interfering
.
`What do you intend to do?' said Archibald, after
a silence of nearly half an hour, as we were returning.
`You shall know to-morrow. I never bark;' was
the reply.
The next day, he went with us, unarmed, contrary
to all our remonstrances.
`Pho,' said he, coldly, `if I arm, there will be
bloodshed. I am not prepared for that.'
We found the major there, surrounded by four or
five as handsome fellows as I ever saw, looking black
as death, however, while they held aloof from the
exercise
.
They saw that Copeley was unarmed; and their lips
curled, as they called the attention of Major Ellis to
the circumstance; and he muttered something, which
was too truebut it made my heart giddy, for a
moment
,
with passionand Archibald's hand search for
the hilt of his cimetar.
The exercises were gone through with in a sort of
sullen
,
discontented silence; and Copely stood all the while,
precisely in the same spotin the same attitudewith
the same countenancenaturaland careless.
`Gentlemen,' said he, turning his eyes, leisurely,
round the enclosure; `I see some new faces; but are
all here now, that were here yesterday?'
`Aye! aye! sir!' was the reply, from twenty
voices, at the same moment; while the major, leaning
his warlike person over the broad white mane of his
charger, which swept abroad at every movement of
the neck, like breakers flying in the wind, seemed
delighted
with the prospect; a little more, I thought,
than was natural, for his feet rattled in the stirrups.
`Well, Major Ellis,' said Copely, in the same
unaltered
,
unalterable tone; `have you nothing to say to
me, for the intemperate language that you held to me
yesterday?'
`To
you!
God! is it come to this! I thought that
you
had something to say to me.'
`I have,' was the reply; `but I would first know
if you have well considered it. You have nothing to
say then?'
`Nothing,' said the other, haughtily.
`I am sorry for it. It compels me to use harsh
language
to you. You are a blockheadan overgrown
blockhead. You are an overbearing man, with, I
believe
,
very little courage at the heart. You are a
disgrace
to Virginia; and, had I any virginia blood in my
veins, I would cut your throat for the dishonour that
you have done it, by your brutal misbehaviour. I
have done.'
I looked at the major; he was trying to draw his
sabreand, every moment, I expected to see him fall
from his unruly horse, as he bent over for the purpose;
while Archibald, with a keen eye, and spurs ready to
strike into his charger, sat, with his blade glimmering
in his hand, as if anticipating the result. But
Copely
I
was more and more amazed at the expression of
his countenanceat every movement. I verily
believe
,
that he would have stood with his arms folded,
though Ellis had charged upon him, and the iron hoofs
and glittering sword were above his eyes. But before
the major could extricate his sword, which had became
entangled in his trappings, one of his companions had
interfered, and obtained a suspension of the judgment,
that his heart had evidently pronounced.
`You will hear from me,' said he, yielding to his
friend, and passing out.
`If you please,' said Copely.
`And me! and me! and me!' said the others.
`If you please;' he replied to each.
We returned to our quarters; and were hardly housed,
when a stranger brought a note to Copely.
He read itand reaching it to Archibald, whose
hand shook now, though it did not shake when he
received
Clinton's for himselfhe asked him what he
thought of it?
`Sit down, young man,' said Copely, to the stranger.
The stranger bridled, like a blood horse fretting on
the bitand made no other answer than a reluctant,
haughty inclination of the head. He was true
Virginia
!
I could have hugged him for it; I hated the
Yankees.
`I have nothing to say.' said Archibald, returning
it; `it is a matter for your own determination.'
The stranger bowed, and said that the
friend
of
Captain
Copely would communicate with him, and return
an answer, when it was agreeable.
`Very courteous
very
said Copely. But stop
young man. Tell the major that I will meet him.'
`Please to write it, Sir.'
`No, Sir.'
`And when ?'
`
When?
ah, well considered. I should like to
spill some blood for my country first. To day is
friday
.
Oadley, what think you of next week? I have
a good deal of writing on hand.'
`As you please,' said Archibald.
`No, nonext week, I am to be married. I must
fight one battle first. I should like to rehearse. The
major and I can fight afterward, though I should
happen
to be disabled. But I might not do for the enemy,
after he and I had met.Tell the major, that I will
meet him, and all his friends, one after the other.Let's
seeto day is friday; any time that he pleases, after
we have had one brush with the enemy; and I have
had aaafter I have had my likeness taken. I
should be sorry to leave no resemblance behind me.
Is
he
married?'
`Sir, I am in no disposition to trifle,' said the
stranger
.
`Nor I, God knows. My question is enough to
prove that. If he be not, tell him that I give him the
same time that I shall take, to bequeath his lineaments;
we might make it a very pretty family piece.'
`And what am I to say, Sir? Yes, or no?when,
and where, and how?'
`Peremptory enough! But the
where
and
how
, I
leave to him. The
when
, I must be permitted to
determine
.
I wish that I
could
fix the day; but I
cannot
.
These cursed matters of marrying, and fighting,
must be gone through with, first. I am under an
engagement
;
a foolish one I grant; but I never break
my word. After that, tell the major to call in, any
time when he is going by, and I shall be happy to
entertain
him, or any of his friends.'
`And this is your answer?' said the stranger.
`Yes, Sir.'
`You will not be surprised, I hope, if the major
should accost you with a horsewhip to-morrow?'
`Not in the least,' he replied.
The stranger left usand we burst out into one loud
peal of laughter. There was something so irresistibly
comick in the indifference of Copely, which, whether
felt or feigned, every one of us envied.'
But the major did not attempt to horsewhip him,
probably from the fear of our commander; and Copely
continued to go among them, just as usual, till the
afternoon
previous to his marriage, when I saw him
embrace
Archibald, in whose eyes, when I met him, were
the traces of tears; hot tears, such as are wrung from
high hearts, by a pressure that scorches, while it
exhausts
them.
But that very night, Copely returned againor
rather, the next morning; for, about two o'clock, I heard
his voice, and saw Archibald throw on his watch cloak,
and rejoin him;---they walked away together, and
appeared, whenever they approached, by the sound of
their voices, and the movement of Archibald's shadow
upon the wall, to be in earnest conversation. At
last, they separated; and, when Archibald had thrown
himself upon the bench, with a dim lamp shining upon
his face, I saw it working for several minutes like a
convulsion.
`What has happened?' said I. `He was to have
been married to night, was he not? What brought him
back?'
`
Death
,' said he, in a low voice.
`Death!---heavenly father---was she dead?'
`No, no, would that she were. But do not ask me.
He is not married. Good night!'
`Good night!'
I saw Copely in the morning---and fancied---perhaps
it was only fancy, that he was paler and sterner than
I had ever seen him; but perhaps he had grown paler
by watching, as he had, week after week.' And so the
time passed away, his intimacy remaining about the
same, till the battle of Brandywine, in which he fought,
it is said, with the cool intrepidity of a veteran, spurring
into the hottest fire, with a senseless disregard to
danger
,
utterly unlike the distempered eagerness of young
men that are braveand resembling, what one might
look for in a creature, that felt himself to be immortal,
invulnerable, and exceedingly potent. But, the battle
over, and a moment of repose allowed to it, the pledge
of blood was to be redeemed.
It was nightI had just heard the report of a pistol;
and on looking out, saw a crowd of soldiers rushing
into Copely's tent. A part of them soon returned
bearing, what appeared by their movements, as they
staggered along over the uneven ground, to be a dead
body. I ran out in a paroxysm of terrour. It
was
a
dead bodythe body of Major Ellis. Copely had shot
him through the brain. I entered his tent, and saw
him, in his shirt sleeves, bandaging his left arm, which
hung, as if broken, over the chairwith his own hand.
He never took off his eyes from the arm, but continued
the operationthough the sweat stood upon his
forehead
(and heart too, I dare say) in loose drops, when
I entered.
Archibald followed me.
`What have you done?' said he.
`Shot the Major,' he answered, without lifting his
eyes.
`And what has
he
done?'
`Shot me,' was the reply.
`How happened it?'
`How! he accepted my invitationcalled, as he was
going byand Ihaving the vapoursI suppose, for
I have been very low spirited of late; and would have
done any thing, for pastimeI consented to exchange
a few shot. The man was exceedingly importunate
and I thought it a pity to trouble him to call again;
so I took one of his pistols, as I sathe on one side of
that table, I on the other, just as I am now, for I had
begun
to turn inand my coat being too tight for me, had
thrown it off.'
`Poor fellow!' said Archibald.
`Yespoor fellow!' echoed Copely, in the same tone.
`It was a great pity that he calledI told him so.'
I left the room in horrourwent to my bed, and
soon fell into a troubled, disorderly dreaming, that shook
and wasted me like a long illness. Let me attempt
some description of it
some
only; for it would be
impossible, by any power of language, to give a
faithful
one.
I was asleep. At dead of midnight, I heard a trumpet,
as I thought, sounding to battle. I arose, pained and
dizzy,unwilling to go outand desirous to skulk, if
I could, into the holes of the rocks. Then I thought
that it began to rain fire upon me; and the earth shook,
and battalions of men, armed all over in shining mail,
spattered with blood, came, parading, column after
column, from the earthnation after nationeach of
loftier, and yet loftier stature still, -warlikeand
terrible, like the buried Apostles of liberty: and then,
all at once, there was a tremendous explosion, and I
felt myself sinking in a swampthe loose earth
quivering
like jelly, at every tread, and cold serpents and
bloated toads all slipping about me, so thickly, that,
set my naked foot, wherever I would, something that
had life in itsome fat icy reptile would stir under the
pressureand then I was entangled in the thorny
creeping tendrils of many a plant that encumbered my
path; dead bodies lay in my way; I was pinioned hand
and foot, and serpents fed upon my blood, and vultures
flapped over me. And then, out of the east, there
blazed
,
all at once, a light, like a million of rockets, that
blinded me. And then, I felt a handthe hand of a
murderer about my throatGod!
that
could be no
dream, it was too distinct! Even in my sleep, I felt it,
and started broad awake. My heart stoppedstopped,
as if struck with death! a hand
was
upon my head!
feeling about my hair; as if to get a good hold. I
shudderedgasped`Archibald!' said I, `
dear
Archibald
!
(Archibald had been suspected of walking in his
sleep, since the death of Clinton.')
The blood rushed back to my heartI put out my
hands. They encountered a human creature.
`Archibald!' I repeated, with all my force.
No answer. `What art thou?' I cried, starting
up, and putting out my hands toward a hideous shape,
that sat on the table near me, with its long legs
swinging
carelessly under it, and creaking like the joints of a
gibbeted man.
I heard something rattle on the floor. It was a large
knife. The lamp gleaned upon the blade, as the
creature
stooped to pick it up.
I was desperate now. I threw myself upon it, in
silence; and, after a struggle, in which I, who could
have torn a wild beast, limb from limb, had well nigh
been masteredI said to it.
`What the devil are you?'
`Nick Sampson,' he replied.
`Nick Sampson! what business have you here!
How is Ellen?'
`Dying. You have broken her heart. I came to
kill youbut I could not. You were sleeping. That
saved you.'
Judge of my feelings. They were unutterable. It
was a long time before I was able to speak, while the
shapeless wretch sat before me, like a coiled reptile,
his, small bright eyes glittering under his heavy
eyebrows
,
as if he were hardly satisfied with his own
clemency
.
At last, however, a new feeling took possession of
me. My horrour and affright had gone; and my eyes were
already running along the bright blade of the knife,
and glancing at the door, with thoughts, that even now
I shudder at. He certainly understood me, for he
addressed me abruptly, thus.
`You had better not.'
The sound of his voice scared the demon away. A
rush of humanity and gratitude came back to me,
flooding my heart, with a gentle warmth, like new
milkthe weapon fell from my hand.
`How came you here, Sampson?' said I.
`By dodging the sentinels.'
`What! to night! they are doubled, and very
vigilant
.'
`Vigilant!' I found one asleep. And the other I
passed in his own shadow.
`And how is Ellen?'
`Ellen,' his eye snapping fire---`Ellen! washing her
heart away with her own tears!'
`God bless her!'
`What, Oadley, what! do you really pity poor Ellen
---really? or (menacing me) are you---damn it, you
cannot be such a villian---are you mocking me, or not?'
`No,' said I, amazed at his look and manner.
`No!'
`But where is she? how is her health?'
`I've told you, the sap of her heart is running to
waste; she has cried herself blind.'
VOL. II. 6
CHAPTER IV.
`I've loved to hear the war horn's cry;
`And panted at the drum's deep roll;
`And held my breath, when, flaming high,
`I've seen our starry banners fly,
`As, challenging the haughty sky,
`They stirred the battle in my soul.'
Nicholas
left me, as he came, abruptly, and in the
darkness; and I was awakened the next morning by
the sound of Jasper's voice at my door.
`We have taken a devil!' he cried; `please to turn
out. He swears to your acquaintance. Halloo, there!'
I leaped off the chest where I slept, and found poor
Nicholas in the hands of two of our troop, who were
menacing him with their sabres, at every flourish of
which, he duckedless in fear, than surprise, I thought.
His countenance was so expressive, so ludicrously
expressive
,
that I was fain to laugh.
`Run him up,' cried Jasper`run him up, directly;
the Lieutenant does'nt know him.'
`I know that,' said the other`and I've a mind to
do it.'
`What has the poor creature done?' said I.
`Knocked up the finest stallion in the troop,' said
Jasper.
`How, pray?'
`By running him out, fairly out o' wind.'
`Be kind enough to tell me, so that I can
understand
you,' said I.
`Well, Sir,' said Jasper, his red, honest face shining
as if basted in blood gravy`I was out near the north
battery, just one hour before day light. Simpson,
Hodgers, and two or three more of our fellows, were
sleeping at the guard houseour horses saddled and
bridled, just by. Suddenly, I heard a shot`Halloa!'
I criedfor the round dozen that Corporal Capen had,
for sleeping on his post t'other night, had made our
men more wakeful`Halloa,' said I, running out,
`who goes there?' Nobody answered me; but I saw a
black shadow running, like a rabbit, along the ground;
and then, a shower of bullets was sent after him
damn it, don't laugh, beast; I'll stop your grinning.
So, I jumped a-straddle, leaped the ditch, and rode
after him; Bill backed the stallion, and run him till he
slipped his wind, while that devil there kept leaping
the ditch, for half an hour, with one of us after him, first
one side and then the other. Shall we hang him?'
I laughed at the impudence of the fellow, for daring
to play such pranks in my presenceand sent him off.
`Where were you going?' said I, to young Nick, as
soon as we were left alone.
`Home.'
`Suppose you enlist.'
`I will,' he answered, `as soon as I have seen Nell,
and said good bye'(striking his hands together, with
a report that made me startit was like a pistol.)
`Surely,' said I, looking at himand wondering at
the expression of his face. It was lighted up, and he
stood taller, by many inches than I had ever seen him!
`Surely, you are not afflicted with ambition?'
`Ambition?what the devil's that?'
`It is that,' said I, my chest heaving as I spoke
`it is that which dilates the heart, distends all the
arteries, lightens and animates, and'
`Ha! ha! ha! No I've nothing of
that
. I have
no desire to wear a beautiful jacket, or ride a handsome
horsewould as soon taste blood in the ranks; nay,
sooner, for there I should wade in it, as to drive my
horse through it, fetlock deep. No but'here was
another outbreaking of brightness from his whole face,
`I am an American, a worthless, abandoned one, a
wicked fellow, and willing to die, if it please God,
a better man than I have lived.I love the trumpet.
My heart bustles strangely when I hear it splitting
away in the wind. The drum sets all my blood
bubbling
.
And the new standardlord! I could look at
it, forever! the cannon too, and the smoke and
O, I would die, willingly, if I might be where such
things are to be seen continually.'
I looked at the creature in astonishment. `Surely,'
said I, inwardly, and shuddering at the deep sanguinary
hue of his lips, that quivered as he spoke`surely, the
appetite for blood is natural to us all
He!
Oh, men
have understood it well;
he
cannot withstand the
prompting of a wayward spiritthe fierce instinct
though it cometh not to him, with the bright beckoning
of a woman mailed, as it does to menor with a
countenance
of dominion. There is no command for him,
no hope, nothing but derision and mockery; yet, for the
pleasure of dabbling in human blood, and watching the
red issue of broken hearts
he
is willing to put body
and soul in jeopardy.'
`Whywhat the devil have you there?' cried
Archibald
,
coming up.
I told him, as well as I could, all that I knew of the
matter; and in return, asked him how Copely was.
`Bad enough,' he repliedhis left arm shattered
under arrest. Andpoor Chester!'
`Chester,' said I. `Who is he?'
`Chester Copely,' was the reply.
`I thought his name was Charles.'
`So did I, till this morning, when I saw it written
at length. He always writes C. Copely, and that is
the reason, I suppose, for I never asked, that we have
always supposed his name to be Charles.'
`There seems to be a great bustle in camp,' said I.
`Does the affair make such a noise?'
`O, nobut we are on the eve of something, I know
not whatah!'
A horseman here came up, saluted Archibald, and
informed him that the Commander in Chief was on
horseback, at the west battery (a little redoubt, hastily
thrown up) waiting for him.
His horse was brought out; and he set forward, a
minute or two ahead of me. When I arrived on the
ground, I saw him, bare headed, fronting the
commander
,
whose countenance was remarkably stern; but it
gradually changed, and just as I passed, I heard him
say. `There is your Commission Sir. I am glad to
find that you had no hand in this affair. It must be
put a stop to. You are brevetted for the present.'
From that moment, Archibald was a Major. `I am
afraid,' said he, falteringand I stopped my horse,
immediately, that I might not lose a word`thatthat
I am not altogether blameless. YetI was not
present.'
`Enough,' said Washington. `Keep in your
saddle
from ten this morning. We shall have work for
yo before night.'
Archibald joined me, with a countenance particularly
thoughtful and solemn.
`What is the matter?' said I.
`I am a Major,' he replied.
`And does that make you sorrowful?'
`YesI do not deserve it. Many a better man will
be under my commandmany a better
man;
and I am
but a boy.'
`But you
can
deserve it.'
`Yes! that is trueand I will, or die. I will not
be in the way of any man that deserves it better.'
`Are we to do any thing?'
`Yesdid you see the general's face?'
`See it!' said I`yes, and shook all over, as I
did see it. How preternaturally dark it was.'
`Very,' he replied, `
very
. It bodes another Trenton
visitation, I am apt to think. But hushLet us be
wary.'
Washington passed us again now, at a slow, warlike
movement, his tall martial person habited in a uniform,
which I will try to describe:the waiscoat was buff,
plain buff, without an atom of gold about it, very long,
VOL. II. 6*
and opening at the bottom, with flaps; the coat, what
we call a French blue, rather worn and dusty,
exceedingly
tight in the arms and open always;breeches
buff, and boots in the clumsy fashion of the day,
reaching
to the kneesbut without any expression: the
whole costume wearing the look of what is meant
for service, rather than parade. As he passed us, he
uncovered to our general salution, with a dignity and
plainness that I never saw equalled. But do what he
wouldhe was always George Washingtonfull of
beautiful simplicity and power.
In two hours more, we were in motion, under
himself
in person, and advanced to Skippack creek, where
we encamped. It was about sixteen miles from
Germantown
,
where the main body of the enemy lay;
Cornwallis having followed Howe to Philadelphia.
Lord Howe had gone round from the Chesapeake, to
cooperate
with his brother, in reducing the forts upon
Mud Island, and Red Bank, in and upon the
Delaware
.
Washington was constantly in the saddleand the
whole army in a state of fiery excitement, from the
news that came in every day, respecting the operations
at the north against Burgoyne, who was already in a
most critical situation. By the way, I forgot to
mention
in the proper place, that we sustained a severe loss
a few nights before this movement, by General Wayne's
suffering himself to be surprised, and then, most
unluckily
,
parading his men in front of their fires, so that
every shot toldwe lost nearly three hundred of our
best troops, bayonetted on the spot.
On the third of October, we were handsomely
reinforced
,
and Washington led us against the enemy at
Germantown, rationally supposing that the
contemplated
operations upon fort Mifflin, and Red Bank, would
leave the enemy's main body considerably weakened at
Germantown.
The enemy were pitched about the centre of the town.
His left on the Schuylkill; covered by the chasseurs;
the right handsomely protected, stretching far out to
the westwith a battalion in front, occupying
chesnut
hill.
Our plan was too complicatedthe ground was
broken
up by enclosures; a heavy fog covered the whole
ground, which was exceedingly unevenand we could
not see a pistol-shot from our horses heads. And, from
the time we entered the field, leaning about in a most
disorderly manner, until we heard Pulaski raging like
a devil all about us, leaping heages and ditches, and
calling out
the day is our own! the day is our own!
I had not seen, or heard any thing of Archibald or
Arthur
.
But in five minutes more, they had both passed
me, erect on their saddles, and shouting to us, that the
horse of the enemy, (a squadron under Cornwallis, just
arrived for Philadelphia,) were riding Greene down.
At the time, we knew little of what was going forward.
Again and again, were we utterly lost, in the heavy
fog, mistaking our own party for the enemy, and
being
mistaken in our turn. A tremendous firing was
kept up, it appeared, at every corner of the heavens
a part of both armies had fallen into each others hands;
and, but for the abominable delay at a stone house (into
which Col. Margrave, threw himself in the heat of the
battle, checking our main body, and holding out till all
the enemy were upon us,) we should have given a good
account of the day's work, I believe. But, be that
as it will, we were in time to cover the retreat of our
armyexchange some cuts with Cornwallis' horse;
and hold him in check, till Steven's artillery opened
upon them, with a destruction like that which fell upon
Sodom and Gommorahbreaking through whole ranks
at every discharge, and blowing platoon after platoon
into the airman and horse. The Marylanders under
Conway, (forming a part of Sullivan's division) fought
like so many armed knights.
Archibald got a cut over the left temple, which soon
healed; but neither Pulaski, nor Arthur, nor myself,
was wounded, though I had my bear skin cap, riddled
like a honeycomb; and my horse was bayonetted in
three places; and Arthur had stirrup and bridle shot
away. Yet, I saw Pulaski cleave one fellow to the
chine, at the moment it appeared to me, that a pistol
was fired into his very face and eyes. I looked a moment
though I was hotly engaged with two good swordsmen,
in the expectation of seeing him fall; but, in a
twinkling
,
he was out of sight, his blade rattling like hail,
about the bayonets that hedged him in, as he passed in
a circle of incessant fire, giving point and edge, at the
same moment. He had a horse killed under him; but
immediately brought down his antagonist from the
saddle
,
mounted
his
horse, and rejoined his men.
And here, I cannot forget to mention, that, a long
time after the battle, Archibald and I rode over the
ground again, step by step, each pointing out to the
other, the spot where every vicissitude and accident
had occurred to himself. I remember too, as if it were
but yesterday, his pointing out the window at the left
wing of
Chew's house
, which a spirited young officer,
under the very eye of Washington, attempted to set
fire to; and the very tree, under which he died a few
moments after the attempt. The window is yet
shattered
and blackened with the attempt, and the walls
are indented and bruised, all about, with the idle
cannonading
of our light artillery; and a friend of mine
lately informed me of a remarkable fact, which has
escaped
the notice of all of our historians; and which,
had it been known at the time, might have changed the
issue of the day. When Washington ordered up the
field pieces, and they had began to play upon the house,
(which is built of a very solid, heavy stone) he went a
little in advance, to reconnoitre; and, owing to the fog
and smoke, was deceived into a belief, that one of the
back buildings, connected with the house, had been
changed since he had seen it, (for he had been perfectly
acquainted with the house and family,) and deliberately
fortified. The building, even yet, has a formidable
appearance
,
and I can readily conceive, that a military
man might hesitate a good while, before he would
attempt
to storm it, while seen through a mist. By this
appearance Washington was prevented from attempting
to carry it in the rear, by which he would
undoubtedly
,
have succeeded, for
there
were all its weak points,
there
was it most accessible, and
there
, least capable
of defence. But to return.
After this battle, we returned to Skippack and
encamped
;
lying, literally upon our arms, until the
news of Burgoyne's surrender came upon us like a clap
of thunder. I was not ten feet from Washington, when
the officer, covered with dust and froth, handed him a
letterexclaiming, at the same time`Burgoyne
and his whole army have surrendered!' The news
went, like a peal of electricity through the camp.
`
Hourra! Hourra! Hourra!
' exclaimed the men
running
together in all directions.
`
Hourra! Hourra! Hourra!
' shouted the officers,
utterly
forgetful of Washington's presence.
But II could neither speak nor breathe, nor take
off my eyes from his face.
He read the whole letter throughturned it over in
his handlooked at the dateasked a question or two,
as if taught by experience, that good news were not
lightly to be depended upon.But when it was all
confirmed
all!
I thought, for a moment, that he would
have fallen from his horse. A mighty paleness
overspread
his whole facelike moonlight over Roman
sculpture. His great heart labouredhis lip worked
his chest heaved; he turned up his clear eyes to
Godgave his hand to the messenger; who looked as
if he could have fallen upon his face, and lain there for
Washington to drive his white charger over; and then
dismounted, and withdrew,
alone
all, all
alone
to his
tent. I am sure that it was to go down upon his knees
yes! I am sure of it; and every man that saw his
troubled portthe august, patient tread of the hero, as
he bowed his great forehead again, uncovered as it was,
and walked away, felt as I did, that Washington had
gone to prayer. It was a whole hour before a living
man approached him. Who would have dared?
who!
to obtrude upon George Washington, while in
conversation
with Jehovah?
I will not stop to relate what I was not an eye
witness
ofthe operations upon the Delaware.You will
find the story well told in every history, upon which
you can lay your hand: but keep upon the track that I
have chosen.
One thing I had forgotten. Young Sampson had
remained
with us; and it was said by a Virginian, though
I did not see him, fought like `a ring-tailed panther,'
in the battle. All that I know is, that he was taken
prisoner, as he said, once or twice, that night; and
esaped as often, with the blood of his captor, and his
spoils into the bargain. To my knowledge, he had
three handsome watches, and some gold, when he
returned
to the camp; and was smeared and soaked in
human blood: nay, his very hair was stiffened with it;
and for a week afterwards, the snow where his head
lay, would be soiled with crimson, though I made him
wash it twenty times at least. Yet, I doubt, if any of
it was unfairly shed; unfairly, I mean, after the
usages
of war. His face was blacked and scorched with
gunpowder, and he was nearly blind for a time; and
his eye-lashes, were singed off. But he was not
otherwise
injured than by a bruise in the side, as he said,
from a regiment of horse running over him.
`With gun carriages at their heels, I dare say,'
added Copely, who heard him account for it.
Copely was now able to attend to duty again, and
went about it with the same unaltered fronta little
paler, and perhaps a little calmer than usualwith his
arm in a sling.
Our condition, at this time, was deplorable beyond all
belief. Several thousand of our troops had not a
blanket to wrap themselves in, though the winter had
now set in, with unparalleled severity: a large
portion
were without breeches, shoes or stockings.
We
had exhausted all our money, and creditand were,
for a time, hardly less ragged than our men.
On the fourth of December, Sir William Howe
advanced
upon us, in power, as if determined to
exasperate
us, naked and suffering as we were, to a rash
engagement
,
that we might go into winter quarters with
a tolerable feeling of security. But, after
manuvering
several days in beautiful style, performing some of
his evolutions within reach of our cannon,
he
, quietly,
like the king of France, with twenty thousand men,
marched up the hill, and then, marched down again.
Our whole army were struck with astonishment;
and Washington, not less than his troops. What could
have led to such an unequivocal avowal of Sir William's
respect, it would be difficult to say; but, we ought not
to forget, that we were altogether his inferiours in every
respect at the time; and, that every man in our army,
felt the retreat of Sir William, as if we had obtained a
victory over him.
On the eleventh, we began a movement in search of
winter quarters; and, finally pitched upon
Valley
Forge
, a place about sixteen miles from Philadelphia.
We arrived there on the sixteenth; and here let me
pause. Here began our severest sufferings. Men may
talk of their Romans, and their Greeks: of armies,
that have perished in their own blood; cities in their
smoke; martyrs and apostles to liberty, chanting
their own death song. I have been in battle many times,
by night and by day: I have been willing to spend my
whole life in it; I have been wrapped in smoke and
blaze; stunned, for hours together, with the noise of
cannon; and blinded, for whole days, with the flash of
musketry: yet, so help me God, I could spend a long
life, in one uninterrupted battle, with less suffering,
than I  (and my care was nothing to that of some
others,) than I spent that winter at Valley Forge. Our
poor fellows were barefooted, as I have told you;
naked
and starving. As I am a living man, in the
presence
of my Maker, I declare to you, that I have seen
the dark, swollen, discoloured and lacerated feet of a
whole company, frozen to the ground, in their own
blood, when we halted for ten minutes. I remember it
well; it is no exaggeration. There were not ten men
among them, who had either stockings or shoes; and
when they put their bruised soles to the earth, the blood
gushed out as from a trodden spunge, so swollen and
bloated were they. But why dwell upon it!
why?
Because, since the creation of this world, there never
was an army that endured so much, so patiently.
Greeks and Romans! blisters on the American tongue,
that shall dare to name them in comparison with our poor
fellows! every foot fall was martyrdom; and when the
winds blew, and the storm beatand the fine snow
drifted over them, as they lay, shivering and naked,
upon their pallets; their stout hearts were never heard
to complain. No! they lived, while they could; and,
when they could live no longerthey
died
in silence.
I have seen many a stout fellow; but one, I
particularly
remember, frozen hand and feet, chafing his purple
limbs, for whole hours together, without uttering one
word of sorrow or complaint. We made a town of
log-huts
,
at the suggestion of our commander; kept
constantly
in motion; and were all inoculated with the
small-pox: and this, in the very face of our enemy!
For whole days, we were without a mouthful of bread;
though our foraging parties, were all sent abroad, in
every direction, to sieze and appropriate clothing and
food: yet, were we without either, owing to the
mismanagement
of Congressalways interfering,
whenever
it was possible to make mischief. You would not
wonder at my indignation, if you had seen a thousandth
part of the suffering that I did, for the want of articles,
that were actually lying about the country, purchased
and paid for, and rotting in the woods. Ibut,
no
, I
cannot trust myself to do more than relate two or three
simple facts. When we were eight thousand strong,
we were obliged to report three thousand unfit for
duty
,
on account of their nakedness; and this number was
continually augmenting, till the greater part of the
army were obliged to sit up, all night long, before the
fire, smothered and blinded with smoke, instead of
sleeping quietly, for they had no clothes to cover them.
When we were prisoners too; but nothat ought to be
a prohibited theme to a man of my passion. Great
Britain dealt with us like a destroyer; but we must try
to forget it. Thank God! and I
do
thank God for it,
I was never their prisoner. But I have seen them
that wereand Archibald, I remember, after his
escape
.
He never recovered from it. `They have
poisoned
me,' he cried, `I have seen powdered glass in
the wretched food that they gave me, on board the
Jersey prison-ship. It was a slaughter-house; and
the water grew black about her, as if with the plague,
choaked up with human bodies.' This was all that he
said. But he never forgot or forgave it; and, to my
knowledge, exacted a fearful retribution for it. He
was squalid and filthy, I have been told, beyond all
expression
,
when he returned; but there was blood
encrusted
upon his face.
One
of his keepers had given
up the ghost for his insult and cruelty; and Archibald
burst his chains at the same moment.
Follow me; a few steps will bring us to the opening
of a new campaign. France had joined us. Gates,
I believe, was at the bottom of a conspiracy to supplant
Washington. Pulaski was appointed to a legion of
horse, with the rank of major-general. Archibald's
brevet was confirmed; Arthur was promoted to a
captainship
;
Copely to a lieutenant colonelship in the
infantry
,
and II remained a captain.
We had now been nearly two years in actual warfare.
Neither Archibald nor I, had seen our mother for
fifteen
months, though we frequently heard from her; and
he, I suspected at the time, more frequently than ever.
But at last, on the arrival of Sir Henry Clinton to
supersede Howeand the evacuation of Philadelphia;
we heard that Mr. Arnauld had removed to that city.
My heart throbbed mightily, when I heard of it. I
longed to fall in their way, (
her
way, I ought to say,)
by
accident:
and yet, there was the sunny-haired
Ellenour
;
how should I meet her? I trembled at the
thought.
VOL. II. 7
Washington called a council of war, and proposed
giving Clinton battle in his retreat; but, unluckily
was overruled. So thatallow me to say, that there
was a battle fought, called the battle of Monmouth, in
which, I received a wound, that cost me my leg
afterward
;and
that Arthur particularly distinguished
himself
in it. This is all that I know of the affair.
Archibald
used to contract his forehead, when I spoke of it,
saying, that `it was a hard fought, desperate, and
unnecessary
battle.' He had began to study the scene
of war at the time: I had made considerable progress
in it. `It would never have been fought.' said he,
`had not Washington forgot himself, in his
exasperation
with Lee. And Leeby heaven, he is an injured
man! rash and haughty as he is. He was brave and
skillful; and the court-martial, with Lord Sterling the
president, were all a pack of blunderheads, or
something
worse, for suspending him.'
CHAPTER V.
`Grim visaged War has smoothed his iron front.'
Nearly
three years had now passed in war and trial.
It was time to repose awhile. The French fleet had
arrived. The war upon the ocean began to break out
in bright spots, like volcanoes, here and there. Sir
William Howe had moved off to the south; and was
battling in Georgia. We had little to do; except to
plan small enterprizes for our out-posts to execute.
Our mother had rebuilt a house upon the ruins of our
old mansion, under the superintendance of an old
servant
;
and Arthur had begun to think seriously of
making himself happy, while it was possible for him to
be so.
`Where now brother?' said I, seeing him on a new
sorrel charger, caparisoned in beautiful style, and
Copely
on a large white horse with a black mane and tail,
at his side, `
where now?
'
`To Philadelphia,' he replied.
I felt oddly about the head, but I couldn't speak.
`Will you join us? there is a furlough,' (handing
me one.) `Bless my soul! brother! hey! what!
woa!'
I staggered against his horse.
`Yes,' said I, `yes! happen what will
yes!
'
`To horse! to horse!' said Copely, dashing out,
impatiently
,
to the right; to which I replied, in five
minutes
from the time of notice, by galloping along side of
him, on my noble racer.
`Upon my word, cousin!' cried Arthur, (his
handsome
eyes breaking out into light.) `You have not
been so much yourself since, whoa!since we
manuvered
in the snow, on the night ofof'
`No more,' said Archibald, clapping spurs to his
horse, `we shall expect
you
.'
`Aye! aye!' was the reply; and we instantly set
forward at a brisk trot.
For some miles, not a word was spoken: for my
part, I could not speak; my heart was too full; and
as for Archibald, there was a look of deadly faintness,
every now and then, in his face, which took away from
me all power of questioning him. But Copely rode
onward, with the same countenance; his left arm, yet
stiff from the shattering that Ellis had given it; and
his head turned, with that peculiar cast, on one
shoulder
,
which, unless I had known that it proceeded from a
sabre cut, I should have called affectationsomething
of the arrogant and lordly, worn because it fitted the
turn of his chest and fashion of his face: and it
did
fit
both; no man ever lived, on whom the patrician sat
better than on Chester Copely. He looked not only as
if born to dominion, but, as if dominion had been
familiar
with him from his boyhood; not the dominion of
a Persian satrap, peevish and effeminate; nor that of
a lazy bashaw; nor that of an English aristocrat,
spiteful and jealous of all encroachment, yet wanting
the manhood to resent or resist it: No! but it was
that of one who would look a giant in the face, without
winking, and tell him, in a slow voice, `
Beware! the
boy is already born, that shall break your sceptre!
' Nay,
that boy was born; allow me to digress for a moment.
I think I can see him now, with his high forehead
partitioned
all over with swelling veins, half as large as
your little finger, a little bald; just as he sat and
looked
but a few years ago, long after the revolution; when
I saw him in conversation with Aaron Burr, the C
sar of Americathe most astonishing and dangerous
man of his age; a man that infused his own
rebellious
and fiery spirit into every thing, material or
immaterial
,
with which he came in contact; a man, who
went about working treason, tampering with the
bravest
and stoutest hearts of all our countryin the light
of heaven, with an audacity unlike any thing, ever seen
before in the history of disaffection; setting our laws at
defiancemocking at our strengthdoing that, which,
now he has failed in it, has been called madness; yet,
for which, all the talent, and learning, and power of the
country, were unable to punish him! a man, that
poured his spirit of revolt, like a flood of fire, into
every
heart that he came neardisturbing the oldest and
most cautious of our veterans; one, that
seemed
to put
himself, life and name, into the power of every human
creature that he approached; yet, with all this
seeming
,
was he never in the power of mortal man, (as
Wilkinson
and Eaton can show;) a man, that suffered the
legal
wisdom of the whole country to array itself against
himwithout tremblingand then, just put out enough
of his own strength, and no more, (wasting no jot or
title of his power,) to defeat and shame them. O, it
was miraculous! and, since the time of the Roman,
there has never beena man upon this earth so like
Julius
Csar, as was Aaron Burr. Why did he not
succeed
?
is the question with me; not, as it is with the
deeper politicians of the age; why did he
attempt
it. The plan is deeper than is knownhis resources
greater. Aaron Burr was never the man to hazard
all for nothing: a step more, and Mexico had been
his; and
then
, who would have staid the conqueror?
Where could you have entrenched yourselves? In no
other place, and by no other means, than by
encompassing
yourselves round about, with a wall of fire. You
musthave had swords passing forever about youand
artillery roaring night and day. Aye, one blow! and
we, who now laugh the threat to scorn, would have
seen
the president of these United States, the congress, and
all others in authority, driven into the Potomac.
But enough. Let us thank God, that a soldier, and a
despot was blasted when he was; and not believe as we
are apt to, that we are inaccessable. Yes, I can see
Chester Copely nowat this moment, as plainly as if
he were before me; his bald head leaning upon his
VOL. II. 7*
handshis grey eyes rivetted upon the tempterwho
sat, pouring his deep,
deep
eloquence into his heart, so
naturally, with such an air of beautiful simplicity,
that, when it was over, Copely said to him, `You are
a traitor, Aaron Burr; and I do not wonder that all,
who listen to you, are traitors.'
Perhaps(will you pardon me for a moment?) I
would give you some notion of the artful, terrible
insinuation
of Aaron Burr. We had been speaking of
the danger to be apprehended from the continual
enlargement
of our territory. I knew Burr's aim.
Copely knew it. Both of us would have slain the man
who should have dared to propose a dismemberment,
directly; yet, before Aaron Burr had done, we were
readyor at least I wasto draw my sword for him.
Gracious heaven! what attitude and dominion are
given to eloquence! He first remarked that we were
already too large;and, after some argument, we
assented
to it.
`Where are the thirteen states now?' said Burr
`Look at the map. Look at their territory. They are
a spot only in our empire. A few years, and they will
be crushed. Of themselves in their integrity, they are
invincible. But lengthen the sceptre, and you weaken
it,at the same time that you render it more
unmanageable
.
It is not only weaker, but more difficult to
be wielded.'
`True,' said Iand Copely nodded an assent.
`Well then,' said Burr`
when
shall we stop?
where
shall we stop? Are we not already too large?where
is the profit of these new states? There is none. It
costs more to govern them, than we obtain from them,
even in peace. How shall we protect them in war?
Are they not too large?'
We assented; for, how could we help it?
`Would it not be better then,' said he(remember
that I am giving you only the sum of his process
the detail, I am unequal to)`if it might be amicably
done, to retrench our dominion; to separatecontract
our strength, and draw in our resources to the limits of
our ancient empirethe thirteen confederate states?'
`Certainly,' said I`if it could be done
amicably
.'
`And give them the power of constituting a
government
for themselves? them that have joined us, I
mean?' said Copely, moving his head thoughtfully.
`Yes,' said Burr. `Yes. If we withdrawwe
must leave them to build a government for themselves.
Let that be what it may, we should always be too
formidable for them.'
`Suppose then, that they should
wish
to separate,'
he continued, after a slight pause, as if collecting all
the dark subtilty of his mind, for that special occasion
`would you oppose them?'
We were silent for some moments. `I think not,'
said Copely.
`But suppose, that
we
wished itno matter for
what reason,' said Burr`and that
they
opposed it,
which side would you take?'
`That of manhood and reason,' said Copely`cut
them off, as I would a withered or rotten member, if
the health of the heart were endangered.'
`And who shall determine for us?' said Burrin a
deep, thoughtful voice.
`Congress,' said Copely.
Burr shook his head, with a mockery and scorn, that
no mortal man could have withstood.
`Congress!' said he. `They have not the power.
It is the people.'
`Men!' He rose from his seat. `
Men
! You love
your country. So do I. You have fought her battles.
So have I. You would die for her. So would I. You
would risk life and limb; nay, reputation for her. You
admit that our country is too large; that it would be
wise to retrench it. You say that you would assist in
doing so, if the excess were to desire it? or if our own
original states should deserve it. This is enough.
The salvation of your country is in your own keeping;
we must pass a two edged sword round about her
we must lop off, without mercy, the diseased and
exhausting
members?
They
wish it;
we
wish it. All
the wise and good know it. Then why wait for the
steady movement and legislation of'
`Aaron Burr!' said Copely, rising, and facing the
Arch-traitor, with the air of one that could take away
his breath at a word. `I wonder at your power. I
shudder at your disposition. You are a traitor, Burr;
and he that listens to you, will be
must be
, a traitor;
nay,
is
, if he do not silence you. To night, you are
under the protection of my roof. To-morrowmark
me
to-morrow
, we are enemies. Good night!'
He left the roomand I followed him, as he said
these words, leaving Burr, like the enmeshed Lion,
snared in his strong holdwith his dark eyes sternly
rivetted upon the door, through which Copely had
passed; his right hand thrust up to the elbow, into his
bosom; the left, clenched, and resting, motionless,
upon the table. I shook as I saw him. Was
he
baffled?
or were
we?
It were hard to tell.
He
was the least
moved of the three.
Copely had known him twenty years before,
intimately
,
I believe; but, now, he cut him away, with one
blow, from his heart, as if he had been something deadly
and hateful; vegetation, sprouting in its heatverdant,
with the verdure of a stagnant poolbright, with the
brightness, only of corruption. But let me returnto
the revolution.
`Are you much acquainted in the city,' said Copely
to Archibaldas they rode on, toward Philadelphia.
`NoI was never there but once,' was the reply.
`Ah!' exclaimed Copely, contracting his forehead.
`But your brotherhe has been there more than
once.'
There was something in his manner, that I never
liked; but his way of saying this, was inexpressibly
provoking to me.
`Yes, Sir,' said I, riding up to him, and putting my
hand upon his horse's manelooking him steadily in
the face, all the time`Yes Sir! his
brother
has been
there,
more
than once.'
`Twice, I believe,' said the imperetrable being.
`Oh, you colour,' said Archibald, smiling`what
is the meaning of this?'
`He can answer you best,' said Copely, reining up,
to let me pass him. `I leave it to him.'
I was exceedingly nettled at this manner of
proceeding
;
it was too haughty, cold and forbidding.
`Sir,' said I.
`Nonsense, brother,' cried Archibald, leaping
between
us. `I will have no quarrelling, where I am.
You are enemies to each other, from ignorance. I
would have taken some pains, before, to reconcile you;
but I knew that it would be a troublesome affair; and,
as you could not often meet, I have put it off. You
know me, Chester; and you too, brother. Each had
cause enough, if he could read the others heart, to cut
his throat. But, both are mistaken in the origin of the
feud. Shake hands like men. Let us jog on quietly to
the city; and, I hold myself pledged, when I return,
to make you love each other, more heartily than either
of you now love me. What say you? are you the men
to forbear for three or four days?'
Copely stopped short, in the middle of the road;
looked at my brother; and then, at me, for several
momentsas ifthough his countenance changed not
and my heart, upon my word, felt, as if it had been
drifting about in a cold rain, for a week, drenched and
soaked throughchilled. At last, he deliberately drew
off his glove.
`Oadley,' said he, giving me his hand. `I have
wronged you. There is my hand; I believe you brother.
It is
his
fault, that we have not been friends before;
had he defended you, ever before, as he has, now, I
should have been a different man toward you?'
I took his hand, wondering what he meant, yet(I
cannot deny it), gratified, to the very heart, with the
proud, frank courage of the man.
`I do not ask you,' said I, `what are the
circumstances
to which you allude, now'
`I observe it,' said he.
Archibald smiled, and stooped over his horse's neck
to conceal it.
`But,' continued Copely. `I must tell you what
they are. Ride on Major, ride on; we will overtake
you, in a few minutes.'
Archibald threw up, in a fine martial style, and
cantered
ahead.
`You were once rather intimate with a woman.'
My heart was in my throat.
`For, a woman she was, even at the age of childhood
a passionate, enthusiastick creature, ain short,
you knew Ellen Sampson.'
I had expected another name; and felt, with a bitter
disappointment, a deadly sickness at the heart.
`You look very pale,' said hein the same tone of
voice. `Do you know what has become of her?'
`No,' I replied. `For a year, I have not heard.'
`Should you desire to know?'
I bowed.
`And of her brotherfather?'
`Yes,' I replied, wondering at the minutenessand
emphasis of his enquiry.
`He isthe brother, I meana wanderer;his
sister is dying of a broken heart; the father is ready
to dip his hands in
your
blood, wherever he can meet
youand'
`Heaven and earth!' I cried, in unaffected
astonishment
,
`what have I done, to merit this!'
`What
done!
Look at me Oadley, stately and
cold as you arehonest, as you
appear
to behave
you not broken the heart of one proud girl
wantonly
,
and like a childvisited anotherI do not ask
you how, nor wherewith.'
There was a pause(of deep
emotion
, I should have
saidbut for the nature of the man.) In another it
would have been emotion. In him it was not.
`Ellen Sampson is my half cousin. You are
startled
.
I doomed you to death, before I had seen you;
I came to your tent. I would have slain you; but a
similarity of manner led me to make the attempt upon
ArchibaldI attacked him with a sword.'
`Gracious God!' I criedlooking at the man, in
amazement.
`Yes,' he continued. `I had never seen either of
you, I had heard only the name. I rode to your
quarters
.
I belonged to Gates' army, and left it early
when Morgan arrived, in consequence of a quarrel
with Arnold; and it was
then
, that I heard of Ellen's
shame.'
`Her
shame!
what mean you? As I live,
Copely
,
there is some mistake in this.'
`Silence!' said he, `hear me out. I left the
Northern
armycame heresought out your brotherled
him abroad, one clear star light eveninginsulted
himfought, and was disabled; nay, should have been
slain, had not an accidental interference given me time
to discover that I was mistaken in him; and, at the
same time, to show him that the lady, of whom I had
been speaking, was
not
, as he had misunderstood me to
mean, Miss Arnauld.'
`
Miss
Arnauld?' said I faintly.
`NoMiss Lucia Arnauld'he replied. `This led
to an explanation; we agreed not to mention the affair;
and your brother extorted a promise from me not to
assail
you, till I had given him notice. While I was
yet on the point of bringing the matter to an issue;
for it was enough to drive any man mad, who doated
on a woman, as I did on cousin Nell, to see her
wasting
away, like a struck flowerII(his voice
did
falter nowby heaven it did!)I saw Nick, a
desperate
creature, though one of the best hearted
monsters
,
in all this world, running about the camp. I
was a good deal alarmed; but, owing to an ugly affair
(raising his left arm, and compressing his lips, as if
with extreme pain) that had happened a few nights
before
I saw him, I was prevented from pursuing the
matterdo you know your brother?'
`I do not understand you,' said I.
`Is'nt he,' (laying his fore finger upon his forehead)
`a littlea very little touched here?don't smile.
I think so. I have asked him; but he denies it. I'll
tell you why I think so.'
`Why,' said Ipained by his strange levity, not of
manner, but of thought, inexpressibly pained`why.'
`In confidence then, I willYou do not know him
well. He is mad, very mad. He loves Lucia
Arnauld
;
rein up, will youwould you ride over him?
She loves him to death and distraction. Yethe set
my heart in such a blaze, that,' (he breathed very hard
for a while, and then continued) `I was fool enough to
hunt her up, and attemptaccursed driveller, that I
was!to win a way into her proud spirit.I
failed
.
She loves Archibaldand him only; and he, O,
that men will trample on what would give lustre and
fragrance to a death bed!he shuts up his eyes, and
turns his back upon herHey!prick uplet us
join. You know all.'
As he said this, he dashed along side of Archibald,
and left me to my meditations. My knee was quite
painfuland I felt unwilling to trot, until the pain
had subsided.
`
This
then,' said I, `is the secret; this accounts for
the mortal anxiety, that I have always felt in that man's
society. He was the messenger of evil to me; and my
soul cowered in his presence, instinctively.'
I looked at him. He sat his horse, just as he did
every thing else, like a creature of great strength,
slumbering in his own security. All that he did was
of the same character; if his hand fell upon yours
though by accident, you felt that, it wanted but the
will in him, to give it a momentum, that would have
crushed your's, bone and joint, so, when he spoke;
he opened his mouth, and his heart ran out, like a
current
dammed up,and ready, at his bidding, to waste
and thunder, like the spring tide, and swollen rivers of
our country, loaded with ice, and foam, and blackened
with wreck and ruin.
I looked at Archibaldand wondered at the great
manhood of his countenance. It wore yet all the fiery
intrepidity, but none of the sullenness or melancholy of
his youth. It was now the face of wisdom and deep
thought, sorrowful, dim, and lofty. His very port
too, diminutive as was his stature, had an indescribable
stateliness and majesty in it. It was difficult to
believe
,
when he was walking, or riding, that he was
only five feet six inches in height. Yet he was no
morethough tall men have stood like boys before
him. Nay, he was not yet twenty two; and there
was that in his eyes, (for calamity and thought are
severe chasteners), which a man of thirty, deeply tried
in the wisdom of the world, and wrenched again and
again, in its concussions, should not have been ashamed
of. In short, he was a lordly looking fellowfuller of
genius than Copely; but not so full of dominion. I
looked upon them, followed them, listened to them,
with pleasure: wondering, all the day long, at the
patience and greatness of Archibaldhis forbearance,
when assailedfirst in life, and then in love. This
accounted for their testimony; his distress, agony,
unutterable agony, when Copely returned unmarried.
I remember it all now; it rushed in upon me, like a
volume of pictured lighta vapour full of population,
loveliness, and variety. Nay, why not speak of
myself
?
I was no longer the same man. I was more
thoughtful, devout; and I
do
believe, a better man
now, than when I joined the army. Arthur had made
me so.
`We must throw off here, awhile,' said Copely,
turning, and calling to me, just as the evening wind
began to blow in our faces; while they turned aside from
the main road, and I followed.
`Are you for an adventure, brother,' said Archibald
turning about in the saddle, and leaning, with one
hand upon the cruppertill I had come up with him.
`With all my heart?' I replied. `What is it.'
`Hush! hush! walk your horses'said Copely, in
a whisper. `See to your arms. Follow me.'
VOL. II. 8
We did follow him, in a dead silence, for more
than an hour, through a wilderness of beauty and damp
greenness.
`Now! now,'he said, coming out, suddenly, upon
a circular, green, turf flat,while the stars broke
down upon us, all at once, as it appeared to me,
emerging
I suppose, from the darkness of the wood. `
Now!
tread softly.'
`There was an air of seriousness in his mannerand
yet, a dash of pleasantry. But Archibald looked
troubled
;
he did not understand it, I saw; and, when
Copely fired off a pistol, suddenly, as we sathe
started
,
as if it had gone through his head.
In two minutes however, a fowling piece (as I judged,
from the whistling sound), was fired at a great
distance
,
on some hill; and a horn or conch shell began
to wind, very pleasantly, upon the wind.
`Forward!' cried Copely, dashing over the green,
at full speed, with Archibald at his heels, `
forward
.'
We soon came to a beautiful farm house, built of
stone, substantial and large, with every room in it
lighted.
`Another wedding!' said I, carelessly, but with more
meaning than I was ready to avow.
Archibald dropped the reins, and tried to speak---I
saw that he did---for he caught Copely's arm; and,
after awhile, repeated it---as if---poor fellow---he knew
not what he said.
Copely threw himself from the saddle, fastened his
horse to part of a Virginia fence, projecting over a
ruinous stone wall, overgrown with coloured shrubbery;
and, motioning to us to follow his example, led us round
the dwelling, to a place where we could see, through a
fall of thick white curtains, and a half closed window
shutter, the motion and bustle of several persons;
women and children, as it appeared, by their shadow.
`Stop Copely,' said Archibald, grasping his arm
`what are you about? who are there? Have you any
surprise for us?'
`Yes,' he replied.
`What is it!' said Archibald.
`Follow me, and you shall see.' He tapped at the
door, which instantly opened, and, at the first step, a
young woman threw herself into his arms, sobbing and
clinging to him, like a delirious creature.
`O, Chester! Chester!' she cried.
I staggered at the sound. A sudden giddiness and
darkness rushed upon me; and Archibald, who stood
like a statue for a moment, caught my hands, in silence.
Just then, the fire flashed broadly out; and I saw
the yellow tresses of one that I knewbound up now,
like coiled gold, in a more womanly fashionand a
white forehead, transparent as the broad magnolia leaf,
resting against the bosom of Copely. I felt relieved
unaccountably relieved at the sight; for I knew not
what strange fancy had possessed me for a moment;
or, rather, I am ashamed to tell.
At that moment, another female passed me, as coming
from the open air. `O, no!' she articulated faintly
`he is
not
there.'
`Mary, dear Mary,' I cried,embracing the sweet
innocent. She
was
beautifulwith that patient, lovely,
humble loveliness, which awes the stern man.
`Archibald,' she cried, breaking away from me.
`O, Archibald, we have not met sincesince'she
could not utter another wordshe was choking.
`No, dear Mary,' he answered, pressing her
wet forehead, with his lips, `but let us forget
that
look up, cousin, look up! upon my word, you
are an altered womanand if hepoor Arthur!'
She caught Archibald's hand to her lips, looking all
the time into his face, with streaming eyesas if dying
to ask some question, but dreading to hear the answer.
Archibald anticipated herwhile he stood, as in a
trance, before the bashful woman, so full of love, and
love's inquietude, that every limb was eloquent with
expression. `
Dear
Mary, I cannot speak to you yet.
You have taken my breath away,' said he`I should
not have known you. Nay, do not blush; let me
retain
your hand; am I not your cousin? O, I
understand
you. Yes
he
is wellvery wellandah,
how deadly pale you are! hark! (in a whisper)he
will be here, to-morrow.'
The poor girl was overpoweredand would have
fallen, in the sweet tumult that followed, had not
Archibald caught her, and gently led her to a seat,
where she and he sat, wondering at each other, in
speechless admiration.
I stood in the shadow all the whilethe door was
open; and, when Mary left me, I stepped back into
the entry, unwilling to intrude upon them, and unable
to think steadily for myself.
Mary sat looking him in the eyes, directly facing
meher gentle lips just moving, now and then, as if
her heart were stirred, and they stirred with itthe
bright tears running down her cheeks, drop after drop;
her mild eyes wide open, and overflowing with lustre.
`You tell me Archibald, that I am alteredbut you!
Oh, your own mother would not know you. You were
always a proud boy; but, you look prouder than ever.
I cannot talk, I am too happy to talkImy heart is
too full. I had a thousand things to say to youto
ask youbut, dear ArchibaldI cannot remember
any thing but that you are herealiveand strong
and that I have not seen you for many a yearand'
Just then, the beautiful apparition that had fallen
upon the neck of Copely, in the deep, awful, hushed
expression of devout tenderness, lifted her head, and
dwelt, with her eyes shut, and head turned aside, as
if in prayer, upon the bosom, against which her young
cheek leant; again and again, had I seen her pale orbs
opening for a momentupon histhat lightened over
them; and then, a convulsive, involuntary pressure
would follow; and she would sink down again, as if---
altogether too happy for expression---and too weak to
conceal her happiness. I felt a pangI cannot deny
it. It was humiliating to be so utterly overlooked;
and, for a moment, I forgot that Mary Austin had seen
me, many times since she had seen Archibald, who had
been her school fellow from the cradle, till about a year
or two before the inroad of the Hessians;and that
Ellen Sampsonthe spiritualized Ellen Sampsonwas
the cousin of him, upon whose manly bosom she was
leaning. But I could forbear no longer. I stepped
forward, into the light, and met her eyesjust as she
was raising them, once more, with a renewed
thoughtfulness
and
a deepening hue; for they seemed at first,
so strangly pale were they, to have discharged their
colour and brightness with their tears.
She saw me. A swift paleness, like a blast, covered
her face instantly. Her eyes shut, and she fainted
dead away, in his arms. Copely looked at menot
fiercelynot in sorrowbut like a judge, holding the
power of life and death, in his hands. I moved not,
I stirred nottill I saw her lips parting; and then,
I took her hand gently, and hung over her, as she lay
with her head in the lap of an elderly woman,---whom
I had never seen. Copely did not reprove me; but a
strong hand caught at my arm---yet, I heeded it not
nay, though I knew the voice that muttered in my ear
to be that of the brother that had stolen upon me,
sleeping; and knew not but he might hold his hand
uplifted, at the momentyet I never turned my head;
nay, though I felt the disordered glancing of an old
man, whom I had seen before, but heeded notwhile
he hobbled toward me, with his parched lips moving
with a maledictionI heeded them not. And, when
she opened her eyes, and attempted to raise herself, I
observed that she did not appear terrified, as with the
apparition of something hatefulOh! no! but every
moment, as her collectedness returned, the early
flashing
of her spirit returned with itand she almostthe
dear capricious creaturealmost smiled, as she carried
my hand, at last, passionately to her lips.
Copely had held one of her's, till that moment; but,
then, he dropped itwhy, I could not imagine,was
he not her cousin? had he not loved another? Yetby
heaven, the man shook from head to foot, as I could
see, by his shadow upon the wall, or`Oh! it must be,'
VOL. II. 8*
I thought; `it is only the flickering of the fire light
the shadow may quiverbut Chester Copely cannot.'
I was mistaken. He came to metook my handand
her's; looked at us for a moment, as if subduing some
swell at his heart, by main force; and then, spoke, as
follows.
`Do I understand you both?'
`
No
,' said Ellen. `
No
,' said Maryboth at the
same moment. `
No!
' cried Archibald. `
No!
' said
Nicholas. `
No, no, no!
' said the old man, tottering to
his seat.
It was like the continued echo of many uninhabited,
desolate places.
`Hush, hush!' cried Ellenstarting upon her feet;
throwing back her banner of hair, that had fallen
all about her, in disorderand recovering,
instantaneously
,
all her ancient frolicksomeness of expression.
`You are all mistakenall! all! You, Chester, in
particularso, don't scowl. But take a hint, while
you may. Don't leave a maiden, `all forlorn,'
offended
,
and
alone
where she may meet with as handsome
a fellow as that,' (pointing to me.)
I was thunderstruck at her vivacity.
`You had well nigh lost me. Ask him all about it.
He may tell you. Yetit was not
his
faultno, (more
seriously, and with an emphasis that thrilled to my very
heart)II might have loved himnay, why should I
not tell the truth? I
did
love him better
then
, than I could
have loved you. Your coldwhy how black you all look.
I am not mad; no, upon my honour, I am not. You
were too cold, and haughty, and repulsive; and, when
you left meit wasO, Chester, not as a man should
leave a young sensible heart, that he would hold in his,
forever, and ever. But, you do not know what you
owe to that young man. Perhapsbut no, he may
tell you. If he will not, I
will
.'
`One word, Nell,' said Copely, in the same tone
while she laid her pretty hand upon his heart, and shook
her head, maliciously, as if to say
speak
as you will,
look
as you will,
this
cannot be mistaken again. `Do
you love
him?
'
She coloured, dropped her hand, described a circle in
the sanded floor, with her toe; and then, while I stood
breathless before her, answered`
yes
'looking him up
in the face, at the same time, with a beautiful confusion,
thathang me, if I could persuade myself that I was
at the bottom of
`O, Ellen!' said Copely, embracing her, `that is
enough. I understand you. God forever bless you,
my girl!now I understand youyour tearspaleness.
Enough, Nellenough.'
She laughed, snapped her fingers---and then cried---
her red lips parting with suppressed laughter, and her
eyes running over at the same time. `Now prisoner,
look up. It's now my turn; nay, no flinching.'
Copely almost smiled; but raised his eyes only,
without speaking.
`Do you? Mr. Oadley keep an eye on your brother
Nick, a glass of cold waterthere! all ready
aim!
Chester Copely
do youlord! if you won't
look me in the face, I won't speak at all. Do you love
Lucia Arnauld?'
At that name, Archibald moved back a step---drew
a breath, that appeared to shatter his chest;---his
nostrils
dilated, and he half raised his hands as if to cover
his face; and then dashed them away, as if indignant
at his own want of self command.
`Love her!' said Copely---`
Yes
, better than any
thing beneath that firmament.'
`Oh!' said Ellen, half terrified at the earnest, lofty
expression of his voice.
`
Except
,' locking her hands in his, and smiling. O!
I never saw such a smile upon the lips of man; nay,
nor of woman; nay, nor upon the unsullied innocent
lips of the newly born---it was all truth and purity.
`And will you forgive me for the trick?'
`The devil! was it you,
you
Ellen!' said Copely, a
little angry. `I half suspected it before; but, then, as I
thought that you had forgotten me, I gave up the notion.
Yes, I
do
forgive you. But, you put me into a
desperate
affair. I believed the letter---and went, on the
night appointed, to be married. Does she know it?'
`No. From that hour to this, she has regarded you,
as far less presumptuous than you appeared. The only
thing that worries her, is, that you wrote to her, instead
of asking her, for her answer. It would have saved
you a long ride.'
CHAPTER VI.
`I can fix nothing further of my thought,
`Save that I longed for thee, and sought for thee,
`In all these agonies;and woke, and found thee.'
`
Brother
,' said I, as I entered our lodging room, the
night after our arrival at Philadelphia, and found him
rising from his devotions, `what is the meaning of
this? what disturbs you?'
It was some minutes before he was able to reply;
and, when he did, it was in a manner unusually
solemn.
`There are many things, my brother, to weigh down
the pride of my heart. I am ashamed of many things;
afraid of many, that I have been proud of, too long,
and set too frequently at naught. The blood of
Clinton is upon me. It is in vain to deny it. I am
wretched. I never shall be otherwise. Though I
were to wash my heart away in my own tears, the
blood would be there yet, mingled with the minutest
atom. It is in vain to reason. Even Copely, the
stern, unyielding, dispassionate and inscrutable
Copely---he
has never slept soundly, since he slew a man.
Why this is, it would be hard to tell. We have slain
many a brave fellow in the field; many better men than
Clinton; or the major. Yet, for all that they, or their
troubled spirits may do, we are happy. This is one
thing; another is---that I, and you too, brother, have not
been, to a desolate and bereaved parent---a widowed
mother, what we should have been. It is in vain to deny
it, John. We have left our mother, in the house of a
stranger, at the mercy of a stranger. This, I cannot
believe
,
is required of us. Heaven never will demand a
sacrifice
so unnatural. I have thought much of it. One of
us
must
go to her, and dwell with her. You, from the
patience of your temperand being lame,
you
are the
one. However, let us think more of it. I am willing
to take my chance. It is too much for her poor heart,
to be left, husbandless, childless, houselessin her
old age.'
`Not houselessbrother, another dwelling has been
erected.'
`Upon the embers of the old! Think you that our
mother can even sleep in it?As well might she
slumber in the churchyard, where death and dishonor,
had gone their rounds; and all that she most loved lay
interred.'
`Brother,' said I`let us never speak of this.
We have understood each other well enough hitherto.
That
scene must never be thought of.'
`Truelet us forget it.
That
has led to this
alienation
.
Gracious God!father and sonhusband and
children!turning upon her, the broken hearted
woman
,
when she is most in need of consolationoh,
my brother.'
We embracedand I determined, from that moment,
to return to my dear mother, and be dutiful to her,
whatever became of my country.
`And Copely,' said I hesitating`I.'
`I understand you,' replied Archibald, with a look
of deep distress. `The thing is all explained; a bitter
and terrible misunderstanding it has been. He loved
Lucia, because I loved her; because she was like
himself
,
and chiefly because Ellen appeared to have
forgotten
him, and attached herself, heart and soul, to
you. And shethe rash, thoughtless girl, glorying in
her own disinterestedness and magnanimitywent,
bound with flowers, to martyrdom, in the hope of
promoting
his
happiness. It would be idle to detail the
series of wild, extravagant inventions, by which
she brought Copely to declare himself toto(he
coughed, with great emphasisand I knew well what
it was forhe could not pronounce her name, and
was willing to make me believe that a sudden fit of
coughing was the reasonbut no, the impediment
was in his heart,) `to
Miss
Arnauld.'
`Not
Miss
Arnauld,' said I, smiling.
`Well, then,' he replied, a little impatiently, and
colouring
,
`Miss
Lucia
.'
`Not
Miss
Lucia,' said I.
`Damn it, brother!why will you make me swear?
Lucia
then,
Lucia Arnauld!
will that do?'
`Whya
yes
,' I replied, imitating the frigid
manner
of Copely.
`This declaration was by a letterand, just after
his own nature, abrupt, frank, and peremptory. The
answer camegiving him reason enough, I confess,
for I saw it, to believe that he would be a bridegroom.
It was a childish affair; but with all its childness, has
been wonderfully well arranged; and we have reason
to believe thatthat
Lucia
ahem!does not
know, to this hour, aught of Copely's design in
visiting
her, in his new uniform, at the time that he did!
I could smile at his disappointment and mortification,
were he not such a noble creature; and, did I not
know that he sought her, less for his own sake, than
for
her's
, and mine.'
`For your's!how?'
`Yes, for
mine
. I knew her excellence. I knew
that she was capable of making such a man as Chester
Copely happy, beyond all other menproud and
happy
.
Our tempers were alike, his and mine, I mean
unostentatious, deeply, inwardly devout and
affectionate
,
but seeking concealment rather than display. If
she could love
me
, therefore, she might love
him
.
Beside
,
he was the greater man, the stouter heart, the
steadier . And, if he could love Ellen Sampson,
despite of all her waywardness and caprice, for her
high, heroick nature, ardent temper, enthusiasm, and
sensibility, how much more would he love a creature,
that, with all these great qualities, had none of her
girlish, quick frivolityI do not speak of her caprice.
Both are capricious; but both, I
do
believe, now, less
from a natural inconstancy of temper, than from pride
and piquewilling to sacrifice themselves, and
impatient
for it too, that they may rend and tear a heart,
that, to their thought, has been too insensible of its
approximation to theirsah!'
`Dress! dress! there's not a moment to lose!' said
Copely, striking the door open, with his arm, and
standing before us, with an expression that I never saw
in his face before. `Go with me! they are carrying
all before them.'
`Who? what do you mean?' said we, both at once.
`Lucia and ClaraandArthur arrived last night;
and I set off directly. The house was, as that
romping
Ellen says, getting too hot to hold us all.'
`Can I believe my ears,' said I. `Has Chester
Copely caught the versatility, and '
`I know what you would say,' recovering himself;
`Yes, I
have
caught it! I have no disposition to deny
it. There is a strange affinity between us, growing
out of contradictory materials.'
`What a result might be expected,' said Archibald,
half smiling, `from a chymical combination of two such
hearts. But, soberly, dear Chester, what are you
driving
at?'
`Soberly thendress yourselves in your
handsomeest
.
I will call for you, within an hour.'
`Within an hour!' said Archibald; `wait ten
minutes
,
and I will go with you.'
`And
you!
can
you
equip yourself as quickly,' said
he, to me.
`Yes,' said Archibald, even for the battleten
minutes
are enough for John, devotions and all.'
`I dare say so,' said Copely, gravely. `So with
Frederick
of Prussia: he made his men pray, by beat of
drum. At the first tap, they knelt; at the second,
prayed; at the third, rose. And if any man presumed
to be devout, one second beyond the time; or, if he did
not keep time in his devotion, he was lashed to the
halberds
.'
In a very few minutes, we were on our way. He
led us to a large mansionblazing with lights. My
heart beat deliriously, and I could hardly hold myself
up, as we approached it.
`I am very faint,' said Archibald; `is this Mr.
Arnauld's?'
`No!' said Copely, `this is Mr. Patten's.'
We were soon upon the landing.
`Stop!' said Copely; `remember where you are.
All eyes are upon you. You go under my
introduction
.
Trust to me; and remember that you will meet
some women who could shake the stoutest heart in our
camp; some mensome officers of the enemy, out on
parole; and not a few, who know a good deal of our
history. Heads up!'
Ere I could get my breath, I found myself,
standing
in the middle of a large room, with Archibald,
leaning on my arm, and every seat occupied; the walls
studded with eyes and lips; and all about me, a mortal
silence. I thought that I should fall to the earth,
particularly
when I heard a voice that I knew, even in a
whisper. A dark mist went over my eyes, and I was
fain to catch at Copely's arm.
`For shame!' said he, in a low voice; `shall we
deserve
their upbraiding? Remember that you are an
American officer.'
We threw out our chests on the spot; and trod
outward
like princes.
Lucia Arnauld was the first person that I saw! She
gave me her hand, instantly, without the least
appearance
of embarrassment, though I scarcely dared to lift
my eyes to her face; and was afraid, at every
rustle
near me, that the apparition of another would
start up. The silence was insupportablecruel. How
could human beings so sport with the sensibilities of
a soldier? Where was their humanity?
`Talk,' said Lucia, in a whisper, taking my arm,
`say somethingany thing, and let us walk.'
I did so, and our example was soon followed. I
heard a stepI lifted my eyes. It was
she!
She was
VOL. II. 9
pale as death; but her beauty was awful. Her
movement
was full of self possession:andyes, it
was
sorrow! that sorrow, which none might presume to
comfort.
We continued our walking, with an occasional
broken
,
incoherent question, until I had sufficiently
recovered to look about me.
I was not a little struck, at the arrangement that we
had fallen into, whether by design or accident. There
stood Archibald, leaning upon the mantel piece, fronting
the capricious, wild Ellen, about whom, a score of
fellows had gathered, their eyes dancing an
accompaniment
to her voice. There was a dazzling air about
hera blinding atmosphere; the transparent
changeableness
of her complexion; the vivid brightness of her
singularly faint eyes; her glittering hairand,
altogether
she was, to my view, something spiritual. Archibald
appeared very absent; and she, I could perceive, was
malicious enough to observe it.
In another part of the room, went Copely and Clara,
in deep conversation; was she listening to him? I
believed not, for, as she passed along, at the further
extremity of the room, he relinquished her arm, for a
moment, to join Ellen, beckoning Archibald to go up to
Clara; but Clara did not seem to perceive the absence
of one, nor the approach of the other; and Iwhile I
was looking at her, and wondering if the tall, queenly
creature, whose very step was full of dominion, could
possibly be the same that had once leaned, overpowered,
upon my shoulder, and sobbed there, as if she were
dying. She stood, as in a revery; but, raising her
eyes a moment, they encountered mine, and she turned
them away, with a quickness that went, like electricity,
through my heart. Yes! she was thinking of me;
and she started, when she lifted up her eyes, and saw
mine fixed upon her, as if my apparition had stood
suddenly before her. And then, for I could not take
my eyes from her, she blushed all over; why? with
shame and vexation, that she had betrayed herselfso
like a childby musing, absence; and, quickness when
caught. She awoke, therefore, all at once, and
entered
into conversation, headlong, as ifpoor Clara! to
retrieve what she had lost.
`That man!' said Copelycoming up to us. `Do
you know him?'
`There was no embarrassment in his manner; and,
when he bowed to Lucia, it was with an expression of
deep reverence, and, I hardly knew what else to call
itit was not pity, nor compassion, but something of
sorrow and sympathy. Her lips trembled, and she
gave him her hand; but, would have withdrawn it, I
am sure, had she seen Archibald's face at the moment.'
`No,' said, Lucia`I do not know him, and have
no desire to know him. Do you, Ellen?' (addressing
the sprightly creature, who came forward, half on tip
toe, at that moment, while Copely fell back, to enjoy
the luxury of contemplation; and I saw his fine eyes
roving over her round beautiful waist, delicate feet,
and voluptuous bosom, with the feeling of a husband,
sanctified, and delighted.)
`Whom?' said Ellen, tapping her gently on the
arm, `that elegant fellow?'
`Yes,
that
elegant fellow,' said Copely, dwelling on
her words, with some emphasis. `He is a scoundrel;
and'
`Hush, Hotspur,' said Ellen, quickly`
Hush!
I
see powder burning in your eyes; and forty thousand
small swords in the blaze. Don't quarrel; there,
there, stand back, I will send him about his business
directly?'
Copely smiled; bit his lip, at the beautiful tyrant,
and stepped back.
The stranger was, certainly, one of the most elegant
men that I ever saw. In his manner, voice, step,
action, every thing, there was an air of high fashion,
that I had never seen before; and a dash of pleasant
profligate ease, that had been new to me, till I saw Mr.
Arnauld.
I listened to him a moment, until I found him
engaged
in a playful repartee with Ellen, who manifested
an astonishing readiness. But still, her's was not the
manner to check his impudent, graceful familiarity;
but, that of Lucia
was
. Hide it as he would, he dared
no further encroachment upon that quarter. Ellen saw
it, and urged him to repeat his invitation.
He had just offered his hand to Lucia for a walk;
but she put it back, with a manner that left him no
hopeand yet, left him nothing to complain of.
`O, no,' he replied, to Ellen, `
no
the law of
gallantry
,
as well as modesty, will prevent a renewal of
the solicitation.'
`
Modesty
,' said Ellen, smiling, `
whose
modesty?'
He put his hand, gentlyit was a beautiful hand
upon his own heart, and bowed.
The eye of Lucia said`
puppy
,' as plainly as ever
eye spoke in this world.
`Upon my word, Mr. Bosworth (the name of the
stranger) you have disordered some of the definitions
in my mind, exceedingly, by that gesture; I had
always taken modesty to be'
`Not exactly
synonymous
withahem!' laying his
hand again on his heart.
`Not
exactly
,' she replied, pleasantly.
`O,' he continued, with a careless swinging of the
arm, `I was always reckoned remarkable for my
timidity
and bashfulnessquite a wonderfrom a boy.'
`You are so, yet, Mr. Bosworth,' was the reply.
`I dare say somy own mother used to say that I
was the most retiring and bashful of her boys.'
`You were an
only
son,' I presume.
`Upon my word, Miss Sampson I, Iwould stake
my reputation on'
`On what?' said she, pressing him, with a little
bitterness
.
`On any thing that you please'said the libertine,
endeavouring to get released from a strife, which was
becoming altogether too keen for his play.
`I dare say so,' said Ellen, promptly`and be glad
to lose the stake.'
He coloured, and would have replied, sharply, I
believe, had he not caught the look of Copely, at that
moment, and turned dark in the face.
The eyes of all the company followed his.
Copely advanced, leisurely, up to him; and, touching
his arm, walked toward the door; poor Ellen looking
as if she would fall to the earth. There they stopped, a
moment; the look of Copely was menacing. He
pointed
to the door. The other hesitated. Copely waited
a moment, stamped with his foot; and, I believe, would
have seized him by the collar, if the other had not
dodged it, and passed through the door.
Copely then returned, liesurely, to the same spot;
and, all the company crowded about usasking, with
eager eyes and pale lips, `
Who
is he?
what
is he?'
`The servant of an English lord,' said Copely.
There was a general exclamation of astonishment and
disbelief. `It is true,' said he`and there goes
another; see what company (raising his voice) we
are brought into, by our unthinking hospitality. I saw
that fellow once, in Quebec. I was sure of it. He
robbed his master soon after; and, the moment that
I met his eyes fairly, he betrayed the symptoms of
guilt. Then, mistaking my forbearance for doubt, or
timidity, he began to deny it, and to resist; and, when
we had arrived at the door, he recovered his self
possession, all at once, and attempted to face it out.
But, he is gone. Our hospitality is dishonoured, our
daughters'
`Alas! poor Henrietta! poor Henrietta! What
will become of her!' exclaimed a dozen voices, at the
same moment, while a beautiful girl, whom I had seen
upon the arm of Bosworth an hour before, fainted
away.
`Who is she?' said I, to Lucia.
`Infatuated girl!' she uttered, in a low voice. `She
never loved him; but, the wretch told such magnificent
VOL. II. 9*
lies about his family, rents, and equipage, that her
brain was turned.
`Yes,' said Ellen, colouring with shame, at the self
inflicted lesson of her own heartbut endeavouring to
carry it off, `it was the carriage and four that
conquered
her
. And now that the carriage and four have
goneLord! this accounts for what he saidthat he
drove
a coach and four. I dare say that he told the
truth, after allhe walked so like a coachman.' A
general laugh followed this observationand she
continued, conscious that Copely's eyes were upon her,
`I would send her a tin carriage and four, to trundle
about in her dressing room; that would be a
consolation
I'
Copely's eyes were upon her; and her's filled
instantly
.
Her head fell, abashed, at her own upbraiding;
and, her voice died away; and, as soon as she could,
she crept up to him, where he stood, with a serious
face, meditating, as it seemed, upon what had passed.
`It was very childish,' said she, slipping her hand
into his, so that nobody could see it, except Lucia and
I`IIforgive me Chester.'
I saw him press her handand turn toward her,
with his heart in his face. But he said nothingyet
he looked, plainer than any language could speak`Say
what you will; do what you will; rally servants, or
lacerate the broken hearted, I cannot be angry with you.'
`You are very absent,' said Lucia, to me with a
mournful smile.
`Am I?'
`Have you spoken to Clara?'
`Toto Clara?' said Inot knowing what was to
become of me.
`You have not, I believe,' said she`
will
you?'
I lifted my eyes to her's; they were beautifully bright,
her's
I mean: yet there was a solemn darkness in
their centre, as ifas if death had extinguished a jewel
there. I was silent a moment, and then said
`
You
have not seen Archibald' (I felt a convulsive
contraction of her arm) `will you see
him?
'
`
Yes!
' she answered, firmly`
yes
, if you will
recollect
yourself, and meet Clara. She has not forgtten
you.'
`But when?' said I.
`Leave that to me,' she replied. `We will
withdraw
early. You'll go with me; I will take care that
Archibaldyour brothershall attend
her
. I want
to see you. And my father and mother desire to see
him. But, do not mistake me. I am prouder than
ever. What I do, now, is the extent that I shall ever
do. Let Archibald and Lucia be friends. They can
never be any thing more. Tell him this. If he have
the strength, the forbearance, to be content with that,
we will renew our acquaintance. But if he have any
doubt, any hope, beyond thatlet us never meet again.
I am firm.'
`I will speak to him this moment,' said I, strangely
affected at her solemnity, and distressed at her agitation.
I announced the commission. He heard me through
the sweat started out upon his forehead`noble,
excellent
girl,' he said`I will; lead me to her.'
I brought him up.
`I accept your conditions, Lucia,' said heand
she gave him her hand. When they touchedI felt
my blood thrill. They were like too dead
creatures
,
suddenly galvanised.
`Let us go; I have much to say to you,' said Lucia
`Colonel Copely, give your arm to sisterMr. Oadley,
you'll attend to cousin Ellen.'
The order of march thus arranged, we descended to
the carriages; but there, a new difficulty arose; and,
finally, I knew not how it was, I found myself sitting
on the same seat with Clara, her hand in mineher
head upon my shoulder. I held my lips to her forehead
I bathed her whole face with my tearsand was
endeavouring
,
for we were alone in the carriage, to raise
her pale face, so that the lanterns would show me
her features. She was motionlessshe had fainted.
I burst open the doorleaped to the groundtook her
into my arms, and was hurrying into the first house,
when I saw a man at a distance, whom I knew to be a
watchman. He ran to me, and, after a few moments,
she recovered; but, when I proposed entering the
carriage
,
she resisted, faintly, but positively.
`No,' said she, `let us walk. It is a beautiful night,
and I have much to say to you. Let us walk.'
I assented, and we continued our ramble for half an
hour, in one of the most delicious nights that ever
breathed upon the forehead of man. There was a
firmament
,
full of blue eyes, all over us.
I could not have uttered a word, had it been to
obtain
my own salvation.
We had come at length, to a little low railing, and
were walking, steadily and silently, by it, when the
temptation to sit gave me courage, and I led her to it.
We sat down, but still I was unable to speak. She
was agitated to her finger's ends. And II was
running
over all my thought and dreaming again. The
proud creature was again within my power.
`IClara!' said I, faintly; `speak to me; you
have not forgotten me; what troubles you?'
Her bosom heaved audibly; and her breath was like
one suffocating.
She aroseshe stood up; and when, just as I had
done at our last meeting, I put my arm round her waist,
and beheld her bright eyes waning in her tearsshe
did not rebuke me. My heart feltO, I cannot
describe
itgiddy and faint with rapture.
`Clara,
dear
Clara,' said I, more tenderly, holding
her soft hands to my forehead.
`I knew not,' said she, at last, recovering some
degree
of composure, `what my true nature was. I never
shall know, I fear. Two hours ago, no mortal
breathing
could have made me believe, that, after many years,
it would be possible for me to stand by a man, with his
arm encircling me, who had so blighted and trodden on
me;II'
Her tears fell, like rain, upon my hands. I arose,
and pressed her, convulsively to my bosom.
`Nay Clara,' said I, `let there be no reproach or
recrimination between us, now. Our meeting is but
for a few hours. We may never meet again.'
(I felt her dear arms contract, and her bosom
heaving
against mine.)
`Else, might I saywhy was
I
trodden onwhy
was I
blighted, heart
and soul?'
`O, Mr. Oadleywe have been much to blame.
Both have been too proud for our own happiness. I
thought that I was able to live and die, proudly, as I
have lived; but I cannot. I doubted you. You could
have quieted me. A word, a look would have done it.'
`We have been mightily abused; my own, my
inexpressibly
dear girl. It
was
prideI grant it. I
weep for it. I
should
have told you, as I can now, that,
I never wronged you
never
, at least, till
after
our
separation
.'
`Ah!' said she, raising her head. `Then all that I
have heard is true. Hear me. I love you, more than
life. I have wept myself nearly blind since our parting.
I have became convinced of your innocence, and
exceedingly
penitent.'
`Of my innocence! is it possible!' said I, `then
why not tell me so.'
`What! would you marry a woman that should
pursue
you to the camp, with entreaty? No, I would
sooner have died a thousand deaths. But I honoured
youalmost worshipped you; and I trembled at the
same time. I felt that I had wronged you; but how
had you borne it? carelesslycarelessly, Oadley;
leaving me to die, a broken hearted woman. O
I cannot speak any more. But hear me, no matter
what has happened. I can forgive it allforget it all
except thatgive me your hand Oadley. Do you
love me yet?'
`Upon my soul, Clara, ten thousand times more than
ever!' I exclaimed.
`Well thenone more question. I put it to your
truth and honour. Are you worthy of me?'
`NoI am notnot altogether worthy of you.'
Her arms dropped; `but, nothing has happened, since
we met last, that I am ashamed to tell you. I have
been weak, love; vain, very vain, but not criminal.
There is my hand. I dare to offer it to you. Dare
you receive it?'
She took it; and then, were we indeed, with our eyes
lifted to heaven, and all streaming with the flow of the
heart
then
, were we, indeed, a betrothed pair, wedded
before God and all his angels, in the warm, beautiful
air.
`Now then,' said Clara, receiving my kiss, like a
bride, her nuptial ben ediction, `now then, I am
prepared
to die. Let us go. But O, my friend, let us be
more patient and forbearing hereafter. Think of what
we have suffereddoneendured.'
We finished our walk in silence, with a holy, deep,
passionate tranquillity; such, I do believe, as the
married
feel, when all their apprehension and sorrow are
hushed; and no mortal arm can pluck them asunder;
and the murmur of their first embrace; the passionate
heaving of their youthful hearts, hath subsided for the
first time, like a blue summer sea, in the moonlight.
We found Archibald parting with Lucia, as we
entered
;
a general expression of cordiality in all eyes,
even in hers; and I was welcomed, with a tinge of
shame, and a little pride; but that was soon over, and
I turned to depart.
`Farewell!' said Archibald, `heaven bless you all!
Lucia, farewell!'
`You will see
me
again, before you leave us,' said
she.
`If I might,' he replied, taking her hand
reverentially
,
and gazing on her dark, wet lashes, as if he would
have given the world, only to touch them with his own;
`if I might come and go, Lucia, when and where I
pleased, I would spend every leisure hour with you.'
`Will you walk with us to-morrow evening?'
`With all my heart,' he replied; `to-morrow
evening
?
at what hour?'
`Dine with us, and we will all go!' said Mrs.
Arnauld
;
`let us go
en-bon-point
.'
`
Embonpoint
,' said Mr. Arnauld, peevishly, while
Lucia coloured and smiled.
`Yes' said Archibald; `we
will
dine with you,
to-morrow
.'
`Good night.'
`Good night!
good
night! heaven bless you, Lucia!'
said he, passing out, and resting his fine eyes on her.
She burst into tears, and turned away her face.
I saw that all admired him; and that her heart was
too full for a word. Was it shame and penitence, for
having so lightly estimated his proud spirit?
CHAPTER VII.
`
Caro!
a me caro! questa  una
`parola che mi fa venire unsudore di
`morte . Non so che dire.'
Our
dinner was abundant and stylish; every thing to
provoke the appetite, and enough to allay it; yet, for
such things would happen in olden time, where they
that loved truly were assembledscarcely a plate was
soiled. We could not eat; and, it was with some
difficulty
,
when Mr. Arnauld, with that air of high fashion
so eminently his own, filled his glass, and commanded
us to follow his example, that we were able, either to
manage the decanter or the wine. Our very faces
shook.
`Come, come,' said he, turning to his yet beautiful
wife, `none o' that; but let us partake fully of the joy
that is about us. We have been foolish, very foolish
ready! Let our prayer be, (rising from his seat,) that,
out of this folly and transgression, wisdom and
caution
may grow; and, out of our sinfulness, sorrow and
penitence.'
`Amen!' responded all hearts, devoutly and
fervently
.
`Let us be gone,' said Lucia, taking Archibald's
arm, and moving to the door; `we shall return about
candle light, mother.'
Her mother smiled, shook hands with Archibald,
and lifted her gentle eyes upward, as a mother would
over her own child. I know not what his emotions
were; but mine were delicious. II felt as if all the
time, that had passed in displeasure, were
forgotten
;
and that, now, in a single moment, our hearts
had been brought into that warm, intimate, thrilling,
and soft contact, once so dear to both. I forgot all
the bitterness and darkness of my lot; and, if I could,
I would have turned and fallen upon her neck, and
weptthe mother of Clara!
my
mother!
Clara's arm was upon mine. I felt her hand
tremble
;
but was inexpressibly delighted at the change of
manner which I now perceived, in the deportment of
the two sisters toward each other. It was cordial,
affectionate
and very tender. Once before, there was
something of high reproofsomething ungentle, in the
manner of Clara; and, in that of Lucia, the air of a
princess, conscious of her supremacy; for, in beauty
and power, she was abundantly superiour to Clara.
This had pained medistressed me, even in my sleep.
It looked unamiable in both. In Clara, it had an air,
that I could not endure to think of, that of pity, nearly
allied tocontempt? No, but such a feeling as that,
with which we regard a child; while the dark,
melancholy
eyes of Luciathe swan like movement of her
neck; her beautiful person, not so tall as Clara's, but
modelled with a most voluptuous symmetry, were all
radiant, with the expression of defiance and conscious
superiority. This was over; and it made me so
happy
to see that they loved each other more, as I would
wish, that I could not forbear, when Clara demanded
the cause of my silencelaying my hand upon hers,
with all my heart, and looking at Lucia.
She understood me, and a faint hectick passed over
her pale forehead.
`I was wrong,' said she. `I judged the dear girl
too hastily. I never saw a woman like her. She has
her faults; but they are dazzling ones. For a time,
I treated her as a capricious child. I was unspeakably
deceived. Lucia Arnauld never was a child. Her
faults have always been those of a woman. You do
not know her. Your brother does not. Yet, I do
believe
,
that he knows her better than any other mortal,
not excepting myself. She astonishes me, whenever
we measure thoughts together for a moment. The
stature
VOL. II. 10
of her is always above mine, by a whole head.
I know not why it is; but, I do not feel, of late, as if I
were the elder sister. You smile '
`I
do
, for my feelings toward Archibald are of the
same nature. But pray ' said I.
`No, I foresee your question,' she said, quietly,
interrupting
me. `Never urge me on that point. She
loves him, I verily believe. Nay, it is probable that she
would not scruple to tell
him
so; for, she is, as I have
already told you, unlike any other woman that I ever
saw or heard of; but, let him not hope. I can say no
more. Ah! they are speaking of some matter that
disturbs her. I knew by her stopping. Let us walk
slower.'
I held back, and observed that there was a troubled
stateliness in her tread; and that Archibald
occasionally
made a full stop, for a moment, and almost faced
her in his earnestness.
We continued our walk for some time, talking upon
indifferent subjects, and watching their movement,
with uncommon anxiety. At last, she made some
proposition, in a low voice, to which, he did not
immediately
reply: she repeated it. He shook his head:
but after a few minutes, he stood fronting her, with
both his hands clasped, and, as we were approaching
them, I heard him say, very distinctly.
`The thought never occurred to me; but I am of
your opinion. I will forward it, with all my heart and
soul: Brother !'
I was stepping forward, but Lucia said`No, not
yet. I will lead you to a place, where we can all sit
down together, and deliberate upon the matter, like a
congress.'
So we continued our walk.
`You have been very ill, Clarahave you not?'
Her voice trembled, as she replied. `Yes, rather
ill
rather
butI am well again.'
I understood her, and when I endeavoured to look
under her broad bonnet, I could only see enough to
convince me that she had felt my question.
`And youyou walk a little lame! and '
`Yes!' I replied, `I had nearly lost my leg, (I felt
her arm shiver in mine)I shall probably never
recover
its use, entirely. It pains me a good deal, now
and thenparticularly on horseback.'
`Then, why go on horseback?'
`As an officer, I must.'
`Truebut, have you not done enough for your
country.'
`Clara!'
`Forgive me. I am wrong and selfish I fear; but
your brother said something of your intention, or his,
to return to your farm, and protect your mother.'
`O, dear Clara!' said I, carried away by feeling,
`that reminds me of my duty to her. I did not know
till yesterday, how much I owed to your gentleness
and assiduity for my poor mother.' I could not go on
my tears choked me. `I God bless you for it.
Yes, I do believe, that, after this campaign, I shall
return
,
at least for a time, to comfort the declining years
of my mother; and, ifClaraif'
The poor girl could hardly standfor what reason I
know not. Perhaps there was something in the tone
of my voicesomething, the purport of which, I knew
not; for my heart failed me; and, after the silence of
a minute, I asked her some indifferent question. But
noit was no moment to trifle. We were upon the
banks of the Schuylkill. The blue water ran smoothly
below, just tinged with the red sunset. It was the
quietest
,
blessedest hour of all my life. A high railing
ran, rough and irregular, along the bank, just even
with our breast. I turned, and leaned over it, retaining
her arm all the while, and dwelling patiently, upon the
water. The air was damp. Neither of us spoke.
Archibald and LuciaCopely and Elenour were out of
sight. Our hearts were full, very full; and, before we
knew it, the water below sparkled with rain drops; yet
the sky was cloudless. We wept, without knowing it
wept in the mere capriciousness of rapture. My cheek
lay upon her hand, as I leant forward, and affected to
rest upon my own arm. I felt the blood rushing
through it; and, before I knew my own purpose, I had
pressed my wet lips to it.
She turned away her face, and I saw her bosom
heave strangely, for a moment, and felt her frame shake,
as in the blast of winter.
`Clara,' said I, at lastregaining a little
composure
;
`by what has already happened, we have been
taught wisdom. Yet
yet
it might happen again.
We are very proud.'
`
Very
,' she said, faintly.
`I am going away Clara. Another campaign is
before
me. When we last metlet me not distress you;
we were happy as we now are; a single hour changed
the current of our bloodmade all dark about us;
bereaved
our hearts. Might it not be so again?'
`It
might?
'
`And is there no way of providing against such a
calamity?'
`I know of none,' she replied.
`But I do,' said I, `Clara, (I wondered at my own
composure, but I was desperate.) You have been
satisfied
of my innocence, in the case of your sister.'
`Yesin the case of
my sister
.'
`You are emphatick Clara. Have you any other
doubt? Is there any other whom you speak
Clara
now,
is the time.'
`No, John; allow me to call you so.' As she said
this, she turned and faced me, with an expression, that
I shall never forget: so full of truth, and tenderness,
and sincerity. `No, John, I do not doubt you. Once
I didand it almost broke my heart; nay, perhaps,
had I not been undeceived by another, less proud than
yourself, it would have broken it. I'
`It was not my pride, Clara, but my honour that
prevented the disclosure. Yes, indeed it was. You
smilewell, let there be some pride in it. The truth,
is, that I would never humble that man in your eyes,
whom I hoped to see your husband. NoClaraI
loved you too sincerely, too devoutly, for that. I could
have died for youwould have died for you; but I
could not, and would not, even to save your own life,
which was a thousand times more precious to me than
mine own, have done ought that would have made
you less willing to make me your Lord. As your
lover
, I might have put my forehead in the dust. As
your husband, I would not. But how did you know it?
from whom?'
`From Lucia herself. She told me how you had used
her, and  ah! what ails you?'
`I am very faint.'
`John! I tremble for you. Your passions are
exceedingly
violent; and, II am of a jealous nature.
Yetlook at meII am not jealous.'
She was pale as deathpoor girl.
`But my head aches. What is this mystery? Why
are you so disturbed?'
`Dear Clara!' said I, firmly, as soon as I could get
my breath; `I cannot deceive you; but at the risk of
losing you forever; nay, nay, Clararemember the
last meeting
do
listen to me! There are some things
that I cannot tell you. I love you. Let that satisfy
you. I will be true to you, to the last breath, the last
pulse. Let that comfort you. I have never forgotten
you but once, even for a momentand then, I forbore
to darken your image in my heart: no Clara! without
first veiling that, I could not
sin
. And no mortal
hand shall veil it! Mine cannot. Mine have failed
at the thought. Enough of self-exculpation. You
believe
me. Look at me. Have you that confidence in me?
ask your own hearttake your own time, to answer the
questionthat, happen what will, you will sooner
believe
me
, if I lay my hand upon your arm, as I do now,
and say to you in this voice: Clara!
I am innocent!
than, in the assembled worldthan, in your own
senses! If you cannot answer me in the affirmative
O Clara, let us part! whatever it cost us, we shall
have escaped the bitterness of that death, which will
happen, if I am doubted again. I am proudso are
you; quick and resentful under suspicion; implacable
VOL. II. 10*
where I am not
necessary
to another's happiness. So
are you. Think of it. If we part again, it must be
forever
forever
, Clara. I am growing old; and, as
a rational man, I must determine soon, never to marry
at all, or, to marry immediately. I cannot live in air.
These are my words. Can you, dear Clara, happen
what will, believe my simple word? If I say that I am
innocent, believe it, let who will swear that I am
not. Believe too, that if I do wrong, I shall be the
first to tell you of it, and wet your hands with the
weeping of a broken heart: and, in short, never believe
that I have wronged you, in thought, or word, or deed
unless I have told you so, with my own lips? Let
me not hurry you. Take your own time. It is all
important
to your happiness.'
`I ask no time,' said she, solemnly, placing both her
hands in mine; `you have all my confidence. I shall
never believe aught against you, unless from the
evidence
of your own lips, or, my own senses; nor then,
until I have given you an opportunity for explanation.
But '
`Do that, Clara,' said I, clasping her to my bosom;
`do
that!
and your confidence will never be abused;
but what were you about to say? You smile.'
`But,' said she, smiling, `my mother, who is a
woman
you know, of some experience, has been giving
me a little excellent advice respecting you.'
`How to manage me, I suppose?'
`Precisely. In the first place, she says, that you are
of a jealous disposition.'
`I am.'
`You
are!
well, I confess that your frankness is
pleasant enough. But do you not feel, that jealousy
may become a very uncomfortable companiona'
`Clara. My jealousy is peculiar. I should never
doubt younever watch younever speak of aught that
could distress youno never! and thoughpermit me
to say what cannot happenI had become convinced
that you loved me no longer; nay, that you loved
anther
,
(do not weep, Clara,) I should never speak
unkindly
to younever! I should only kiss you, and
say farewell to you.'
`And perhaps'
`Yes, Clara, I understand that blushthe emotion
that shakes youabandon you, and yoursmy own
babes, though it broke my heartwithout uttering a
word.'
Poor Clara coloured to the temples, at this; but,
affecting
to smile, though the tears ran down to her lips,
all the whileshe shook her finger at me.
`You ought to have Ellen; she would manage you.
She would bring you back, dead or alive.'
`Dead, she mightbut, if I were not sure of my own
strength, I would hang myself up at the first lamp
postor, I'
`For heaven's sake, dear Oadley, do not talk so. I
quake to hear you. Let us change the subject. What
think you mother says? She would have me keep you
a little jealous, always; and Ellen vows, that she has
made up her mind to keep Copely, forever, in hot
water.'
`Beware of that, Clara. It is no light matter to
trifle with the devotion of a proud heart. Men, who
know their own value, are jealous of it, to a degree,
surpassing all that women ever believe, in their first
feeling of power. They are slaves, to you, to be sure,
so long as they are persuaded that your tyranical
weakness grows out of your abundant love for them;
and, while they believe that, they will forgive you
almost any thing. But wo to the woman that is once
suspected by her husband, of practising upon his
affection
.
No Clara; I have no fear for you; but I pray
youdo not permit Ellen even to talk of such a thing,
in the way of conversation. It may, after awhile;
become too familiar to her thought; she may be
reconciled
to an
experiment
. Alas for her, if she ever should.
The spell once broken, that encompasses a heart like
Chester Copely's, it is gone for ever. It is a panoply of
christal. You cannot shatter it, at allwithout
shivering
it to dust. It may bear many a heavy blow; but,
no longer than while it is whole. Weaken it, and it
is shattered forever and ever. IIpray, why
are you smiling. Tell me, dear Clara, will you not'.
`CertainlyI am smiling at your fine language.
D oes it seem unnatural?'
`Very; I have never heard you guilty of any thing
that resembled it.'
`I'
(The publisher, after all, is obliged to admit the
truth of the remark just made; and apologize to the
reader, and to the
author
, for a very unpleasant
omission
here, of a whole page, which a friend, to whom he
applied, has attempted to supply. The truth is, that,
one of the half sheets, by some accident, was lost by a
compositor: and the publisher has done the best, in his
power, toward remedying the loss, by making up about
the same quantity, to fill the chasm in the form.)
`Well then,' said I, stopping again, just opposite the
moon, which was overtopping a clump of trees at the
left, and pouring her tranquil, pale light into Clara's
eyes; `I know your firmness, steadiness, and
independence
of thought. I am about to leave you. Away
from you now, I shall be inconceivably weak and
wretched, imagining ten thousand evils. Dare you,
dear, Clara---
dare
you give me a title, to think of you
without trembling?'
She was silent for a momentawfully silent. `I
know not what I should reply,' said she, at last. `This
proposition is sudden and unexpected; or, rather, it
should seem so; and, perhaps, it is not wise nor delicate
for me to understand it so readily. But, I cannot
pretend to misunderstand you. Let me deal plainly
then. I
have
expected it. It startled me, nevertheless;
but your manner, about an hour ago, prepared me for
it. I have thought much of you. And it has always
been my notion that important matters are not to be
hastily determined. We should be always prepared
for the question of death or marriage. You smileI
am sorry to see it. I was never more serious, in my
life. What I mean to say, is thisthat, sudden as your
question is, it has not found me unprepared.
There is
my hand!
I leave it to you. My father and mother
have permitted me to choose for myself. They love
and respect you; and always have, without ever
understanding
the motive of your silence or departure.
Take it; give yourself the title, of which you speak,
whenever you please. I shall not tremblefor
my
husband
while he does not tremble for his
wife
.'
I could not speak for five minutes
wife! husband!
pronounced by the dearest lips in the world, too
Ah! it made a fool of me, and my heartI grew giddy
with my own blood.
`But,' she continued`you are going into battle.
Is it wise, think you, to be hasty? would it trouble
you less, the thought of leaving a bride, or a
widow
than a mistress behind you?'
`Noit would not trouble me less, dear Clara; but
it would, with all the trouble and alarm that it sent
through my heart, send with them, ten thousand
pleasant
and sustaining consolations. God bless you! God
forever bless you!I shall hold you to your word
and'
`Here they are, yet! upon my word,' cried Ellenour,
running down the hill, and clapping her hands, with
Copely walking leisurely after her, his hat off, and his
hair drenched with wet.
`Where is Archibald?' said Iaffecting carelessness.
`And Lucia?' said Claracolouring.
`
Where is Archibaldand Lucia
.' Well, did you ever
hear the like, Chester?' cried Ellenour. `In
Delaware
,
by this time, I dare say. I never saw people
walk like them, in all my lifeexceptwhy, bless me,
are
you
walking against time?'
`They are over the hill yonder,' said Copely`and
I have come to look you up. Go with me, and we
will return, by a favourite path of Miss Arnauld's.'
Saying this, he took the little hand of Ellen, who
shook her fingers at the
touch
, as if they tingled to the
marrow,`a pestilent rough hold, you have, Chester
that's the way you handle your arms? I suppose?'
`Precisely'he replied`arms and hands alike
why not?'
`Well, I'd thank you to be a little more tender of
minethey are all black and blue.'
`Want of practice, Nell,' said Copelytaking her
hand again, pulling her arm through his, and walking
over the hill, with Ellen expostulating, all the way, as
fast as her tongue could run, and scolding him for his
military stride.
`The devil, himself, cannot keep the step with you,'
said she.
`So I perceive,' said Copely, in the same tone.
`Saucebox'she replied, breaking away, and
skipping
over the wet grass`I'
Her foot slipped, and she fell upon her hands and
kneesawkwardly enough, I confess. I would have
run to her assistance, but Clara held me backbidding
me watch Copely.
He started at first; and, then, as if coming to his
senses, walked leisurely up to her, where she stood,
blushing and pouting, her pretty hands all soiled and
stained with the turf.
`Monster! your handkerchief.'
`With all my heart,' said hetaking it out, and
wriping her hands with it, just as if they had not been
the prettiest hands in the world.
`What! sulky Nell? I'll tell you what it isyou'll
break your neck, some o' these days, by your romping.
Rememberyou are to be the wife of a manthat'
`That never jumped a rope in his life. I dare say;
Pray Chester, did you ever go to a fire?'
`Never,' he replied`I have heard the bells ring,
now and then.'
`But could never get there till the day after?'
`Never. I always started the day beforeif I meant
to be in season for a fire; or, to help a creature like
you, whisking about in the dew and twilight, like a
shadow cut adrift from its body. Come, comelet us
be friends.'
`Nono I won't!' said the spoilt girl, skipping over
a rail, two foot and a half high, at the least inch, and
sitting down by the side of Lucia, who started upon
her feet, as she did so.
`Pray,' said Archibald rising, with a countenance
that struck me`shall I propose it, now?'
`Yes,' she replied.
`My dear brother,' said Archibald, turning to me
`and you Clara; I pray you to hear me, for a moment,
patiently; and you Copely; and you Ellen.'
`In three days more, we shall leave you. Our troops
are ordered to the south. Heaven only knows, when
we may meet againif ever.'
Ellen's head dropped; and, while her redundant
hair blew all about, in the faint summer windshe
stood swinging her bonnet in her right hand, and
leaning
more
fondly than I had ever seen her, upon the
arm of Copely, who stood, as if wondering what all this
preparation tended to.
`We have known each other longlong enough, it
appears, to be willing to commit our happiness to the
keeping of one another. What more do we want. The
chances of battle are terribleprecariousand trying;
those of love, yet more soof three womennay, of
four, that I knowLucia, let me not wound youwhat
I say, grows out of the occasion.'
Lucia stood aloof, resting against a large
overshadowing
tree, and leaning upon her hand, just so that
her dark wet eyes, gleaming through their lashes, could
be seen, under the pale sweep of her forehead.
`Of these four, Clara is the only one, whose heart
has not erred for a momenta single moment. I know
four men;of these four, I am the only oneno, I am
mistaken, Arthur and I have never wavered. Mary
faltered; Clara stood still, and bled to death; Ellen
Ellen covered her face, with her hands, and leaned
upon Copely's shoulder.
`Ellen,' continued my brother`even the dear,
passionate, enthusiastick Ellen, forgot her religion; and
Lucia---'
Her arms dropped lifeless at her side; and, when he
offered his hand to her, she had scarcely life enough to
take it; yet, she could not stand upright.
`Even Lucia forgot, and forswore the chosen one of
her heart;forgive me, Lucia. Copely turned to her,
and drank and drugged himself, in his madness, at
another's eyes. Jonathan Oadley too, for a moment,
ceased to be my brother, ceased to be a man. I know it
all, John
all!
do not alarm yourself; and Clara
knew it; and Copely knew it; long before you told it.
Look at that timid girl,' (pointing at Ellen)---`she had
the courage to tell it---all her shame---all your
forgetfulness
.'
Copely kissed her forehead; and I saw her shoulders
heave, in the moonlight, as if she were subbing.
`Now hear me; Copely take her hand; John take
her's
. My recommendation to you is, that you marry
before you part again.'
I had expected this; and, when he finished, I turned
my eyes to Clara, who blushed, vivid as fire, when she
met them, and smiled at the coincidence. But Ellen
she could neither look up, nor speak; and Copely
himself, appeared thunderstruck for a momentyet, he
was the first to reply.
`With all my heart, Nell!'
`Don't call me,
Nell
,' said the blushing girl,
looking
him up in the face.
`Well then, Ellen, lovewhat say you? But, why
need I speak? You have not forbidden it. The thought
is new to me, I confess. But, why not make certain
of this creature, while I can. Somebody may snap her
up, before I have turned the corner, else'
`Are
you
ready, Oadley?'
I looked to Archibald, wondering what he would
say: he was holding Lucia's hand.
`He speaks to
you
, brother,' said Archibald, `what
say you?'
`Why,' said I, `it would be folly to mince matters
any longer. The women know that we are soldiers,
and that, as soldiers wives, they must expect short
notice
for pitching tents, or striking them;we say, yes.'
`Well then,
yes
, it is!' said Copely; `and now that
we have resolvedthe sooner the better. I hate a
long grace. But Archibald, halloo!where now?
stealing off?'
Archibald halted, as if on parole; faced about, with
an air of ill disguised sufferingand Copely continued,
taking Lucia's hand, who left it passively at his
disposaland placing it in his. He trembled; and
her full eyes quivered in their sockets.
Archibald bowed his face upon her hand; held it a
moment; and, when he raised it, I saw that his nostrils
were swimming in blood.
`Would you!' said Lucia, faintlyvery faintly; the
words just reached my hearing, like the last murmur of
sweet lips dying; `
would
you, dear Archibald?'
He wiped away the blood from his lips; the flesh of
his forehead shivered in the moonlight; and he stood,
with his sublime eyes upturned to the sky, as if a
deadly
commotion were going on within his heart; his
face altered, visibly, till it was like the face of a dead
man.
Again he bowed his face upon her hand, but was
unable
to speak.
`Enough!' cried Lucia, in a voice of unutterable
tenderness; `enough!O God, I thank thee!'
She caught away her hands, and sunk upon her knees
on the wet turfcovering her face with her shawl, and
weeping aloud. Archibald attempted to raise her
but it was too late. The flower of the grass had
fallen
.
She was lifeless. Her heart had broken it
seemed
,
in the rush of her blood.
VOL. II. 11
We were inconceivably terrified; and he, poor
fellow
he
raved over her, like a distracted creature, as
she lay, with her head in Clara's lap.
But, at last, heaven be blessed! she opened her
beautiful
eyes, with such an expression of thankfulness, that
we wept together at meeting them.
`Let us go,' said she, `let us goit is very late
I am happy now, Clara
perfectly happy
. The load is
liftedI am very faintIArchibald, let me lean
upon your arm.'
He approached, ghastly as a drowned creature, and,
I heard her repeat in the ear of Clara`now I shall
die contentedII am
so
happy.'
`Well then,' said Copely, wiping off the first tears
that he had ever shed in his life, I am sure`I suppose
that we are to take all that for a consent.'
`Certainly,' said Ellen, laughing through her tears.
`Would you have a girl
spell
her answer? That is
plain English
joining hand
writing
itin reality.'
`Don't you tremble, minx, at the thought of standing
up, with a regiment of women, to be married to a
regiment of menI'
`Dear Lucia, I am
so
happy,' cried Ellen, taking
her hand`so we shall all be'her voice fellthe
hand dropped, as she saw Lucia's face. It was not the
face of a bride.
`
Never
,' said Lucia
Archibald reeled away at the sound; but, instantly
recovered himself, and walked apart with us.
`Will you not join us'said she, kindly, extending
her hand at the same time`I'
`Stop Lucia,' he said, in an altered voiceso
unlike his own, five minutes before, that my blood
thrilled, as if a stranger had suddenly spoken among
us. `Stop! the three raps that we heard last night upon
our table were not idle.'
(It was a strange circumstance, to which he alluded,
that hapened the night beforeI had forgotten it;
while he and I were sitting together, at our tablein
a dead silencethere were three loud, distinct raps upon
the centre of the table, as if a strong hand hads truck it,
smartly, with the flat palm. Archibald, I remember,
turned pale; and, when I arose to examine into the
cause, mocked at mesaying that he had heard it
beforeaye, the very night before the death of our
father.
He continued. `There is a death near to us. Do
not tremble, woman. It is not your turn. But I have
not forgotten Clinton.'
Lucia uttered a faint cry, and covered her face with
her hands.
`Perfidious girl!' he cried`are you never weary
of torturing hearts that would die for you! O, shame
on your unprincipled, bloody nature. Eyes after eyes
are quenched forever!hearts that wereO, God!
Lucia I cannot, even now, maddening as I am, under
this accumulated outrage, I
cannot
speak unkindly to
youforgive meO, forgive me!'
He caught her hands, and held them to his heart,
while she turned away her face, and stood like one
about to drop into her own grave.
`I have never touched that chord beforenever will
again. You loved him Lucia, andwould that I
were in his place.'
She recovered. I was amazed at the awful beauty
of her countenance; her bonnet had fallen back, and
her white forehead glittered, in the pride of its
loveliness
and purity.
`Come hither, all of you,' she said; `how little you
know me. You spoke of Clinton. Look at me
pronounce
it again. Do I turn paledo I tremble?
Archibald. I am sorry for his death, very sorry; more
sorry that he died so suddenly; and yet, more sorry,
infinitely more, that he died by
your
hand. But I have
heard it all
all!
I do not blame you very much. I
forgive you. There is my hand. Would that you
could see my heart! You would find a reason there,
that would startle youto explain my refusal. Is it
love for Clintonmistaken man! He lived long
enough to tread out the last spark of affection in this
heart. No! Archibald, no! But what it is, I cannot
now tell you. Suffice it to knowand I pray you all
to remember itwhatever become of methat is a
reason
worthy of Archibald, worthy of
me
. Bear with
me, patiently. The secret shall not be kept forever.
A little while, and you may all know it.'
Our tears fell like rain, upon the grassthe sound
of her voice was that of an Eolian harp, wailing to the
low death wind.
CHAPTER VIII.
`Blood he had seen, could seeunmovedbut then
`Twas shed in COMBAT or was shed by men.
`Lo! they wrestled with angels from the going down of the sun,
`even unto the rising of the same.'
`
Well
! of all the capers that ever I heard of, in my
life, this is the drollest,' said Miss Arnauld, when she
heard of our resolution.
`Just what I told 'em! just what I told 'em!' said
Ellen, shaking her hands, as if she would shake them
off, at the same time. `Its a burning shame, said I;
an outrage on all regular-bred novelswhat! for two
couple, face to face, in a bright eveningtopaugh!
it makes me feel sea sickto ask each other, pop the
question, in downright Englishall in each other's
hearing.'
`Shocking, was'nt it?' said Nick, peeping through
his fingers.
`I am not at all pleased with it,' said Mrs. A.
Mr. Arnauld shook his head. `I
am
,' said he. `It
is precipitate. But, I see no reason why, in such
times, people should not be precipitatenor, when
every hour is precious, why our children should
undergo
a formal courtship.'
`
Nor I
,' said Ellen, meeklyin a faint, timid voice
crossing her hands in her lap, and holding up her
head, like a little lady. `Just what I told themla,
said I'
`Hush! hush! don't expose yourself,' said Copely,
leaning over her chair, with his cast iron face.
VOL. II. 11*
`Ah!' You thereLord!think of theahem
and he is sure to appear.'
`
You
can never be alone, then,' said Copely.
`Never without
him
, of late,' she replied, nodding.
`Come, come children, no more of this,' said
Arnauld
,
his fine eyes lighting up as he spoke. `This
is no matter for trifling, no time for raillery. I do
not oppose your intention. I do not upbraid you for
your suddenness. You have known each other long
enough, to render it unnecessary for you to deliberate
much upon what, if you have not been altogether
children, you must have become prepared for. You
have known each other too intimately, I might add, for
common artifices of the world to have any weight with
you. I have been meditating much on the matter.
When do you leave us?'
`On Wednesdayearly.'
`So soon,' said Mrs. Arnauld, putting her beautiful
hands upon my shoulders, `so
soon
, my implacable
son-in-law! I would know more of you, if I could,
while your ancient kind manner is upon you.'
`On Wednesday?' said Mr Arnauld, musing. `Let
me see. Do you wish it private?'
`Assuredly!' said Copely; and I`assuredly!'
`I commend you for your discretion,' he replied.
`But there needs some preparation; not much, it is
truebut some. Mr. Sampson must be here; feeble
and disordered as he is. Don't weep, Ellenwe must
speak plainly. Your father shall be here; and the
good old Dr. Hastings, who would not sleep quietly in
his grave, if one of my children should be married
without his participation; we must give him another
Christmas dinner this year, and leave it to him to find
out the occasion. There is Mrs. Oadley too, your
mother, sir, who must be here. Parents can have no
representatives, in a duty so awful and tender as this.
And perhapsyou have a friend near us, I am told,
whom it has been (a deadly paleness shot over his face
as he proceeded) my misfortune; no, my wickedness
to offend. Shall we send for him? It may be the hour
of reconciliation.'
`Yes,' said I, impatiently, `for
him
and'
`Brother!' said Archibald, interrupting mewhile
Ellen glanced her blue eyes at him, with an expression
of intense alarm. `Yes, Mr. Arnauld, Arthur Rodman
shall
be here; and, I do not doubt that' (I could see
by his face, that he was thinking of Mary.)
I would have anticipated him, for I did not then
know his whole reason; but his forehead darkened
and he turned away his face; adding, carelessly`I
will see Arthur, andsee what can be done.'
`Will you take the chaise, Mr. Oadley,' continued
Arnauld, addressing me, `and bring up your mother.
Make what arrangements you please about her return.
But my motion is, that we had better occupy one house,
during your absence. I shall leave the city
immediately
;
and go back to the farm.'
My heart was too full to speak a word; and Clara,
as I went by her, and gave her my handcontributed,
not a little, to augment that fullness, for she said, with
a look that I shall never forget: `
Our
mother, dear
John, must not be left alone; she shall have one child
to watch over her and comfort her, whatever happen.'
`God bless you, Clara! God bless you!' said I,
hurrying to the window, where I heard Mr. Arnauld
give orders immediately, for the chaise; and saw
dispositions
making to fetch Mr. Sampson.
`What!' said Copely, striking me on the shoulder
`ruminating? or reconnoitering?'
I could not look round; but I took his hand, as I
would that of my own brotherand held it, in
silence.
`Would that we might have a third bridal,' said he?
`O, would heaven, that we might!' said a voice
near methe voice of Mrs. Arnauldfaint with
emotion.
`
Amen!
' echoed another at the window. It was
that of the father.
I turned, lest Archibald should have heard it; but
he was occupied with Lucia, upon a distant sofa. We
were all silent for a minute or two, watching their
countenances.
I felt a soft hand upon mine`might it not be? they
were made for each other?'
`True, true, dear Madam,' said Copely; his under
lip quivering as he spoke; `and, for that reason, I have
no hope. Let us not mention it. They are creatures
of their own mould. Their stature is not of this earth.
But yesterday, or the day before, Archibald would have
died, ere he had permitted the thought of such an event
to enter his heart. To day, he would die, and so would
she, I am sure, rather than hear the sound of it aloud.
`It is inconceivable' said Mrs. Arnauld, almost
sobbing; `so passionateso devotedso melancholy as
they are. O, if it
might
be; but, no, I dare not wish
it. Heaven's will be done! I'
`The chaise is ready, Sir,' said the servant,
popping
his head in at the door, and disappearing.
I bowed, awkwardly enough, I dare say, to all the
good people at once, and endeavoured to give an air of
pleasantry to my farewell, even of a few hours, a day
or two at most; but I could notfor, when my eyes
met those of Clara, I stopped: the bow was arrested
I was fain to take her dear hand, in mine, and lead her
to the door; where, without any body seeing it, I had
just time to put my mouth to her white forehead, and
spring into the chaise.
My motherO, how altered she was. The absent,
wandering, mournful darkness of her eyes had gone.
There was a lowly, obedient manner of resignation
now, in every movement; a quiet, unrepining, patient
spirit, that it did my heart good to see.
We were many hours togethermany of the happiest
that I ever spent in my life. Her womanly beauty was
not, even yet, utterly defaced; but there was a gravity,
and steadiness, or simplicity now, in all that she said
and did, altogether more worthy of her age than I had
ever seen. While I looked upon her dark, full eyes,
coal black lashes, and eyebrows black too, as the raven
her forehead just flushing, when she spoke, under the
thin grey hair, that mingled with the jetty black of her
plain parted tresses; there was a chastened, subdued
dignity in her face, that awed me. I never had
respected
her so tenderly. Misfortune had laid her hand
heavily upon my dear mother: her youthful vanity
her almost innocent pride of beauty, had been smitten
to the dust. The wind of desolation, had gone over her
dark tresses, and they were withered and blasted.
A shadow had fallen upon her majesty; the snow upon
her hairand her very eyes, were the eyes no longer
of a spoiled beauty, nor a delirious woman; but of the
widowed and desolate onebroken of heart and
contrite
in spirit.
We talked much and calmly of the past. She made
no complaint; but her voice was tremulous, when she
spoke of her desolation, and the kindness of Clara and
Lucia. They had been daughters to herand Mr.
Arnauld, heaven bless him for it! had personally
superintended
the erection of the buildings where we now
were.
She spoke of Arthur, and Marythe `poor dead
Mary.' I was amazed! thunderstruck! Could it be
possible that she had never heard of her being alive?
Yes, it was possible! and I found it necessary to
prepare
her for the intelligence, very gradually. Yet,
nevertheless, when it fell upon her, her eyes were fixed,
as with sudden death; and she put her hands to her
ears, as if the shriek of a woman were yet ringing there,
and gasped for breath. At last, however, the tears
gushed out, and she fell upon my bosom and sobbed,
and prayed, as if her heart were bursting with
gratitude
.
`O, my son!' she cried, `we have abused the
patience
of our Makerturned our faces away from him,
when he entreated asforgetful of all that remained
upon the earth. His ways, my boy, may be ways of
darkness; but, assuredly, (laying her hands upon her
heart, with all her strength,)
assuredly
, they are ways
of wisdom and peace. He
is
the husband of the widow,
and the father of the fatherless! Do not forget him.
Pray to himpray to him, forever, my child. For
he
hath compassion upon the sorrowing and abused.' Her
sobs were hysterical now, and she was obliged to rouse
herself, and leave me for a while.
I understood all her feelingall her thought; and
my heart stood still, at the sound of her voice. The
reproof
cut me to the heart. It wasO, I cannot deny
itit
was
true. We had not loved our mother as we
ought. We had seen some innocent vanities in her,
for she was certainly the finest looking woman of her
age in the country, except Mrs. Arnauld; and,
heaven
pardon us for it! we had overlooked her
affectionate
heart, steady principle, and undeviating rectitude.
At last, we were on our wayhaving left the house,
under the care of our aged and experienced overseer,
who had long been a tenant of my father's; and a
companion
of our family, till the irruption of the enemy,
when his house had been levelled even before our own;
and he, with a numerous family, had been driven out
into the cold world. He was a good man, and an
honest
one.
But why delay the story? We arrived on Tuesday
about noon, and found all the parties ready, except
Arthur, who was hourly expected; but, I observed that,
whenever I spoke of him, the eyes of Archibald, were
upon me, with a strong expression, until I could no
longer support it; and asked him the reason.
`Say nothing of Arthur,' said he, `wait till he
appears
.
Keep your eye upon Mr. Arnauld.'
His voice was cheerful; but, it was a cheerfulness
that distressed me more than all his sorrowing. It was
the look of desperate, calm effort and determination.
Lucia too, while she seemed utterly absorbed in the
bustle of preparation, was fearfully pale, and languid;
and, ever and anon, there was a slight shadow, and a
sort of heaving, that went over her face; the very flesh of
which, seemed to shiver at times, when no eye but
mine was upon her; and, to all the world, she appeared
to have no thought, but of the business in hand. Yet,
she breathed with difficultyand every breath was a
sigh; and, often and often, would her eyes fill; and
she would turn away her face, or drop it, as if to bite
off her threadwhen I could see, that she had hardly
the power left to raise it again.
My mother embraced her; and we were, if it were
possible, for human beings to be so, on this earth,
really
happy.
The lamps were lighted. The two brides were
ready
the
good parson about to stand up; sudden and
fitful interruptionsforced remarksand a painful,
solemn silence succeeding to each, had rung the
preparation
for every heart, when Archibald entered, and
announced the approach of Arthur, with a lady.
`A lady!' said several voices, at once.
`A lady!' said Mr. Arnauld.; `I am sorry for that.
We have carefully avoided inviting any body; and'
`Arthur will help to make a third couple,' said
Archibald, smiling.
`Ah! well, that may do very well. They will keep
each other in countenance. I am glad of it. But
what agitates you soand you, Ellen?tears! bless
me! one would think that our two girls were about to
be buried alive.'
`Pray,' said Ellen, stepping up to Archibald`is
she
prepared? I have some apprehensions for her.'
`Yes, Arthur has provided for that,' said my
brother
,
in a low voice.
The door opened, and Arthur Rodman entered, with
a veiled woman leaning upon his armtrembling
from excessive emotion, and literally clinging to him;
his forehead was uncovered; and, when he entered,
upon
my word, I do believe, that there was a general
exclamation
of surprise and pleasure. Arthur had grown
very handsome; and his usually calm features were al
in a blaze now, with expression.
Mr. Arnauld advanced, and offered him his hand,
which Arthur accepted, at the same time that Mrs.
Arnauld exclaimed.
`Dear Mr. Rodman, look at the lady! look!' She
had nearly fallen at the approach of Arnauld; but,
then she suddenly recollected herself, and threw back
her veil; Arnauld reeled to the wall, and stood
staring at her, as if she had been an apparition, with
his eyes set, and mouth open.
The sweat was upon his lip, and his look was that
of unutterable horrour and dismay. But the blood
came back to his heartrushing over his face, and
blinding him; and he fell into a chair, where he sat,
for some minutes, in the terrible silence that followed,
breathing like a half drowned man.
At length, he arose, and came forward; at first,
with a faltering step; but, as he came nearer, and
Ellen
had fallen with her eyes shut, into the arms of my
motherhis tread grew firmer.
He took his wife's hand.
`I do not ask,' said he, in a sepulchral voice; `by
what miracle this has been brought about. Enough
for me to believe, that it
is
. I amagreatly
bewildered
here, (putting his hand to his forehead.) but
look at me, Mary(attempting to take her hand; but
she shuddered at the touch, insensible as she was.)
`Mary,' said Arthur, `stand up, and face him. Stand
up, my beloved, and faint not. Why should the
innocent
and beautiful, quail before such men!Arnauld!'
`Nay, Rodman, let us not renew our hatred. What
has been done, cannot be undone. I am a penitent. I
leaned upon a spear. It wounded me. The wound
ranklesyet
.
Mary Austin, can you
will
you forgive me?
me!Frederick Crawford
.'
She burst into tears at the sound of that name, and
was speechless; she could not answer.
`Say that you forgive me,' said Arnauld, hurriedly,
`O, say it. I am growing old, Maryand my
deathbed
will be less painful, if the woman, that I have most
injured, will forgive me. Say that you forgive me! or,
if you cannot speak, sweet innocent, signify it, by
putting
your hand into mine.'
`May Ican I?' said Mary, just moving her lips,
and looking up into Arthur's face; `
may
I?'
`
May
you! loveyes, give him your hand, and wish
him well, here and hereafter.'
`Well then,' said Mary, timidly putting her hand
into his; `I do forgive you, Mr. Craw Mr.
Arnauld
.
I do, and may heaven forgive you, as truly! I
do not reproach you. You were not all to blamenot
all
IIcannot say any more. Dear ArthurII
the thought is hateful to me.'
`There! there!' said Arnauld, rising in all his
manhood
,
at once, and standing before his injured wife.
`There is a pattern for woman! That is the blessed
creature, of whom I told you; the truest and kindest;
the most affectionate, yet timid and trusting heart, that
ever beatexcept yours, my wife, (pressing his own
wife to his bosom,) and nowpeacepeace! to mine
own.'
`Mary AustinArthur Rodmanare you ready?'
Mary bowed her head meekly, as the clergyman
arose, and opened the book.
`And you Mr. Oadley? (Archibald stepped back;)
and you, my daughter? (Lucia stood more erect.) Are
you also ready?'
I took Clara's hand, and we advanced to the
appointed
place
`And you colonel? and you Ellen?'
`Not quite, said the incorrigible girl, `these plaguy
gloves,' tearing her hand through one of them, with a
petulant vivacity, that could not conceal her emotion.
`You tremble,' said Copely tenderly.
`Pho, phono such thing! there, deuce take the
glove! I'll be married without mittens.'
`Don't be frightened,' said Copely, soothingly, and
really distressed at her vivacity, for her lips trembled
incessantly, and her eyes ran over, whenever she shut
them.
VOL. II. 12
`Frightened! who's frightened? you must have been
dining out, man. Hush? the deed is doing. The
incantation
Lord,
how cold I feel!'
`Hush, yourself, you pestilent little baggage.'
But she would not let him proceed. The
clergyman
had just come to the word obey; and Mary had
just pronounced it, with a deep, sweet emphasis.
Ellen pointed at her. `Do you believe,' said she,
loud enough to be heard by all of us; `do you believe
that I am going to tell that lie?
obey!I
obey?
whom!you! no. I shan't promise any such thing.'
`I'll make you,' said Copely.
`How?'
`Choke you.'
`How?'
`With kisses.'
`Faugh!'
`Come,' said Mr. Arnauld, `come, colonel, it is
your turn, now.'
Copely stepped forward, and would have taken her
beautiful hand; but her distress was getting too
evident
to be concealed.
`Lord, what a fumbler!' she cried, shaking from
head to foot, and pale as death.
`There's a dreadful ringing in my ears,' said
Copely
,
softly, as the clergyman moved to his place.
`There
will
be, if you don't hold your tongue,' said
Ellen, raising her hand.
`How bright your eyes are, Nell!'
`I'll tell you what it is, Chester Copely,' said she,
looking him up in the face, while her colour came and
went, like flashes of fire over alabaster, for a moment;
`you will break my heart, if you are not more serious.'
His countenance fell, instantly;
his
eyelids
quivered
;
and he held her hand to his lips. But not a word
did they hearnot a word, I am sure; for, when the
clergyman paused for the response, she looked up, as
if starting from a trance, in the prettiest confusion
imaginable
.
`Love, honour and obey,' said the parson.
`Lovehonourand, (glancing maliciously at
Copely
)`ahemOO'
`Love, honour and
obey
,' repeated the clergyman,
seriously and emphatically.
She hitched forward her pretty shoulder pettishly;
and Copely began to prepare his lips for the threat, by
wiping them with his cuff.
`Obey! obey! obey!' cried the mad girl, rising on
tip-toe, and laughing faintly, as if her very heart were
breaking.
The ceremony was over; and Copely was about to
offer the salutation of love, when the clergyman put in
his claim.
`Stop, Sir,' said Copely, gravely; `that woman is
my wife, now. I will have no manand no minister,
the last of all men, profaning her lips, now!'
We all stood thunderstruck.
`I have trifled hitherto,' said Copely, walking two
paces forward, `for there was no other way to win
her. But, henceforth, she is minemine, forever and
everin peril and in death! Shame on the man, shame
on him! who, under the sacredness of his office, is the
first to teach to the young bride, a familiarity with the
lips of a man
not
her husband. No, SirI honour
your office. I love my Maker: and I can worship, as
profoundly as any man, at his altarswhere the wind
is blowing through my hair, and the stars shining down
upon me. But, I have so little reverence for the
infirmities
of a priest; so little compassion for
his
weaknesses;
so much of a deadly hostility to his temptation, that I
would strangle you Sir
you
upon the spot, sooner
than you should touch the
forehead
of my wife.'
You are amazedall are terrified
all!
even
Archibald
,
who knows me best; even Ellen, my own, my
wedded
one. You do not know me. You could not. Look at
this scar: for ten years it has been bleeding inwardly
yet, I never told it. I have deeper ones, that bleed
yet. Come hither, Ellennearer, love. This
wedding
of ours, shall leave an impression upon your young
heart, that no time shall efface. Hear me. I loved you
once. You scorned memocked at me; and then,
after
I had won my way, by opennesss and manhood,
into
your heart, you forgot me, and shut the gate upon
me, the moment that my back was turned. I loved you
mightily. I swore to be revenged. Yet, hear me
through. You know not the man whom you have made
a lord over you. Archibald stand back! Arthur
Rodman
,
I will have no interference! Mr. Arnauld, your
eyes cannot intimidate me. Hear me through. To
win that girlyoung man!if you do not wish to see
blood spilt upon the spot, stand back! and, when I
have done, strike. Your sister shall judge me. For
nine years, I have battled against her dominion. For
three, I have done violence to my whole nature
counterfeiting
all passionsfeigning festivity, when my
heart was breakingshutting myself up, from all
mankind
,
when my very spirit yearned for communion
why?'
`To BE REVENGED!'
I pursued another. I gave into a deception, that I
hated. From the first to the last, I loved you Ellen,
with all my heart and soul; and, till I saw your
magnanimous
nature, in the affair between Lucia Arnauld
and myself, I never relented, nor waveredmy whole
aim was to bring you to my feet, and thenbreak your
heart, and leave you.'
We shuddered. The creature was awful. `But'his
voice changedtrembled. The tears gushed into his
eyesand he folded her hands to his heart, while she
stood leaning against Mr. Arnauld, like one struck
suddenly
mad. `But, that was impossible. My stern
heart wept. I began to love you devoutly, and with a
kinder spirit. With that spirit, I love you now, Ellen.
Henceforth, I have done with all trifling. It is
unworthy
of me; with vengeance, for your heart, love, is not
a fit companion for one, where that devil is closetted.
Look up dear! look up, and bless me! Here is your
last trial. I have counterfeited a character, that is not
my own. But, I have not counterfeited a better one
than my own. Your happiness is securemy love
unalterable
.
And this, (kissing her forehead,)
this
be the
pledge, that, henceforth, happen what will, you will
never hear or see aught of this temper again.'
The poor girl shook her head, and attempted to
stand up; but her strength had gone. It was a minute
or two, before she could speak; and, when she did, it
was only to say:
`You frightened me sadly, ChesterI thought
of Blue Beardthe wolf, in Little Red Riding Hood,
all the while that you stood there.'
`Poor simpleton,' said Copely, `will nothing make
you serious?'
`Yes.'
`What, I pray?'
`Why, now, that we are married, if
you
will only
be very agreeable and frivolous for a while.'
`The mere spirit of contradiction then?'
`Whyyaaobeside, to tell you the truth,
it sits so awkwardly upon you, that I feel ashamed
of it.'
`O, Ellen!' said Copely, `you are incorrigible, I
am afraid. But, let me entreat you, once for all, dear,
not to dishonour your noble heart, and excellent
understanding
,
so frequentlyand'
`Upon my word,' said Ellen, colouring, `are you
serious?'
`Veryvery serious.'
`And you do believe then, in soberness, that I am
neither a fool, nornora creature of no feeling?'
`Yes.'
`Then, why have you treated me so, continually, as
if I were. Copelymy husband! You have said,
that we do not know you. I believe it. But, you do
not know
me
no, not
me
. Come to me, as a man;
treat me as a woman; neither flatter, nor coax, nor
teaze meandlord! there's no knowing what a
spartan I shall become! What are you laughing at?
I can't open my lips, but your gravity vanishes, like a
spectre, so that I am fain to talk foolishly and
flippantly
,
VOL. II. 12*
lest I shall look silly. Come, this appears to be a
general reckoning day. I have a secret to tell you.
Treat me like a woman of sense, and I will try to
deserve
it.'
`Ellen! upon my soul,
that
remark of your'sthat
little, short remark, carries more comfort to
my
heart
more security than all that I have ever heard you say
in your life. O, hang it, you cannot be serious.'
`But,' said the clergyman, `there is another couple.'
`True,' said Copely, `I beg ten thousand pardons.
I had quite forgotten. Ellen, let us step aside, and
give others a chance.'
I glanced at her face; it was a bright crimson.
`Not another step!' said she, `there! they are
ready.'
`What! you do not surely mean to look on, and
watch how they undergo the ceremony?' said Copely,
moving off.
`Indeed I do,' said she.
`Perverse and'
`Barbarian!' she replied, gently, yielding to him,
as he drew her to the window seat.
This was the last that I saw. My heart was giddy.
I felt a painful rush of blood through the channelling of
my temples; and, though I was told afterward, that I
went through the ceremony with exceeding steadiness,
yet I knew nothing of it, till I felt my lips throbbing
against Clara's.
She was full of dignity and seriousness;
exceedingly
pale, but firm, and collected; devout, and prepared.
The clergyman paid me a remarkable compliment, I
remember, when he was through.
`You have thought more of this ceremony, and of its
great obligation,' said he, `than all the people that I
ever married. May heaven bless you!'
`Ah! a horseman!' cried Mr. Arnauld, `what is
the meaning of this?'
We all crowded to the window, and saw Archibald
dismount. We had not missed himand Lucia, where
was she?'
The next moment, he enteredhis hair all in
disorder
his
forehead covered with sweathis deep blue
eyes strangely disordered in their lustre.
He bowed hastily, and said something, in the way of
apology for leaving ussomething, that none of us
could understand, or recollect, after he had gone;
glanced rapidly round the room, as if in search of
somebody
`Lucia,' said he, `where is she?'
`Here I am,' said Lucia, stepping forward, from the
corner, where, hidden by the heavy curtains, she had
set for one hour, concealed from our observation.
Her step was singularly firm: her carriage haughty.
`Will you favour me with the conversation which
you promised?' said Archibald, advancing toward
her, and offering her his hand.
`Assuredly,' she replied; `but are
you
ready? is all
prepared?all!'
`All,' said Archibald.
`Follow me, for a moment, then,' said she. `
Mother
,
I shall not be gone long.'
Her hand was upon the door, as she said this; and
her mother, struck by the preternatural steadiness of
her manner, advanced a step or two, as if to address
her.
`No, my dear mother,' said the haughty girl, her
sweet lips parting with a mournful smile, no, it is
impossible
we
must be alone.'
A bright colour flashed over the eyes of Mr. Arnauld;
and he exchanged a glance of disquieted, earnest
pleasure
with his wife, as the door shut upon them.
They had been gone about ten minutes, though it
appeared
much longer, for we were breathless in our
expectation
;
trying, in vain, to start some subject for
talking; but not one of us had our thought or senses
sufficiently at our command, to understand any thing
whatever. At last, all at once, we heard a sharp cry,
as if a dagger had been driven, through and through, a
human heart: a cry that froze our bloodit thrilled
through every apartment of the house. We sprang from
our seatsthe women screamed, and we burst open the
door, through which Archibald and Lucia had passed.
The great doors, that opened into the hall, from the
portico, were wide open; the lamps blazing; and, at
the foot of the steps, there stood a horse, saddled and
bridled, with the gate open behind him.
While I was wondering at the signs of preparation
below, somethingto me, it appeared like a spectre,
starting out of the solid wallcame, staggering out of
the darkness, athwart the hall. It was Archibald.
The room behind him, the walls beyond, were all
black as midnight. The light of the lamps could not
penetrate so far.
It was all the work of a moment. As he approached
me, aiming blindly toward the portico, I pronounced
his name, with a sensation of unutterable alarm; but
he heard me not. His hair stood upright. There was
blood upon his lipsand sweat upon his forehead, as
he went by me, with his eyes wide open, without seeing
me.
I know not what followed, for a minute or twoI
was like one suddenly deprived of all motion and life.
The whole family rushed into the room opposite; a
loud and general shriek followedand, the next
moment
,
while I was groping my way to their aid, hardly
conscious of what I was doing, I encountered Mr.
Arnauld, staggering under the body of a woman;
(it was Lucia;) the mother and all the family
following
,
like distracted creatures.
Archibald passed onin the general consternation;
descended the steps; leaped into the saddle; and was
gone, ere any other voice, than, that of wail and
lamentation
was heard.
I had only time to see, as Copely turned fiercely
round, and ordered
his
horse, that blood was upon
Lucia's hands, and a print upon her forehead as of
bloody lipswhen
WhenO, righteous heaven! she opened her eyes,
locked her white hands, grasped for breath, and then
fainted away again.
Her distracted father bore her awayfollowed by
my mother and hers, and my wife; while I, God only
knows what had been my thoughtI cannot recall
them, but they were very terrible, so terrible, that,
when I saw Copely bare headed in the saddlewith
his holsters over his armI could have cheered him
onward, to the massacre of my only brother.
The whole house was in an uproar, the servants
running hither and thither, and we, utterly unable to
control them.
A trampling of hoofs followedand a horse, with
the reins loose, and saddle turned, came thundering
into the court, the fire flashing from the pavement, like
a rocket, at every blow of his irons.
`Whose horse!' said I`not Copely'sis it?'
`No Sir,' said a servant`it is not the Colonel's;
I gave him the parson's, as
he
stood ready tackled.'
`Merciful heaven,' said the good man. `I tremble for
the consequences! But, let us be prepared.'
`
Joy! joy! joy!
' rang a dozen voices, all at once,
from the top of the stairs.
We crowded to the place; and fell upon our knees.
The blessed Lucia was herself againunwounded,
unhurt; the blood upon her face, and handsshe knew
not whence it came. She was rationaland told us
that we had seen Archibald, she believed, for the last
time.
A new horrour took possession of us. The
composure
of her tone was too unnatural, too calm, for
aught but settled despair. Was it his bloodthen
his?
that we had seen? and by whom shed?
`Ah! Copely! are you hurt?'
`No!' he repliedshaking the dust from him, but
where is Rodman? what is the meaning of this? why,
is he not in the saddle? Ha! Rodmanmount! mount!
and away. Take your pistols, and if you get as near
him as I didmind your reins before you fire. Bring
him in, dead or alive. The murderer! I should have
brought him down, but for that cursed horse.'
`Man,' said I`laying my hand upon his shoulder.
I am Archibald Oadley's brother. What have you
done?'
`Risked committing murder; risked breaking my
neck; risked covering myself with the blood of a brave
man, the dearest friend on earththat I might bring
a murderer to justicepoor Lucia!'
`What have you
done
, Copely?' said I, collecting all
my breath, and all my strength, to hurl him from the
steps, if he answered me, as I expected. `Did you
overtake
Archibald.'
`Almost, and called to him, again and again; but,
he rode on, gallopping as if the avenger of blood were
at his heels; and my horse became unmanageableand
I, hoarse from shoutingand'
`At last, I lost my patience`stop! Archibald
Oadley
,'
I cried, `stop! or, by the God of my fathers, I
will bring you down with a pistol bullet! I was near
enough, almost, to grapple with him once, but he
saw nor heard me.'
`I levelled'
`And fired?' said Iraising my arm
`And
fired!
' said the cold hearted man, without
moving a limb, or retreating one inch from the blow.
`Did he fall?' said I, delaying it.
`Not immediately,' he replied`butha, what is
the meaning of this? Are you all mad?'
`Answer me,' I replied, `before I strike you dead at
my feet'
`
You!
Oadley!
you
strike me dead! I pity you.
But, you are his brother. He is safe. I saw him,
holding on his waylong after I fired. He many thank
my horse for it, though, and the holsters over my arm;
for, the moment that I fired, he reared, stumbled and
threw me, head over heels, into the dirt.'
`Do you know,' said I, almost choking, with the
thought of Archibald's escape; and Copely's tooI
may say, for, had he wrought Archibald's doom, I
should have slain him, I am sure. `Do you know
that Lucia is safe? uninjuredunwounded?'
`Merciful heaven! Oadleywhat! butDo you
dare to trifle with me? Speak! speak! is she not
wounded? speak!'
`No
no
,' I repeated`rash man, she is notbut
God only knows if my brother be not.'
Our distress was inconceivable, for a timebut
Arthur returned, at last, with the intelligence that
Archibald had been seen, in the company of a strange
man, riding toward the woodin the same attitude
still at full speed, but sitting upright, sustaining
himself
in the saddle as no mortal man could, if he were
wounded. This gave us comfort; but, our wedding
night was one of sorrow. All the darkness through,
we were walking about, husbands and wives, like
creatures that have been shipwrecked, and wait for the
light of morning, to know where they are.
And, when the day light came, it was bluish,
frightful
and cold; so that, as I was preparing to mount my
horse, and go in pursuit of my poor brother, dreading
now, the disorder of his intellect, rather than any
bodily calamityI felt weighed to the earth with
apprehension
;
and I was hardly in the saddle, when one
of the servants cried out, from an upper window, that
over looked the high road, that a man on horseback
was riding toward the house.
A minute more, and he was visible to me. He was
a young countryman; and, the moment that he entered
the yard, he gave me a dirty paper, which appeared to
be the tattered leaf of a book. Upon it, was scrawled,
in the hand writing of Archibald, these words.
`Be happy. Do not alarm yourself about me; tell
our mother that I shall go to the army; and not
return
tilltillthe war is over. Farewellfarewell.
Heaven bless you allArchibald.
P. S. I am very well this morning. Farewell!'
`How did he look?' said I, to the man.
`Look! Sir? don't know, sirkind o' smiledand
I a'most cried to see him.'
Poor Archibald!he never smiled again.
CHAPTER IX.
`The tender blue of her large loving eye,
`Grew frozen, with its gaze on vacancy.'
Just
as we were rising from our dinner, on Tuesday,
a letter was put into Copely's hand, saying that we
should not be wanted for a week; that our furloughs
were all extended for ten days; and beseeching us not
to lose the occasion, by hurrying away from all that
was dear to usperhaps forever. It was not in the
hand writing of Archibald; but there was an authority
within, signed by Washington himself, upon which,
was an endorsementthat we knew.
That
was by
Archibald. `
Love to all the family
,' it said. `Be with
us any time before ten days. Pulaski's legion are off;
and we are ordered for the south.'
Judge of our emotionwe had set, mournfully, all
the day long beside each other, like people, who can
count the moments of their happiness. Our hearts were
full, and our eyes reeled in their lustre, as we arose,
and struck hands, and embraced all around.
Let us hurry over these ten days. They were the
happiest of my whole life; days of deep feeling, quiet
love; and confidence, so holy and pure; tenderness,
so still and hushed, that, when I recur to the memory
of them now, in my forlornness and abandonment, my
heart feels warm again; and, if I shut my, eyes, I can
feel the wet lips of Clara upon my forehead, trembling
there; and, my arm encircling herO, Clara!
peace to thy shadow, love. Thou art very dear to me.
At last, the morning came; not the tenth morning
but the eighth; for, happy as we were, husbands as we
were, we had not forgotten the duty of a soldier; and
our horses were already pawing the green turf under
the open windows; and snorting, gallantly, to the
wind.
Imagine that you see us; three stout men and true,
nay, four; two, of a very lofty stature; and two. Arnold
and Copely, not tall, but moving with an air of
irresistible
authority; old Mr. Sampson recovering a little,
and leaning on his crutches at the open door, that
looked into the yard, his white hair blowing about his
keen eyes and red facelike a thin vapour about a
bed of coals; my dear mother and Mrs. Arnauld; and
three brides, with Nick, full of heart and glee, teasing,
first one, and then, the otherall huddled together, half
sobbing, and half smiling, the lofty Clara, in the
middle of them, like a queen among her maidens,
looking
out upon her husband, as he prepared to vault into
the saddle, the roguish eyes of Ellen beautifully dashed
with a timidity, that keeps them continually upon the
earth, while her parted lips appear constantly opening
for a sally, that she can find no voice to utter; Mary,
the soft, gentle, patient Mary, with her quiet eyes
roving continually after the form of Rodman, while
the colour flashes over her transparent forehead, every
time that she meets his. It was a picture full of beauty
and meaning.
`But where is Lucia?' said I`I promised to see
her this morning.'
`She is waiting for you,' said her mother`really I
forgot it.' So, I hurried off, and found the dear girl,
sitting at the window, with a large shawl wrapped
round her.
`You will see Archibald,' said she, `give him that
lock of hair. He will prize it. You need have no
fear that he will not. I know his heart. He knows
mine, now. Watch over him, my brother; you
are
my
brother now, I feel it. Take the blessing of your sister
her last, it may be, dear John.'
VOL. II. 13
`A
sister!
'O, I could have fallen on my knees, and
wept in her lap; the name of a sister was so sweet to
me; so new and pleasant.
`Comfort your brother. You know not, you never
can know, what a blow has fallen upon him. Tell him,
however, that I shall do as I promised; love him,
forever
;
respect him, foreverweep, forever and ever,
that we may not be nearer to one another than we now
are.'
`But why not?' dear Lucia, `why not?' I cried,
catching her handheaven and earth! how her face
altered.
`Because,' said she`I love Archibaldlove him,
O, man! with what truth and sublimityyes, the
sublimity
of devotion! for that reason we can never meet.'
I looked at her. Her eyes were strangely bright;
but, her voice, broken as it was, had meaning in it
and reason. Was she disordered? I knew not. I only
knew that she was unintelligible. We parted;
embraced
partedwith
our tears upon each others
cheeks; Clara toodear,
dear
Clara! thy tears are
there yet.
We parted. Enough. We were soon in camp.
`Brother!' said Archibald, throwing himself into
my arms, with a sob that shook his whole frame,
almost to dislocation`Brother!'
I understood him, but too well. I looked at him;
and pressed him to my bosom. Poor Archibald. It
was too late. I had seen many fearful changes in my
daymany! many in his countenance, that had
terrified
me; but, none that resembled this that I now
saw. He was wan as if he had risen from the bed of
death, his temples sunken, his lips blue; and his eyes
beautifully bright and thoughtful.
`Your hair is very wet, brother'said I, as he
leaned against my face.
`I believe so,' he answered, mildly`of late it has
been so, night and day.' `But'(looking me wistfully
in the face)`you are happyall are happy,
all!
'
`Not
all
,' said Iputting the lock of hair into his
hand.
`What is this, brother?' said he, opening it with a
hand that appeared to move of its own will. `Hair!
whose hair. Brother! in what spirit was it given?
not in mockery I hopeI trustI
believe
.'
`Nono, Archibald; but after she recovered.'
`No matter for that, pass over that. I know all
about her recovery. I thought her dead.'
I repeated her message.
`God forever bless her for it!' he said, the tears
starting out under his compressed eye lids. `O, brother
let me lean on you. I am very laint. There is not
such a woman upon this earthso loftyso'
`Then why abandon her, Archibald?'
`Why? look at me.'
I did, and was terrified: his eyes shot fire; and were
blood shot, with the convulsion that my words had
called up.
`II'(his voice grew faintergentlerhe put
his hands upon his heart.) `BrotherI
love
her; she
is a noble creature. Let that testimony comfort her.
She has done most nobly. I venerate her; love her
the hand of death is upon me.'
I would have rebuked him, for what he said; but I
could not. I had not the heart to contradict him. It
was too true. The hand of death
was
upon him.
`Ah, Copely!'(He entered abruptly.)
`Archibald,' said the untractable man, as he put out
his hands to him`do not curse medo notI cannot
bear it.'
`Say no more, my excellent friend,' said Archibald.
`I understand you. You are a good shotsee here,'
(raising the flap of his coat, and showing where the
ball had gone through.) `You would certainly have
brought me from the saddle, had you been upon your
own horse. Not another word about it. I know it all
and forgive you; nay, do not even blame you
except
for missing your mark.'
`Your voice is very much altered,' said Copely
`and you are wasted, wonderfully, since we parted, I
but no, I will not ask. There is my handif I can
do any thing for you, say so. If notthere is only one
wayhear it. Where is Pulaski?'
`Gone south'
`And we are to follow, are we not?'
`We, of the horse, are detailed; and, perhapsyou
can exchange, as you are so fond of fighting.'
`I beg your pardon Oadley. I am not fond of
fighting
;
no man likes it, less; but, just now, I begin
have some qualms.'
`Vapours,' said Archibald, with a sickly smile
`you are newly married.'
`And,' said Copely`I do not much care to expose
that little witch to widowhoodnor to a troop of
bayonets'
`What mean you? your wife does not go withyou?'
`No, not in personbut in spirit, I believepoor
little puppet! She has become quite rational of late,
and I should be sorry to part with her.'
`Hourra! for the major!' cried Jasper, galloping
up to us`hourra for the legion.! we are off, at
daylight.'
`I am glad of it,' said Archibald, fervently; and we
immediately separated, each to arrange his arms, shake
hands with a few brave fellows, and receiving their
congratulations
.
`We must put you in the front rank,' said La Fayette
`you three bridegrooms would carry all before you.
It was a rash affair, I think; but, you will fight the
better for itif that be possible.'
We were soon upon the march, in a cloud of dust;
and never rested or halted, a single hour beyond what
our cattle required, until we encountered Pulaski
himself
;
and were paraded in front of General Lincoln's
tent, before Savannah, in Georgia.
The Count D'Estaings had just arrived, with a
formidable fleet; and the British, on the station, had
fled, like birds before the fowler; leaving three of
their ships in his power.
His army, about three thousand strong, were just
arranging themselves at Beaulieu; and, on the
fifteenth
of September, we were brought up, at full
gallop
by the unconquerable Pole. Lincoln was behind;
and endeavoring, with all his power, to effect a junction
preparatory to an attack upon General Prevost, the
enemy's Commander in Savannah.
Till the twenty-third, we were in a state of
continual
preparation; Pulaski dashing, hither and thither,
night and day, with his men; and exercising them,
forever, in the broadsword; and Archibald, with the
same death struck countenance, mingling impatiently
in all the storm of preparation, as if to drown the
suffering
within him. Still, the moment of the town's reduction
appeared distant, very distantyet, without an
hour's intermission, for several days and nights, there
was one uninterrupted roll of thunder, from the cannon
of the enemy and ourselvesnearly two hundred pieces
in all. And often, while Archibald and I were treading
the rounds, in the deep midnight, we would be covered
all at once, with sand; or, made to reel with the wind
of an exploding bumb or passing cannot ball; till, at
last, it was really wonderful how unaffectedly careless
we became. The whole sky was in a blaze, at times;
and, many an hour, have I seen the smoke from the
enemy's south western battery, rushing all white, upon
the wind, like that of ten thousand furnaces, with a
perpetual gushing of brilliant flame through it; and
heard the tremendous noise of the cannon below; and
the heavy, dull, earthquake sound, of a bomb, high in
the blue air, lumbering through the skyand passing,
star after star, like a rebellious planetstruck from its
orbit.
`We are to storm the works,' cried Archibald,
rushing
into my arms, one morning. `And Pulaski swears
that he will ride into them, on horseback, if we will
follow him.'
`Follow him!' said I, `that will Ibut
when?
'
VOL. II. 13*
`Tomorrowimmediately,' he replied. The French
admiral is afraid of his shipsthe hurricane season is
at handthe British swarming from their station in
the West-Indies. In short, we are to carry the works
to-morrowsword in hand. Ha!you turn pale,
brother
this
comes of getting married!'
`It does,' said I`it does. But I shall do my duty.
Poor Clara!'
`Forgive me, brother,' said he, grasping my hand.
`I would fain find some consolation for my own
barrenness
.
How young I am! a mere boy; yet, how
long, how painfully long and weary hath been my life!
O, brother, brother! I have outlived all hopeall
even the wish to live. The stern, dull, heavy
wretchedness
of life, that weighs and bears upon us, like a
cearment of leadIIno, brother, I cannot talk
about it. All that I know, all that I
can
know,
is
that,
while I do live, I will try to do rightly, but I care not
how soonno, no!I may be wanted no more on earth.
This very night brothersinful as I am---I could lie
down to sleep quietly, and happy, if I knew that I
should never wake again. Shame on these tears. I
am
ashamed of them; yet, I cannot help them. I must
weepfor my heart is young, brother, very young,
and it is awful for a young heart like mineto be so
loaded downto the very earth. Iyeaweep with
me; unmanly as it is, I cannot help it. I meant to
live, and I hoped to die, without one murmur of
complaint
.
But I cannot. It is not in human nature, to
shut our eyes upon all the beautiful things of this world
with that deadly indifference to them all, which I
feel, without a mortal terrour and sickness, that will
have way, in tears. I do not wish to live; I do not
fear to die. Young as I am, I am weary of life. The
sun is hateful to me. The happiness of others, of them
that I must love, hath ceased to make my heart warm;
and why should I live? I tremble at these symptoms;
the more, because the time has been, when it was my
comfort, and my religion, to believe that, if I could see
others happy, others, that I loved, I could not but be
happy myself. I was mistaken. I have a colder heart;
a worse one; a more selfish disposition than I ever
believed; the happiness and suffering of others have
no longer any influence upon me. I am angry and
peevish with their sorrow; and wrath with their
childish
happiness. I cannot dwell upon it.Alas, brother
I rejoice that the battle is near. I hope that it
will be my last---my very lastyetGod's will be
done!'
Never shall I forget the tone, in which those words
were pronounced; never, the look of patient,
unrepining
fortitude, with which they were accompanied. It
was the eighth of October, about eleven at nightand
such a night! so hushed and brilliant with the
innumerable
swarming of fire flies: an awful stillness all
about the camp, partly of preparation, (for we had
resolved
to storm the works by daylight,) and partly of
terrour; for we had already been broken in upon by
two or three spirited sorties. There was a something
in the air too, as we lay along upon the fresh grass;
and felt it moving through our hair, that made us feel
mournfully. Archibald's pale forehead was upturned
to the starlight, and his wet eyes shining, as I never
saw them shine before; my bosom torn upon, for the
heat had been intolerable, and I would fain have slept,
till the trumpet called us to the assault. A strange
drowsiness was upon mewithin meas if soft lips
were whispering about my naked heart.
`Brother,' said Archibald, after a long silence,
putting
his hand upon mine, and leaning his elbow on the
turf. `I am ashamed of myself. Even now, alone as
we are, with none to see me, I cannot bear the
upbraiding
of my own heart. I have been wonderfully
weak. Thank you for that pressure. It reassures
me. I look about me again, with new feeling. There!
that cannon, the first that we have heard for an hour;
even that has a pleasant sound to me.'
The ball passed directly over our heads.
`We had better move further down the bank,' said
he, changing his position; `another ball, from the same
elevation, make strike lower.'
I followed him, with a mournful, strange, yet
pleasant
feeling about me; one that I would not have
given
up, for much that the world calls happiness. His
thought was in the right train. The sublimity of the
hourthe growing darkness: for the heavy fog began
to roll in, like the ocean, before a sea breezeand the
wind rose
`It is very awful,' said he, in a low, thoughtful
voice, `to sit up at an hour like this, and contemplate
the great heaven, all of such solid blue, passing away
over our heads, so tranquilly! so beautifully! and to
have our hearts jarred, in their worship, by the roll of
cannon, or the sudden bursting of a bomb.'
A second ball struck the works a little at our right,
dismounted a piece of large ordnance, shattered the
carriage into fifty pieces, and tore several human
creatures
,
limb from limb. A loud shrieking followed, for
full a minute. Gracious God! how fearful it is! `
brother
,'
said Archibald, `when the blood is coolthe air
so still, and the stars so patiently looking down upon
us, to hear the blood rattling at our feet; and know
that the very sound which has passed over
our
heads, harmlessly, has carried an immortal creature,
maimed and broken into the presence of his God.'
`Let us remove further off,' said I, `we can be of no
use. I see by the lights there, that they are bearing
three or four bodies off.'
Another shot passed over us; and, instantly the
lights were extinguisheda crash followeda loud,
terrifick outcry rang, through and through, our heads;
and we saw the whole cavalcade tumbled together
the living, the dead, and the wounded.
`The same gun,' said Archibald, `a little more, or
a little less powder, has done all this terrible work.
They that came, with unthankful hearts, to bear away
their dead comrades, have fallen with them! Awful
the bearers and the bodythe living and the dead,
have fallen before us! Hush! they are in motion.'
He was right. Our army had already put itself
forward
;
and we could hear the tread of their feet, like
the noise of a great ocean breaking, wave after wave,
afar off, upon an interminable solid beach.
In the mean time, it had grown very dark; and,
through the deep fog that blew in our faces and
assembled
about us, the shadows of men appeared of
unearthly
stature.
`Here they are!' cried a voice that we knew; and,
the next moment, down leaped a pair of giants, as they
appeared, and ran to us.
`Archibalddear Archibald!' cried Arthur, `now
for it! to horse! to horse! Pulaski's calling for you.'
`Away! away!' cried Copely, embracing him;
`away! my brave fellow, and if we never meet again,
why God, forever, bless the survivors.'
`Amen!' we responded, `amen! amen!'
`And the dead too,' said Archibald. `God be
merciful
to them too.'
`Amen! amen! amen!' echoed several voices;
where, we had not time to enquire, for, Archibald's
horse stood stamping the platform at a little distance.
`Brother!' said he, taking leave of me, last, `
farewell
!
I shall do my dutydo you, yours.'
I saw no more of him; but Arthur was conspicuous
to the last.
We moved on, in the darkness, through a sunken,
deep hollow, which permitted us to approach very near
to the enemy's lines, without being perceived. It was
near day light, and uncommonly cold for the season;
probably owing to the heavy fog, and the exhalation
from an extensive morass, on the very verge of which,
we were marching.
We had depended much on surprising the enemy, and
had good reason to believe that the quarter, upon
which we moved, was the weakest; but, in both
calculations
,
we were mistaken, for a deserter had betrayed
our design; and a tremendous cannonade opened upon
us, the very moment that the head of our column
showed
itself. The sky shook over our heads; and the
horses stumbled at every step, as if the earth itself were
unsteadied by the roar. But the column kept on, under
Sullivan and D'Estaing, turning neither to the right
nor left, and broke through their entrenchments, in a
cloud of smoke and fire; at the point of the bayonet
charging their artillerymen at their pieces, and
bayonetting
them, in all directions, without firing a shot.
`Hourra!' cried the Americans, `hourra! the day is
our own!'
Up went two or three flags, in a blaze of light;
dripping with blood, and tore with the thunder of
battle
.
But the day was not our own! The enemy rallied
on the left, and came down upon our brave fellows,
like a hurricane. The flags shookand hundreds of
human creatures that battled under them, French and
Americans, and English, leaped, headlong, into the
ditch.
`Now for it! my boys! now for it!' shouted
Pulaski
.
`Hourra for Pulaski! hourra! hourra!' answered his
legion, and followed him, one after the other, into the
entrenchments during the pause of terrour that
followed
the cry, like a battalion of devils. Pulaski was the
first man. How he got in, heaven only knows; but I
tried three times, before I could follow him; and, for
five minutes, it appears to me, that he and not more than
a dozen men of his troop were sustaining the whole
battle
within the line. At length, in came the whole troop,
man and horsePulaski's sword flashing before them,
like a pillar of fire.
He was too conspicuous; his great white horse was
a target, and the bullets fell upon him like a storm of
hail.
I saw him, when he fell. He was standing up in the
stirrups, and I saw a tall fellow reeling before him;
when, all at once, his great white stallion snorted, as
if his heart had broke, leaped, all clear, of a hundred
bayonets, at once! and Pulaski fell back in the
saddle
,
still holding on by his knees, while the saddle-cloth
trailed in blood, and his charger broke forward,
trampling
down every thing that opposed him, till he came
to an empty enclosure, where we were endeavouring
to rally about him. There his horse staggered; sat
upon his haunches, (like the animal that you may have
seen in the picture of
St. Paul's Conversion
, when
God pours down a beam of glory upon him,) quaking
planted, and ready to drop deadthe blood
gushing
out of his nostrilsandI saw no more. We
were all in a heap together, I was bayonetted, I know
not in how many placesand all that I do know, is,
that I cried out, to a man for quarter, in the desperation
of my heart, as my sword broke at the hilt, and my
horse stumbled into a platoon of bayonets; but the
wretch heeded not my cry.
I was unwilling to die so. I thought of Clara; it
was my last thoughtand, the next moment, I felt the
blood rushing out of
his
throat into my bosom.
`When I came to my senses, there was a cold mass
of coagulated deformity, shapeless and horrible,
pressing
against my face. I shuddered, and tried to release
myself; but, I could not. My hands were stiffened
about it. God of heaven! it was a human face!
Omy heart discharged all its blood, at the thought!
I shut my eyes, and groaned aloud, in loathing and
terrourbut I could not release my fingers from the
throat, they were so cramped and rigid with
convulsion
.
No! though a broken sword was in my side,
and my clothes were stiff with my own gore. I
could
not. They were rigid as iron.
At last, however, just when I was shutting my eyes,
I did hope, for the last time, some blessed human
creature
,
tore away my hands from the detestable shape,
and dragged me away, over the shattered limbs, dead
bodies, and struggling horses, as if to throw me into
a ditch. I groaned; for I could do no more: and he
stoppeddeliberately took up a gun, with a bayonet,
near me, and put it to my heart. I felt the point
I felt it! the inhuman devil! He was cooly searching
for my heart! I came, instantly, to my senses. I
grasped the bayonet with my hands; and held it,
despite
of all his struggles, till in our tumbling and
turning, it came off. I was desperate. The noise of
strife had gone bythe fog was clearing off. The sun
shone about me; and I saw, far and near, the enemy
riding about, and collecting the dead and wounded.
I expected to die, and was willing to die; but, my
heart rose terribly at the thought of being murdered
in cold blood. The wretch left me, for a moment,
evidently
for the purpose of finding some safer weapon;
and I, determined not to be sacrificed, collected all
my strength, griped the bayonet, and lay waiting for
him.
He cameand, standing about three feet from me,
made a deliberate cut at my face, with a sabre. I was
able to parry itand, could I have reached him, would
have let out his heart's blood, before human help could
have aided himbut, he was too far from me; and,
exasperated to madness, by his cold blooded, merciless
depravity, I hurled the bayonet at him. Thank God,
it struck him in the face, and he fell! Yet, when he
fell, and I saw the point where it had passed through
his neck, and heard his horrible yelling, I was fain to
stop my ears, and cover my eyes, or I should have gone
distracted.
After this, I can remember little more than, that I
was in the hospital of the enemy, and treated with
great care and attentionmade a friend of an able
surgeon, who was thunderstruck at the situation of my
wounded leg:inflamed now, to an excessive degree
and, in short, that I was obliged to lose my leg.
In the mean time, however, I had the happiness to
hear that Archibald had escaped miraculously, after
exposing himself with unprecedented hardihood. For
a moment I had seen himit was after we had entered
the entrenchments, engaged, on foot, with an officer
of the enemy. I felt no fear for him, then, for I saw
that they fought with swords.
Arthur had received two or three sabre gashes;
and Copely had one of his fingers shot away. But the
whole army, particularly the French, were loud in his
praise. Every man of his command, had been driven
into the ditchand, with the exception of ten, or a
dozen, all were killed or wounded.
A speedy arrangement was made for our exchange
and, the moment that my friend, the humane and
benevolent Waters, the British surgeon, under whose
care it was my good fortune to fall, would permit it, I
was put on the way for my home. It was a long time,
and I was cruelly wasted and disfigured, when
Archibald
and I met. Yet, he was unalteredthe same
deadly paleness; the same settled, calm, awful
insensibility
.
`Return,' said he, `be a comfort to our mother
bless your wifeand bear my love and reverencedo
you mark me? my
reverence
, to Lucia. Tell her not to
forget me. We shall meet again, here, or hereafter.
Copely, and Arthur, and I must remain. Copely, to
atone for his early misconduct: Arthur, in expiation
of his vowfor he promised never to marry, till
America
was free, and broke itshame on him! and I
merely because I cannot live, in a quiet, peaceable
element
.'
Our parting was sorrowful; andso we all thought
I am sure, a final one. My situation was exceedingly
critical; and I was helpless, beyond all that you can
imagine, from having seen some evidence of my
strength, after it had begun to decline. Time was, my
children, when no mortal man could have stood before
me. I am no boaster. Arthur Rodman was a tall
stout fellow, and passed for a strong man; yet I could
pull Arthur Rodman to the earth with one hand. Yet,
after the loss of my leg, and the wasting of the fever
that followed it, I was scarcely able to lift a spoon to
my mouth; and, but for Claraheaven bless the dear
woman! but for
her
I had never lived through it, I am
sure. My children, you can never know her value.
From the time that you can recollect her, she was
feeble
and dim. You should have seen her, about the bed
of her husband; sick and dying. You should have
VOL. II. 15
hope
.I look back upon my past life, with a
strange, melancholy wonder---much that I have done,
appears to have been done by some other Archibald
Oadley; and not by me. So young; so tender
hearted
,
as I was---a boy, but the other day, and now dying,
with grey hairs in my head, (it is a fact, brother)---of
old age---premature old age, and a shattered frame;
substance and being, body and spirit shaken to the
dust. For one thing only, do I reproach myself
nay, for twotwo, above all others---the blood of
Clinton, is one---my stubbornness to Lucia, is another.
But for them, I could sleep quietly; and, mayhap, die
very quietly---but they haunt me, with a continually
encreasing darkness and threatening.I cannot sleep
now, at all. I walk all the day long, to and fro, in the
camp, when we are encamped; and ride, all the day
long, when not encamped---but, without knowing or
caring, where I am, or what I have done. I walk in
my sleep, too---
that
distresses me. I know not what
may happen---the sentinels are trusty, and I am
ashamed
to communicate the truth. You would not believe
me, I suppose, should I tell you, what is very true---
that, after the battle, yesterday, I fell asleep upon my
horse, while my men were returning from the pursuit;
and might very easily have been taken prisoner. At
times, there is a lethargy, pleasanter than sleep---a
drowsiness, like that of sorrow and love---as if I were
sleeping upon the bosom of some dear one, that besets
me---and my heart overflows andbut no,
shame on these emotions. I have written to
Lucia
.
Bid her bear up---bid her be comforted. We
shall
soon
meet again---again! where our hearts may
beat renewedly, forever and ever;
purified
and blessed.'
`
Purified!
' echoed the sweet martyr, faintly
dropping
her arm, over the bed; and falling upon her face
`
purified!
I' a long and continued
shuddering
followed, in which the bed, itself, vibrated, and
the whole room trembled.
`But the other,' said Clara, wiping her eyes and
reaching me Copely's letter.
It was very brief, and to the following effect; but,
just as I opened it, in came the two brides; one,
flushed
with a beautiful confusion, the other laughing and
crying, all in a breath; and rallying Mary, with a
significance
that I dared not understand; till the sweet
girl burst into tearspartly of shame, partly of sorrow;
and Ellen threw herself upon her neck, crying, `hush!
hush, loveforgive me. I was cruelchildish
indelicate
andhushall in good time. We shall
be a houseful, nevertheless, (in a low voice) by the
time that he comes.'
She did not mean that I should hear this; but it
touched Clara, who coloured, and withdrew her hand
from the pillow, against which I was leaning, to give a
reproof to Ellen, that nobody should understand but
the
women folks
.
Copely's
note
. `Rodman would have written you;
but, he has just finished a letter to his wife; and he
cannot manage the pen for another line. The broad
sword has cramped his hand. He deputises me to give
his love to you all; and to say to
you
, Oadleyand to
our's
and
your's
heaven have mercy on all of them,
and particularly, on
mine
and
reform
herif it be not
too late.'
`He be hanged!' cried Ellen, pettishly.
`Prepare yourselfbe a man. Your brother
encountered
and slew two officers, with his own hand, yesterday
and took, with Jasper, of whom more by and by,
and five more of the troop, twelve of the enemy
prisoners
;
and then went to sleep in the saddle. Be a man,
I say, again. Your brother cannot live long. His
hours are numbered.
`Gracious God!' cried Ellen, `if Chester Copely
be trifling now, I shall hate him forever.'
`O, I
hope
that he is!' said Mary, in a voice like a
lone instrument, breathing to the wind.
`His hours are numbered. A consultation has been
held, since my last, for we are unwilling to lose him
but, there is no hope. Am I abrupt? I fear so. But
you are a manyour brother is a man. He has no
wifeno childrenno beloved oneno, I am wrong,
he has an angel to leave behind him.'
`Not long,' said Clara, kissing her sister's forehead
`no, no, not long, I am sure.'
`Would that you could see him! (said the letter.)
He never looked so well in his life. His temples are
transparent. Every movement of his heart is visible
in his eyes.' We all turned to Lucia, at these words;
it was a description of
her
appearance. `Poor fellow!
he has just left me, treading firmly the road that leads
to the chambers of death. Why delay it? why
conceal
it? It fell upon
me
, like a thunderclap. It might
fall upon you so. We have done our best to prepare
you; at least, I have, for, while there was any hope,
he kept his situation a secret. But my course has
been different. I have told you the worst. You must
not blame me, however, that my last letter was not
alarming. When that was written, I began to have
hopeI have none, now.'
`The
last!
O! we are illy prepared yet,' said
Clara
.
`Would that it had arrived before this. Such
blows are terribleI'
`Jasper is deaddead, poor fellow. I saw him fall;
but Archibald has just given me a particular account
of the transaction, with an air of pleasantry, that made
me scold him.
`I saw him,' said he, when the bullet struck his
heart; he was at full speed. Yet he kept on, for a
whole minute, and went completely through two
divisions
of the broadsword, as I am a living man, before
he fell: the saddle turned, and the horse broke away
from under himthe saddle-cloth shot to ribbons, and
dripping with blood. I found the poor fellow, cut all
to pieces; his helmet shaved away; his uniform shot to
tattersand the blood gushing out at his shoulders.
He died desperately. `But I expected it,' said
Archibald
,
`for, in his jocular way, I heard him, the morning
before the attack, while newly arranging a part of the
troop, in consequence of sickness and continual battle,
I heard him order all the ladies in the front rank.'
`The ladies!' said Ellen`what the deuse does the
fellow mean?'
`The mares,' I replied. `Jasper always called them
the ladies of the troopmost of them were blooded.'
`But why put them in the front rank?'
`For many reasons.' I said, smiling at the question,
so innocently asked, and wishing, from my soul, that
I had not read the passage aloud; for Copely was
full of such jokes, `the fire and quickness of females,
are proverbial; the competition that would be
produced
;
the gallantry that it would provokethe'
`Read on,' said Ellen, impatientlydropping her
eyes; `read on; what does the creature say next?'
`Nothingexcept that I am to standhere, read it
yourselfgodfather to'
`I won't!' she cried, jumping up, in a pet, and
running
out of the room.
`Why, what possesses the poor woman?' said
Mary
,
her sweet, innocent lips parting so quietly.
Clara smiled; and handed her the letterwhich sent
her
out of the room, just as fast.
`Pray, what is the meaning of all this nonsense?'
said Lucia, with that calm, beautiful propriety, which
grew upon her every hour, till her death. `I cannot
pretend to misunderstand it. The feelings of the man
the father! are natura: and why? Sister Clara, I
am ashamed of
you;
yes dear, of you. Young as I am,
I have that within me, that cannot play tricks, even
where they are looked for. I do not like Copely's
levity
.
The thought should solemnize him; the peril of
his wifeso delicate and frail, as her tenement is,
that
should make him speak seriously. But perhaps he
would give it, the least insupportable air that he could;
and affect a pleasantry, while his heart is breaking, to
amuse others. Nay, sisteram I not right? What is
there to redden at? What to be ashamed of? I know
not what a mother's feelings are, it is true. I know
not what it is, to feel the stirring of life within me; a
life that is to make me altogether my husband's, here
and hereafter: but I do know
this
, that I should
neither
VOL. II. 15*
toil at concealment, nor deplay, in such a situation,
where it was not a
reproach
. Still less would I affect
such tremours; or, if they were not affected, would I
indulge them before my husband, or before any body
that had eyes.'
`Lucia!' said Clara, blushing all over; `you
astonish
me. I shall be offended, if this conversation
continue
.'
`Shame on you, thenshame on you! the woman,
in your situation, whose nerves will not permit such a
conversation; whose temper will not permit it, had
better die barren. I am serious. This is no sudden
thought. I know what I say. I have meditated upon
it. I love delicacy, I trust that, whatever be my
faults, I have not that of indelicacy at my door; but I
detest prudery and affectation. You are already a
mother, Claraand must think and act like one. Your
own health, and that of your babe demand it.'
`By heavens, Lucia, you are a noble creature,' said
I, kissing her; `I am glad of this conversation. It
will be the better for poor Clara. Hitherto, the theme
has been a forbidden one between us two; yes,
between
the father and mother! at a moment so critical
too, when she is most in want of all sympathy and
encouragement
.
No Clara; give me your handthere,
thank you! I love you unspeakably, as you know. I
love modesty. I revere this delicate timidity; this
bashful sensibility; but, it has gone too farto an
extent
,
dear, unworthy of one so thoughtful and firm as
you. Your sweet sister has said wisely. These
agitations
and tremours may have a worse tendency than we
dream of. Let us learn to think of the event without
stammering; to be prepared for it. One kiss! there
there! Now go to Lucia, and let me see you kiss
her
.'
Clara did, while the tears danced in her full
eyelids
,
and thanked her.
Our arms entwined altogether, in one dear, thrilling
embrace; and the tears of the two sisters fell upon my
face, like a warm, summer shower, in a pleasant wind
just at the shutting in of day light.
Woman!the companion of our bed sidefrom our
cradle to our grave!our ministering angel!our
nurse!our consolation, in all sorrow and trial from
the first beating of life within usto the last, the very
last, upon the bed of deaththou art the sweet
fountain
,
and nourishment of all our holiest beingand of
all our most immortal nature and quality!
CHAPTER XI.
And coming events cast their shadows before
He awakened a sound,
Like the stirring that comes from the tenanted ground
When revelry wanders there.
In
my last, I spoke of the letter, which Lucia had
received from Archibald. On looking over my papers,
I have found it.
More than once, have I seen it blistered with tears
it is hardly legible at this moment; and, were not
the sentiments so deeply written on my heart, I should
not be able to decypher it, I am sure, in its present
tattered and defaced condition, as it lies before me,
while I transcribe itwith emotions, my children, that
shake every fibre of my constitution  thatbut
read for yourselvesremember the situation of the
parties
,
youthful; lovely; strong; and bowed down with
a mysterious sorrow. If you feel aught of what I have
felt, five hundred times, in reading it, your young
hearts will collapse with a terrifick suddenness, again
and again, as the apparition of the two broken hearted
lovers, with pale lips and beautiful eyes, and loose hair,
rises before your thoughtread it!read it!
and say if you wonder at the unsteadiness of my hand,
in transcribing its wild, incoherent, disordered
language
.
(Archibald to Lucia.)
`Between thee and me, Lucia Arnauld, let there be
peace. The way of our life, thou strange and
wonderful
woman, has been a way of deep feeling, passion
and darkness. Let it be so no more. Lucia! we have
lost much. We might have been happy; blessed, and
blessing. We
might
have been, but for the untimely
blight of our warm hearted affection, happy and dear
to each othero, how dear! forever and ever.
Lucia
!
there are times, when I could throw myself down
upon the green earthunderneath which, I shall soon
lie tranquilly, I hope, and weep myself to death. It is
when I see the apparition of her that I have loved, as
I last saw her; before a bad man had stepped, in a
wayward moment, into the sacred place of my
devotion
and
carelessly defaced the blessedest image
of light and beauty, that man ever kneeled toher
dark hair wet and glittering with the dewher awful
eyes, shadowed with the tender and absolute blackness
of the deepest passion. She loved thenshe loved me,
Archibald Oadley. Then why stood I upright in her
presence? Whywhen all the world knelt to her
to
thee
, Lucia?did I uncover my brow, only; and
look upon thee, undazzled, unterrified!why, when
they, that listened to theewhile thy heart warbled at
thy lips, like a young bird, buried in apple blossoms
the sound gushing out, as if she were delirious and
faint, with the perfume and beauty about herwhy,
when
they
looked lovingly upon thee, and were
prodigal
of sweet things, why did I, I alone, Lucia, stand
apart from theewith my hand over my eyessilent
as death?Why, when thy feet glittered in the
dance; and to all that looked upon thee, half blinded by
thy beauty, it seemed that the musick, which they heard,
came from movement of thy limbswhy stood
I
apart,
and mute, while
they
were loud and lavish of their
rapture?O, Luciaask thy own heart. I was a
proud and imperious boy. I loved thee. I loved thee
too muchfor the life of my own heart; too much, to
breath thy name lightly; too much, when I heard thy
voice, or thy tread, while my heart hid itself with
terrour and joynot to move away from the world,
where I could shut my eyes; (not on thy beautythat
could not be)where I could stop my ears(not to thy
voicefor that were impossibleblind and deaf, I
should have heard thee and seen thee, forever and ever,
after that night). Then why did I? ask thy own heart
Lucia. Did I not love thee? Didst thou not know it?
Hath not my voice failed me; and the tears filled my
eyes, all of a sudden, when thou hast entered where I
have been; nay, at the sound of thy treadhas not thy
own mother seen my nostrils gush out with blood. Did
I not love thee?Then
why
, though I were mute, and
blinded, and sought the solitary place, where I used
to go in worship to
thy
creator
thine
Luciafor, till
I thought of him as
thy
creator, I never loved him
to meditate upon thy melancholy beauty, and swift
way wardness, and power and brightness, why was I
not forgiven?Had I loved thee less, O, woman!
could I not have poured out incense to thee, with as
wasteful a hand as another? Did I want the power?
the ability?no.Thou hast seen me, when
ministering
to women who were
not
dear to me, among the
readiest, to do what I despise myself now, for having
done; waste the truth and simplicity of my nature, in
the mere wantonness of a boyish imagination; hiding
my disapprobation of their folly, shrouding every
unlovely feature of their person or mind; and
aggravating
,
by every artifice in my power, every beautiful
one. If I could do this so readily; and, that I did
do it readily, I appeal to thy own memory, Lucia, to
say, could I not, let thy heart answer, in its wisdom and
simplicity, could I not have ministered to thee
as
readily
?
unless withheld by some better and higher feeling.
I could talk to others; compliment others; maintain
the play of conversation, with many a sprightly lip at
the same moment; dance with others; sing with others
to whom I was indifferent, and who were truly
indifferent to me. Then why could I not, with thee?
was I careless of
thy
love? knew I not how priceless
a thing it was?O, Luciahow bitterly we have
been deceived. Our haughtiness hath been our death.
But for the breathless sweet tenderness that I felt for
thee, I could have spoken freely, many a time, when, to
all that stood about me, I appeared sullen and
discontented
.
I was not soI was too happy to talk, too
proud to tell, even to theethat my faculties stood
fettered before thee; but my mind bowed down, and
my tall spirit dwindled in thy rebuke. LuciaLucia!
when I appeared to others, nay, to thyself, dear,
to love thee leastI was dying with my love of thee. I
was
indeed. * * * * * *
When Clintonmay I speak of him? When Clinton
came to your father's Lucia (my hand is getting
steadier
.)I
thought that he had never seen you before.
Why did you not tell me of it?why?There
was the death blow to our confidence. I saw you
colour; I saw you address him as a strangerand yet,
I saw you, secretly, receive him as one that you had
known before. I
saw
him, but I was too proud to ask
the reason; too proud even to mention it, in any way,
to any body upon this earth, that I had seen you meet,
as I had. To his last hour, he knew it notJohn
knows it not, to this; your mother, father, Clara
nobody, no living creature, Lucia, ever knew of it, or
ever shall, till you see fit to tell them.
`Now hear me. For many hours, I watched every
movement of your lips and eyes, till I was very sick
with expectation. I hoped that you would come to
me
,
Lucia, and tell me that you loved him. I hoped this;
for that were better than to see you disingenuous.
But you did not; no, you did not. You doubted my
strength. O, Lucia, how little you knew it! I would
have laid down my life to promote your happiness, in
any
way. If I could not be your
husband
for a mere
lover, I could not be; I hated the fondness and caprice
and childishness of that relationship; but a
husband!
O, young as I was, Lucia, I felt my veins thrill with a
pure, and religious, and sublime emotion, when I
thought of my duty to you, as my
wife
. I wept and
prayed too, love, while I thought of it; but, as I was
saying, if I could not be your husband, I would
content
myself with being your
friend;
the best and
truest friend upon the earth. Why did you not tell me
that you had seen Clinton before? that he loved you,
and that you loved him? How much of soreness,
sorrow
and bitterness might have been spared to us!
Well, wellIt is now too late to weep over the
desolation
that followed that concealment. I was prepared
dear, for any thing, for every pore, but
caprice
, in
Lucia
Arnauld. I could have borne to lose her; to be
lost! but not to have her fall in my respect; or, to fall
myself, in her's. I watched the growing intimacy;
not with a jealous feeling, not in angerO no! but
with a heart that bled at every face, with terrour and
consternation. I tried to tear your image away from
myits place, but could not. I determined to tear
away heart and all with it, if there were no other way.
I have succeeded. My heart is dead
dead!
but,
within it, there is yet a moving of vitality, like a spark
buried in ashes. The flowers are withered and
trampled
on, but the earth is impregnate with their odour.
And even at this moment Lucia, while I put my cold
hand upon it, I feel thy image there, like a little babe,
stirring under the pressure. O heaven, have mercy
upon me!
`Well, Wellat last, the spell was broken. I
shuddered and wept at thy infatuation; but, nobody
knew it. I wasted away, with the thought of blood;
walked in my sleep; and rode furiously through the
battle, in search of quieteverlasting quiet, Lucia
but nobody knew it. At lastyou were to have been
happy. God knows how I prayed for youhow
heartily I would have bled to death for you; but, no,
you would not trust me. I was shut out, utterly, from
your dear heart
utterly!
well, I bore that. I
made no complaint. I was weary of life, faint; very
faint at the heart; but, I told nobody of ittill
LuciaLucia! the letters turn to blood while a write
the table shakesthe summons will be repeated---there
there! there!
VOL. II. 16
or woman, man:farewell, Luciafarewell! I
shall never meet thee, againnever. I feel that I shall
not. If I should be ableIbut farewell, do not
expect another letter. May we not?hast thou the
courage, love? thou art very feebleand I can feel
that we are wasting,
together
might it not be that we
could depart together? Let us pray for it. *
* * * * * YesI would
have married thee, nevertheless!
ARCHIBALD.
Such was the letter that Lucia gave to me, on the
very
day that it was received! I wondered at her. There
was a meaning in it, that I dreaded to fathom---nor had
I an opportunity, for nearly three weeks; during
which time, James was born. Yes, James, you were
the first fruit of our union---our pride and beauty:---
and Ellen had a little girl; a very feeble, sickly thing,
who, heaven bless the sweet creature, I saw afterward
dying in your brother's arms.
As soon after these events had happened, and the
tumult, of a father's and a husband's heart, had been
permitted to subside, as it could be, I opened the
subject
anew to Lucia.
She was holding my boy in her arms; her red lips
looking, as if they had been moistened with the kisses
of her own babe.
`Lucia,' said I; `have you answered Archibald's
letter?'
I had no idea that she had. I asked the question
only
by way of introducing the subject, for I have
observed
that women are less scrupulous about entrusting
their sacredest and fearfullest thought and confession,
to men, than to women; even if these women be their
mothers, sisters, or daughters; and that, when they do
this, they choose neither father, brother nor child, nor
husband nor lover. And they are safer in it. Men
feel a pride in such confidence; a pride too, in
protecting
and advising, their helplessness. There cannot be
any collision of interest or passionnor envy, nor
uncharitableness
VOL. II. 15
hope
.I look back upon my past life, with a
strange, melancholy wonder---much that I have done,
appears to have been done by some other Archibald
Oadley; and not by me. So young; so tender
hearted
,
as I was---a boy, but the other day, and now dying,
with grey hairs in my head, (it is a fact, brother)---of
old age---premature old age, and a shattered frame;
substance and being, body and spirit shaken to the
dust. For one thing only, do I reproach myself
nay, for twotwo, above all others---the blood of
Clinton, is one---my stubbornness to Lucia, is another.
But for them, I could sleep quietly; and, mayhap, die
very quietly---but they haunt me, with a continually
encreasing darkness and threatening.I cannot sleep
now, at all. I walk all the day long, to and fro, in the
camp, when we are encamped; and ride, all the day
long, when not encamped---but, without knowing or
caring, where I am, or what I have done. I walk in
my sleep, too---
that
distresses me. I know not what
may happen---the sentinels are trusty, and I am
ashamed
to communicate the truth. You would not believe
me, I suppose, should I tell you, what is very true---
that, after the battle, yesterday, I fell asleep upon my
horse, while my men were returning from the pursuit;
and might very easily have been taken prisoner. At
times, there is a lethargy, pleasanter than sleep---a
drowsiness, like that of sorrow and love---as if I were
sleeping upon the bosom of some dear one, that besets
me---and my heart overflows andbut no,
shame on these emotions. I have written to
Lucia
.
Bid her bear up---bid her be comforted. We
shall
soon
meet again---again! where our hearts may
beat renewedly, forever and ever;
purified
and blessed.'
`
Purified!
' echoed the sweet martyr, faintly
dropping
her arm, over the bed; and falling upon her face
`
purified!
I' a long and continued
shuddering
followed, in which the bed, itself, vibrated, and
the whole room trembled.
`But the other,' said Clara, wiping her eyes and
reaching me Copely's letter.
It was very brief, and to the following effect; but,
just as I opened it, in came the two brides; one,
flushed
with a beautiful confusion, the other laughing and
crying, all in a breath; and rallying Mary, with a
significance
that I dared not understand; till the sweet
girl burst into tearspartly of shame, partly of sorrow;
and Ellen threw herself upon her neck, crying, `hush!
hush, loveforgive me. I was cruelchildish
indelicate
andhushall in good time. We shall
be a houseful, nevertheless, (in a low voice) by the
time that he comes.'
She did not mean that I should hear this; but it
touched Clara, who coloured, and withdrew her hand
from the pillow, against which I was leaning, to give a
reproof to Ellen, that nobody should understand but
the
women folks
.
Copely's
note
. `Rodman would have written you;
but, he has just finished a letter to his wife; and he
cannot manage the pen for another line. The broad
sword has cramped his hand. He deputises me to give
his love to you all; and to say to
you
, Oadleyand to
our's
and
your's
heaven have mercy on all of them,
and particularly, on
mine
and
reform
herif it be not
too late.'
`He be hanged!' cried Ellen, pettishly.
`Prepare yourselfbe a man. Your brother
encountered
and slew two officers, with his own hand, yesterday
and took, with Jasper, of whom more by and by,
and five more of the troop, twelve of the enemy
prisoners
;
and then went to sleep in the saddle. Be a man,
I say, again. Your brother cannot live long. His
hours are numbered.
`Gracious God!' cried Ellen, `if Chester Copely
be trifling now, I shall hate him forever.'
`O, I
hope
that he is!' said Mary, in a voice like a
lone instrument, breathing to the wind.
`His hours are numbered. A consultation has been
held, since my last, for we are unwilling to lose him
but, there is no hope. Am I abrupt? I fear so. But
you are a manyour brother is a man. He has no
wifeno childrenno beloved oneno, I am wrong,
he has an angel to leave behind him.'
`Not long,' said Clara, kissing her sister's forehead
`no, no, not long, I am sure.'
`Would that you could see him! (said the letter.)
He never looked so well in his life. His temples are
transparent. Every movement of his heart is visible
in his eyes.' We all turned to Lucia, at these words;
it was a description of
her
appearance. `Poor fellow!
he has just left me, treading firmly the road that leads
to the chambers of death. Why delay it? why
conceal
it? It fell upon
me
, like a thunderclap. It might
fall upon you so. We have done our best to prepare
you; at least, I have, for, while there was any hope,
he kept his situation a secret. But my course has
been different. I have told you the worst. You must
not blame me, however, that my last letter was not
alarming. When that was written, I began to have
hopeI have none, now.'
`The
last!
O! we are illy prepared yet,' said
Clara
.
`Would that it had arrived before this. Such
blows are terribleI'
`Jasper is deaddead, poor fellow. I saw him fall;
but Archibald has just given me a particular account
of the transaction, with an air of pleasantry, that made
me scold him.
`I saw him,' said he, when the bullet struck his
heart; he was at full speed. Yet he kept on, for a
whole minute, and went completely through two
divisions
of the broadsword, as I am a living man, before
he fell: the saddle turned, and the horse broke away
from under himthe saddle-cloth shot to ribbons, and
dripping with blood. I found the poor fellow, cut all
to pieces; his helmet shaved away; his uniform shot to
tattersand the blood gushing out at his shoulders.
He died desperately. `But I expected it,' said
Archibald
,
`for, in his jocular way, I heard him, the morning
before the attack, while newly arranging a part of the
troop, in consequence of sickness and continual battle,
I heard him order all the ladies in the front rank.'
`The ladies!' said Ellen`what the deuse does the
fellow mean?'
`The mares,' I replied. `Jasper always called them
the ladies of the troopmost of them were blooded.'
`But why put them in the front rank?'
`For many reasons.' I said, smiling at the question,
so innocently asked, and wishing, from my soul, that
I had not read the passage aloud; for Copely was
full of such jokes, `the fire and quickness of females,
are proverbial; the competition that would be
produced
;
the gallantry that it would provokethe'
`Read on,' said Ellen, impatientlydropping her
eyes; `read on; what does the creature say next?'
`Nothingexcept that I am to standhere, read it
yourselfgodfather to'
`I won't!' she cried, jumping up, in a pet, and
running
out of the room.
`Why, what possesses the poor woman?' said
Mary
,
her sweet, innocent lips parting so quietly.
Clara smiled; and handed her the letterwhich sent
her
out of the room, just as fast.
`Pray, what is the meaning of all this nonsense?'
said Lucia, with that calm, beautiful propriety, which
grew upon her every hour, till her death. `I cannot
pretend to misunderstand it. The feelings of the man
the father! are natura: and why? Sister Clara, I
am ashamed of
you;
yes dear, of you. Young as I am,
I have that within me, that cannot play tricks, even
where they are looked for. I do not like Copely's
levity
.
The thought should solemnize him; the peril of
his wifeso delicate and frail, as her tenement is,
that
should make him speak seriously. But perhaps he
would give it, the least insupportable air that he could;
and affect a pleasantry, while his heart is breaking, to
amuse others. Nay, sisteram I not right? What is
there to redden at? What to be ashamed of? I know
not what a mother's feelings are, it is true. I know
not what it is, to feel the stirring of life within me; a
life that is to make me altogether my husband's, here
and hereafter: but I do know
this
, that I should
neither
VOL. II. 15*
toil at concealment, nor deplay, in such a situation,
where it was not a
reproach
. Still less would I affect
such tremours; or, if they were not affected, would I
indulge them before my husband, or before any body
that had eyes.'
`Lucia!' said Clara, blushing all over; `you
astonish
me. I shall be offended, if this conversation
continue
.'
`Shame on you, thenshame on you! the woman,
in your situation, whose nerves will not permit such a
conversation; whose temper will not permit it, had
better die barren. I am serious. This is no sudden
thought. I know what I say. I have meditated upon
it. I love delicacy, I trust that, whatever be my
faults, I have not that of indelicacy at my door; but I
detest prudery and affectation. You are already a
mother, Claraand must think and act like one. Your
own health, and that of your babe demand it.'
`By heavens, Lucia, you are a noble creature,' said
I, kissing her; `I am glad of this conversation. It
will be the better for poor Clara. Hitherto, the theme
has been a forbidden one between us two; yes,
between
the father and mother! at a moment so critical
too, when she is most in want of all sympathy and
encouragement
.
No Clara; give me your handthere,
thank you! I love you unspeakably, as you know. I
love modesty. I revere this delicate timidity; this
bashful sensibility; but, it has gone too farto an
extent
,
dear, unworthy of one so thoughtful and firm as
you. Your sweet sister has said wisely. These
agitations
and tremours may have a worse tendency than we
dream of. Let us learn to think of the event without
stammering; to be prepared for it. One kiss! there
there! Now go to Lucia, and let me see you kiss
her
.'
Clara did, while the tears danced in her full
eyelids
,
and thanked her.
Our arms entwined altogether, in one dear, thrilling
embrace; and the tears of the two sisters fell upon my
face, like a warm, summer shower, in a pleasant wind
just at the shutting in of day light.
Woman!the companion of our bed sidefrom our
cradle to our grave!our ministering angel!our
nurse!our consolation, in all sorrow and trial from
the first beating of life within usto the last, the very
last, upon the bed of deaththou art the sweet
fountain
,
and nourishment of all our holiest beingand of
all our most immortal nature and quality!
CHAPTER XI.
And coming events cast their shadows before
He awakened a sound,
Like the stirring that comes from the tenanted ground
When revelry wanders there.
In
my last, I spoke of the letter, which Lucia had
received from Archibald. On looking over my papers,
I have found it.
More than once, have I seen it blistered with tears
it is hardly legible at this moment; and, were not
the sentiments so deeply written on my heart, I should
not be able to decypher it, I am sure, in its present
tattered and defaced condition, as it lies before me,
while I transcribe itwith emotions, my children, that
shake every fibre of my constitution  thatbut
read for yourselvesremember the situation of the
parties
,
youthful; lovely; strong; and bowed down with
a mysterious sorrow. If you feel aught of what I have
felt, five hundred times, in reading it, your young
hearts will collapse with a terrifick suddenness, again
and again, as the apparition of the two broken hearted
lovers, with pale lips and beautiful eyes, and loose hair,
rises before your thoughtread it!read it!
and say if you wonder at the unsteadiness of my hand,
in transcribing its wild, incoherent, disordered
language
.
(Archibald to Lucia.)
`Between thee and me, Lucia Arnauld, let there be
peace. The way of our life, thou strange and
wonderful
woman, has been a way of deep feeling, passion
and darkness. Let it be so no more. Lucia! we have
lost much. We might have been happy; blessed, and
blessing. We
might
have been, but for the untimely
blight of our warm hearted affection, happy and dear
to each othero, how dear! forever and ever.
Lucia
!
there are times, when I could throw myself down
upon the green earthunderneath which, I shall soon
lie tranquilly, I hope, and weep myself to death. It is
when I see the apparition of her that I have loved, as
I last saw her; before a bad man had stepped, in a
wayward moment, into the sacred place of my
devotion
and
carelessly defaced the blessedest image
of light and beauty, that man ever kneeled toher
dark hair wet and glittering with the dewher awful
eyes, shadowed with the tender and absolute blackness
of the deepest passion. She loved thenshe loved me,
Archibald Oadley. Then why stood I upright in her
presence? Whywhen all the world knelt to her
to
thee
, Lucia?did I uncover my brow, only; and
look upon thee, undazzled, unterrified!why, when
they, that listened to theewhile thy heart warbled at
thy lips, like a young bird, buried in apple blossoms
the sound gushing out, as if she were delirious and
faint, with the perfume and beauty about herwhy,
when
they
looked lovingly upon thee, and were
prodigal
of sweet things, why did I, I alone, Lucia, stand
apart from theewith my hand over my eyessilent
as death?Why, when thy feet glittered in the
dance; and to all that looked upon thee, half blinded by
thy beauty, it seemed that the musick, which they heard,
came from movement of thy limbswhy stood
I
apart,
and mute, while
they
were loud and lavish of their
rapture?O, Luciaask thy own heart. I was a
proud and imperious boy. I loved thee. I loved thee
too muchfor the life of my own heart; too much, to
breath thy name lightly; too much, when I heard thy
voice, or thy tread, while my heart hid itself with
terrour and joynot to move away from the world,
where I could shut my eyes; (not on thy beautythat
could not be)where I could stop my ears(not to thy
voicefor that were impossibleblind and deaf, I
should have heard thee and seen thee, forever and ever,
after that night). Then why did I? ask thy own heart
Lucia. Did I not love thee? Didst thou not know it?
Hath not my voice failed me; and the tears filled my
eyes, all of a sudden, when thou hast entered where I
have been; nay, at the sound of thy treadhas not thy
own mother seen my nostrils gush out with blood. Did
I not love thee?Then
why
, though I were mute, and
blinded, and sought the solitary place, where I used
to go in worship to
thy
creator
thine
Luciafor, till
I thought of him as
thy
creator, I never loved him
to meditate upon thy melancholy beauty, and swift
way wardness, and power and brightness, why was I
not forgiven?Had I loved thee less, O, woman!
could I not have poured out incense to thee, with as
wasteful a hand as another? Did I want the power?
the ability?no.Thou hast seen me, when
ministering
to women who were
not
dear to me, among the
readiest, to do what I despise myself now, for having
done; waste the truth and simplicity of my nature, in
the mere wantonness of a boyish imagination; hiding
my disapprobation of their folly, shrouding every
unlovely feature of their person or mind; and
aggravating
,
by every artifice in my power, every beautiful
one. If I could do this so readily; and, that I did
do it readily, I appeal to thy own memory, Lucia, to
say, could I not, let thy heart answer, in its wisdom and
simplicity, could I not have ministered to thee
as
readily
?
unless withheld by some better and higher feeling.
I could talk to others; compliment others; maintain
the play of conversation, with many a sprightly lip at
the same moment; dance with others; sing with others
to whom I was indifferent, and who were truly
indifferent to me. Then why could I not, with thee?
was I careless of
thy
love? knew I not how priceless
a thing it was?O, Luciahow bitterly we have
been deceived. Our haughtiness hath been our death.
But for the breathless sweet tenderness that I felt for
thee, I could have spoken freely, many a time, when, to
all that stood about me, I appeared sullen and
discontented
.
I was not soI was too happy to talk, too
proud to tell, even to theethat my faculties stood
fettered before thee; but my mind bowed down, and
my tall spirit dwindled in thy rebuke. LuciaLucia!
when I appeared to others, nay, to thyself, dear,
to love thee leastI was dying with my love of thee. I
was
indeed. * * * * * *
When Clintonmay I speak of him? When Clinton
came to your father's Lucia (my hand is getting
steadier
.)I
thought that he had never seen you before.
Why did you not tell me of it?why?There
was the death blow to our confidence. I saw you
colour; I saw you address him as a strangerand yet,
I saw you, secretly, receive him as one that you had
known before. I
saw
him, but I was too proud to ask
the reason; too proud even to mention it, in any way,
to any body upon this earth, that I had seen you meet,
as I had. To his last hour, he knew it notJohn
knows it not, to this; your mother, father, Clara
nobody, no living creature, Lucia, ever knew of it, or
ever shall, till you see fit to tell them.
`Now hear me. For many hours, I watched every
movement of your lips and eyes, till I was very sick
with expectation. I hoped that you would come to
me
,
Lucia, and tell me that you loved him. I hoped this;
for that were better than to see you disingenuous.
But you did not; no, you did not. You doubted my
strength. O, Lucia, how little you knew it! I would
have laid down my life to promote your happiness, in
any
way. If I could not be your
husband
for a mere
lover, I could not be; I hated the fondness and caprice
and childishness of that relationship; but a
husband!
O, young as I was, Lucia, I felt my veins thrill with a
pure, and religious, and sublime emotion, when I
thought of my duty to you, as my
wife
. I wept and
prayed too, love, while I thought of it; but, as I was
saying, if I could not be your husband, I would
content
myself with being your
friend;
the best and
truest friend upon the earth. Why did you not tell me
that you had seen Clinton before? that he loved you,
and that you loved him? How much of soreness,
sorrow
and bitterness might have been spared to us!
Well, wellIt is now too late to weep over the
desolation
that followed that concealment. I was prepared
dear, for any thing, for every pore, but
caprice
, in
Lucia
Arnauld. I could have borne to lose her; to be
lost! but not to have her fall in my respect; or, to fall
myself, in her's. I watched the growing intimacy;
not with a jealous feeling, not in angerO no! but
with a heart that bled at every face, with terrour and
consternation. I tried to tear your image away from
myits place, but could not. I determined to tear
away heart and all with it, if there were no other way.
I have succeeded. My heart is dead
dead!
but,
within it, there is yet a moving of vitality, like a spark
buried in ashes. The flowers are withered and
trampled
on, but the earth is impregnate with their odour.
And even at this moment Lucia, while I put my cold
hand upon it, I feel thy image there, like a little babe,
stirring under the pressure. O heaven, have mercy
upon me!
`Well, Wellat last, the spell was broken. I
shuddered and wept at thy infatuation; but, nobody
knew it. I wasted away, with the thought of blood;
walked in my sleep; and rode furiously through the
battle, in search of quieteverlasting quiet, Lucia
but nobody knew it. At lastyou were to have been
happy. God knows how I prayed for youhow
heartily I would have bled to death for you; but, no,
you would not trust me. I was shut out, utterly, from
your dear heart
utterly!
well, I bore that. I
made no complaint. I was weary of life, faint; very
faint at the heart; but, I told nobody of ittill
LuciaLucia! the letters turn to blood while a write
the table shakesthe summons will be repeated---there
there! there!
Three knocks! three, loud, successive, distinct
knocks. My hours are numbered. This is the third
time. Is it a delusion? Ask my brother? He sat by
me one night at the same hour, and heard themwhen
I not only heard them, but saw the hand that gave them
saw
it! as plain as I now see this paper
Enough.
I would not have slain him; no, by heaven, I would
not, but for that last word that he uttered. That was
the death word. I drove my sword up to the hilt, into
his heart. He deserved it; true, or not true, it matters
not. He knew how I loved thee; worshipped thee;
and, though it had been true to the uttermost extent,
he deserved death
death!
aye, death here and
hereafter
death
and damnation, for blaspheming thy
purity
O, LuciaI did not believe him for a moment
no, not for a momentand my soul shuddered at the
altar, when I remembered that I had sent Clinton
before God, with a lie in his mouth.
`ButbutLuciait is getting very dark. I feel,
as I felt, when we parted last, and the foam stood
on my lips, as I stood over thee, and saw thy
locked hands and speechless mouth ready to crumble
into dust before me. Sublime and incomprehensible
woman. It was too late, too late! Death had already
breathed upon my heart; and it was passing away
in vapour and shadow. But for thatthough I
had gone mad upon the spotmad and darkforever
and everwhile the benediction was pronouncedyea!
though I had known, that the moment I had touched thy
forehead with the seal of a husbandthou wouldst
have been a
widow
and I, a corpseyet, I would have
married thee, nevertheless!Let that comfort thee.
Proud as I am; stout hearted, and unforgiving, as I
am; romantick and fastidious as I am; I would have
been thy bridegroom, Lucia, notwithstanding all that
had passed, had the tale of death and shame, been told
me, but a little earlier! Now, it is too late; we shall
die asunderloving, O! as never man loved woman
VOL. II. 16
or woman, man:farewell, Luciafarewell! I
shall never meet thee, againnever. I feel that I shall
not. If I should be ableIbut farewell, do not
expect another letter. May we not?hast thou the
courage, love? thou art very feebleand I can feel
that we are wasting,
together
might it not be that we
could depart together? Let us pray for it. *
* * * * * YesI would
have married thee, nevertheless!
ARCHIBALD.
Such was the letter that Lucia gave to me, on the
very
day that it was received! I wondered at her. There
was a meaning in it, that I dreaded to fathom---nor had
I an opportunity, for nearly three weeks; during
which time, James was born. Yes, James, you were
the first fruit of our union---our pride and beauty:---
and Ellen had a little girl; a very feeble, sickly thing,
who, heaven bless the sweet creature, I saw afterward
dying in your brother's arms.
As soon after these events had happened, and the
tumult, of a father's and a husband's heart, had been
permitted to subside, as it could be, I opened the
subject
anew to Lucia.
She was holding my boy in her arms; her red lips
looking, as if they had been moistened with the kisses
of her own babe.
`Lucia,' said I; `have you answered Archibald's
letter?'
I had no idea that she had. I asked the question
only
by way of introducing the subject, for I have
observed
that women are less scrupulous about entrusting
their sacredest and fearfullest thought and confession,
to men, than to women; even if these women be their
mothers, sisters, or daughters; and that, when they do
this, they choose neither father, brother nor child, nor
husband nor lover. And they are safer in it. Men
feel a pride in such confidence; a pride too, in
protecting
and advising, their helplessness. There cannot be
any collision of interest or passionnor envy, nor
uncharitableness
between them. My remark, therefore,
was intended to lead her into just such a disclosure, as
would give most ease to her own heart. I asked no
questions. I meant to ask none. But to what I said,
she replied:
`I have already written to him.'
`You have!' said I, astonished at her
self-possession
,
`and has it gone?'
`Yes; nearly three weeks since.'
I waited for a moment, fashioning to myself some
mode of inquiry, to prolong the conversation; while it
should neither distress her, nor myself; for I began to
love Lucia, the dear patient sufferer, with a quiet, deep
reverence, that never diminished, to the last moment of
her life.
`Take your babe, a moment,' said she, `and I will
show you the answer. You would like to see it; and I
kept the copy for youand
you
alone. I would not
have Clara see itJohn'
She stopped, and put her white hand upon my child's
head.
`I shall not live long; not many months, I am sure;
as you wish for a blessing on that child, let the secret
die with you.'
`Sisternaydo not go, yet.'
`O, it makes my heart warm,' she replied, locking
her hands, and pressing them fervently upon it, `to
hear that word from the lips of a man.
Brother!
sister
!
O, there is comfort, strength, and honour in the
countenance of a brother!'
`Dear Lucia; I cannot give the pledge that you
desire
.
I cannot become the guardian of a secret, that
Clara may not participate in.'
`Do I hear aright, brother?'
`Yes. You do not know her; either commit it to
both, or'
`Weak man,' said Lucia; `I pity you. what! can
there be no secret from a wife
none!
none of
sorrow
or shame?'
`None!' I echoed, firmly`none,
certainly
, of
sorrow
or shame.'
`I will not stop to argue with you, John; there are
things, which must be left to trouble the heart of the
man alone; things, that should never be told, but with
a design to make the woman happier or wiser. Why
should she sorrow in anticipation of what may be
uncertain
?
Why, be made to weep at evils, which, to her
gentleness and inexperience, may be disheartening?
while, to the man of fortitude and steadiness, they are
but temporary embarrassments? No, my brotherno!
none but a weak husband will say: I will have no
secret
from my wife. None but a weak husband will
trouble his wife with all that troubles him.'
`Lucia, hear me. Of all my pleasure, my wife hath
a full share; of all her sorrow, I would share all that
I may. But how may this be, if either believe that the
other has some untold malady of the spirit, or of the
heart; feeding, like a serpent, upon the vitals, day and
night; for which there is to be no remedy, not even that of
tears; no, sympathy, because it
is
untold. No! I will
hereafter have no secret, that I may not, under
any
circumstances
impart to my wife. All that I say is this:
Leave it to my discretion. Bind me by no promise.
Let me do as I may believe it best, whatever may
happen
.'
`You are right, brother,' said Lucia, in reply, `
altogether
right.
That
is the spirit of a man. I will
trust to it. I will bring you the letter. It will tell,
not a fearful tale; for I am still (covering her face with
her hands, under pretence of excluding the sun,) too
much of a woman to tell it
all:
it will tell enough, to
show you that, while I live, it is no tale for the ear of
my sister.'
`There!' said she, returning soon after, with a face
unusually pale; `there! take it, while I have
collectedness
and courage enough, to give it to you, with my
own hands: and read it. Nay, not yet; give me your
boy, your little Archibald,' (for so, we had first agreed
to call him, till Archibald requested him to be called
James, for what reason, I know not,) `and read it while
I am away.'
She came to me, then; and, putting both her hands
into mine, said, with a low, sweet, tremulous voice,
whose accents I hear yet, whenever I have been more than
usually devout and abstracted in my religious duty;
as if to reward me. `Remember my situation
tempted
triedscornedproudyounghelpless,
and
have compassion on me.' The tears gushed out of her
eyes, all at once, as she uttered these words; and she
had nearly fainted; but, at last, with James nestling
at her bosom, she succeeded in raising herself, and
tottering
out of the roomthe little brat squalling all the
while, as if he were bound up with pins and needles.
yet his cry was musicalto
me
, I mean. He did
not cry like any other child, that ever I heard.
I opened the letter. It was hardly legible; written,
evidently, in the hurry of her feeling, without
attention
to what the world are pleased to call pretty
letter-writing
.
It follows.
`You are deeply to blame, Archibald. You have
stirred up a spirit within me, that will never sleep
again. The darkness is scattered. I see clearly now,
more clearly than ever, the dim and perilous road, over
which I have trodden. You are very incoherent. I
shall, probably, be more so. You speak of my
appearance
,
when you saw me
last
. When do you mean?
Where was it? I do not understand you. Yet,
making
all possible allowance for the aggravating power,
which we
all
have, and you, in an especial manner, of
picturing whatever is past and goneirretrieveably
gone, as supremely beautiful and dearI find
something
,
that has given me a clue to your meaning, where
you speak of the last time that you saw me. Yes, I
understand youArchibald: I cannot deceive you.
On that very night, I first saw Clinton. It was he,
that I had been walking with. My heart was heavy,
sorrowful at your coldnesspining under mortification,
and sore with the jeering of my companions. He took
VOL. II. 16*
advantage of it. He spoke kindly of youvery kindly
defended youargued as you do, that you felt more
than other men,
because
you professed to feel so little.
Where we feel, we are hushed, terrified, silent, and
under
a perpetual anxiety to please; our manner is
constrained
,
abrupt, fitful and capricious. Thus, he
reasoned
with me. I began to like him; not for his own
sake, but for yours. When we returned, I found you
there; the same haughty, cold, and absent manner;
and I was piqued at it. A few minutes after, I was
rallied about Clinton; and threatened with your
wrath. I affected to scorn the latter; and, had you
not appeared with your heart in your eyes, while we
were talking, which you will probably remember, from
the confusion that it caused among us, for we were
afraid that you had overheard usI know not what I
might have said of you. Your manner was new to me
it carried me away. I could have fallen upon your
bosom and wept, before the whole world, Archibald;
as I live, I could, with simple joy, at the change. I
never shall forget your looks; your hand trembled;
your hair was wet, and waving over your temples;
your deep blue eye, were strangely dark and
mellowed
;
and your voice went to my heart. I do not
remember
your words; I did not hear them; but the
sound, I have heard, again and again, since, in my
sleep. I found that I had never known you. I had
believed you too ambitious to love heartily; and I was
impatient of being loved, with aught less than absolute
and unqualified devotion. You were diminutive in your
person; it mattered little to me
then
, that your soul
was the soul of a giant.  You were neither
handsome
nor showy; though the aged, I had seen, stand
still before you; and the wise holding their breath;
yet, such was the foolish weakness of my heart, that,
when I was surrounded with taller and handsomer, and
more fashionable men, I was afraid to acknowledge
any preference for you, even to myself. I loved you;
but I was ashamed of it: not ashamed of youno, I
was very proud of you. But I could not abide to have
it known among my companions, that I had made such
a choice. They could not know you; and I have been
mortified to tears, more than once, at their jibes, the
simpletons! and their raillery, when, had you but
entered
the room, you would have put them and all their
idols to shame, with a single word Archibald, this is
the truth. Do you remember that night, when I sat
upon the railing under the pear-tree, and you stood
hear me; and I turned away my face, and you asked
me, why I refused to answer you? Yesyou cannot
have forgotten it. The truth is this: I had not the
courage to tell the truth; and I could not tell a
falsehood
.
I was very happy. The expression of your
face was noble; and I was contemplating it, as you
stood looking at the soft low moon, at our left. I
had forgotten Clinton; all the world but you; when,
some devil forced the observation upon me, that you
were very short, and he very tall; nayfor there you
stood before me, that you were so very short (you have
grown since,) as not to overtop me much, when you
were standing and I sitting. It was this, that made
me turn away my face, and weep; for I
did
weep,
Archibald
.
I had been, more than once, on the point of
mentioning
the walk, that I had taken with Clinton, in the
simplicity of a young heart, honest and ingenuous; but
a new, strange feeling of shame and discretion
prevented
me, after I had thought of your stature. I excused
the concealment to myselfso unlike me, as it was;
by saying, that it was not worth the trouble; or that,
if it were, it would only make you uneasy: the two
reasons, exactly, which, had I known your temper
then, as I do now, would have made me tell you. This
kept Clinton in my mind. Yet I did not like him
showy and brilliant, and fascinating, as he was allowed
to bethere was a freedom in his manners, which I
never liked. Yet it was a novelty; and, as he was a
general favourite, I could not well bear to throw him
utterly off, at once, while I was the subject of
universal
envy. At last, I was provoked at your security.
You gave yourself no trouble about Clinton. You
never asked his namenever met him, and, I have since
found, never saw him; though he was with me every day.
Do you remember that evening after our pleasure party
upon the Delaware? as you stood upon the bank, and
a stranger came up to me, in the dim light of the hour,
and took my hand, and bade me good night, with the
air of an old acquaintance? You were silent for a
moment
or two, after he had gone; and stepped back, as
you saw him take my hand, in a manner that I thought
tame. `Lucia,' said you, gravely, when you returned,
`he is very intimate with you.'
`Yes,' I replied, willing to tease you a little.
`Who is he?' said you.
`O, one of the finest fellows in the world!' I
exclaimed
,
affecting a great deal more enthusiasm, than I
felt; for, as I have told you before, I did not like him
`
a universal favourite
.'
`
Indeed!
' said youand were silent, until we
parted at the door. There, you lingered a moment.
There
you spoke to me. I never shall forget either your
look or your words. You may have forgotten both.
I dare say that you have, but I never shall. The lamp
shone upon your face; it was pale as death; and I
thought that I could see the traces of weeping about
your eyes. My emotions werewhat? sorrowful?
Oh no, pleasant beyond all expression. It did my
heart good to find you so deeply interested in me, so
cruelly disturbed. It began to correspond with my
notions of love, and dominion I was a foolish girl then,
a coquette by nature.'
Said youO, Archibald! I think that I can see
you now, and hear your low, mournful, deep voice
counselling me over againsaid you. `Luciagood
night? Good night, love. Forgive me, for my silence;
I have been troubled. I tremble for youI tremble
for myself. You are too kind hearted. You form your
opinions too hastily. I pray heaven that you may
never have reason to reproach yourself for itnor to
to  to , (your voice grew indistinct,`good
night! good night!
dear
Lucia!'
After this, I said no more; and thought no more of
Clinton. My disposition had altered; and I began to
look upon you, as my future husband. Yet your
solitary
,
thoughtful habit; your youth; and, above all, that
haughty exteriour of yours which repelled all kindness
that came not from the known hand of two or three,
alarmed me. It was at this time, while I truly loved
you; but began to doubt whether you loved me, or was
capable of loving any woman, or any thing on this
earth, except your books; and, while the remembrance
of your former tenderness had begun to be, like
that of a dream to me; for my very nature
appeared
to be changed, that Clinton reappeared. His
manner was frank and noble. He dealt fairly
with me for awhile; but I did not so with him
when I did, it was too late. ArchibaldI am no
wanton. I was never made for a harem or seraglio.
God never meant me to be the mistress of any man. I
was made for a
wife
, and a mother. Believe meO,
believe me, Archibald! if you would not have my poor
heart expire with shame and mortification. At last,
I found that our intercourse, hitherto so innocent, had
begun to assume a mysteriousness, that was full of
excitement and terrour. We conversed by signals; we
corresponded, before your eyes; and, in the presence of
the whole family, with books and cards. Yet, all this
while, though my heart smote me, at times, I was not,
nor did I mean to be unfaithful to you, if you would
claim me. But you did not; you smiled, and your
smile was full of bitterness. Clinton persuaded me that
it was contempt. He pretended to love me; to counsel
me; and, I had already gone too farmuch too far
not to be growing giddy with the peril of my course.
At lastO, ArchibaldI could weep myself blind
at the thoughtbut, it has been told once, and I can
only allude to it. I was not fully aware of my danger
tillI found that, should he forget himself, I had no
hope left. He was in my room; how should that be
explained?again, he was thereand againfor I
dared not provoke himyet I was not altogether
unworthy
,
no, not
then
norno, Archibaldnot till
faint with excess of terrour, and passion, from some
slight of yours, I awoke from a troubled dream about
you, and found myself in the arms of a manI shrieked
I'
`No matteryou have known it all. But you do not
know, that hehe alone, prevented me from destroying
myself. What could I do. I did not love him? But,
could I ever look
you
, whom I
did
love, in the face
again? never! neverI was a guilty creature,
but not guilty, oh no, not guilty to the consummation
of my shameIIhow I am able to write it at all,
is a matter of wonder to me. I am astonished at my
own calmness. But, bear with me for a moment, that
you may know the whole truth.
`I loved youmore than ever; because I felt that I
was unworthy of you; that I had injured you.
Clinton
was penitent, I am sureterribly penitent; for he
offered me, immediately, all the atonement in his
power
,
upon his knees. I took one night to think of it;
only one, and resolved to marry him.Aye, though
it was like lashing myself to something detestable,
after this event. Yes, and I should have married him,
but for his own perverse, foolish, and precipitate
nature
.
He triumphed too easily. I might be humbled,
surprised, shamed; but I could not be trampled on.
I awoke, as from a trance. I compared you togther.
I wondered at my infatuation, wept and prayed. From
that hour, my resolution was formed; happen what would
I would
not
marry
him
nor
you
---nor
anybody
die,
if there were no other means of concealing my shame
and'
`But heaven hath seen fit to spare me the guilt of
murderthe guilt of self murderthe blood of
innocence
,
my own blood. You slew him. I forgive you
for it. I forgave you then. Though II would have
protected him, at the peril of my life; for, hateful as he
was to me, on some accounts for his ruffian passion,
yet, on others, he was very dear to meas the only
husband that I should ever wed. After this, it was
owing to yourself, to your own continued importunity,
that I told the secret. I could not kill youI did not
scorn
you. I could not bear that you should believe my
refusal of you, to be owing to my horrour of `Clinton's
murderer,' as you were pleased to call yourself; nor
to my love of Clinton. Nay, there may have been
another feeling, not so praise worthy, as the desire of
dealing with truth, to influence me. I knew that I had
done that, which few women upon this earth, since its
creation, could have done, or would; and, I was
willing
that you should know it. I knew that your blood
would thrill, your eyes flash fire; that you might go
mad at the recital, but I knew also---for your nature
is known to me, better than to any other living creature,
I am sure, that you would, if you survived the shock,
feel a passion for me, altogether more sublime and
elevating, than that of love. It would be wonder and
admiration. I have lived to find that true. I can
now die contented. You have been willing to espouse
me. Archibald---I thank God that I have lived to hear
the proposal; to see it in black and white. I never
should have believed it, else. But I thank God, yet
more devoutly that he has given me the strength to
resist the temptation; and to say---as I do sayno,
Archibald, no---did I love thee less, it might be. But
I will bear children to no man, who cannot lay his
hands upon their forehead, and pray to God that they
may resemble their mother!
LUCIA.
Farewell!I do pray that we may depart
together
Farewell!
CHAPTER XII.
`What are these mighty phantoms which I see
`Floating around me?
`Haughty, and high, and beautiful, and full
`Of seeming strength.'
Cain
.
Not
long after this conversation; within two or three
days, I believe; for, I remember well, that the pleasant
eyes of Ellen were near me; and I was comparing
them with the mysterious loveliness of Lucia's, who had
just been weeping, as I held her hands, and blessed hers,
with all my soul, for her noble and generous confidence,
wondering as I did, that she should look so beautiful,
even yet; so pureand hallowed---that I dared not
breathe, even to her, another word upon the tale of
sorrowthere came several letters, chiefly dated
anteriour
to the packet, of which I have already spoken, and
one which was dated since. That was from Copely.
It related a terrible disaster to our cavalry; and ran
thus
`We have had the devil to pay. Archibald is taken
prisoner. Arthur narrowly escaped; with two or
three sabre cuts, not worth mentioning. Sir Henry
Clinton is carrying all before him; and poor Sullivan,
never was mortal man so put to it! notwithstanding his
generalship, he is tied up, hand and foot, by Cornwallis
and Clinton. We were sent out, with a few hundred
regulars, and a few rascally militia, to keep open a
route at Monk's corner, for Lincoln to retreat by when
he could do no better. But Tarleton, would that
Arthur
or Archibald could meet him, face to face, for
a few minutes: my notion is that he would never get
through his six divisions again. I say nothing for
myself, for this twist in my neck has become
confoundedly
troublesome of late; and I am nothing to be
compared with Archibald, as a swordsman. By the way
---Archibald looks altogether better than when we wrote
last, and we begin to have hope; but he has none; or, if
he have any, he will not own it; he only smiles,
patiently
,
when we speak of what
may
be, like one that
feels the principles of vitality going out, one after the
other, in his heart.'
`But, to the scuffle. General Clinton thought fit, day
before yesterday, to pack off about fifteen hundred men
to bring us in, dead or alive. Tarleton's legion was
with thema legion of devils, to be sure; for he rides
over horse and foot, with them at his heels. But, we
shall remember him, and, if it be God's will, there may
be a change of wind one day or other.'
`The first intelligence that we had of his approach,
was the sight of three of our videttes, at full speed; two
of whom were cut down in our sight, and the third,
followed
into camp; we had no time to do our duty. We
were literally ridden down. The bullets rattled about
our harness, like hail, for a moment; and then, before
we could make a movement, or gain ground enough for
a charge, half of our men were unhorsed and rolling in
the dirt; Arthur among the rest; but he gave a pretty
account, I am told, of three or four of the fellows about
him. They rode down, all at once, upon him; and
there they are yet. Our troop broke; and, by the
trumpet, were ordered to the woods, whence most of
them escaped under Colonel Washington. But
Archibald
,
after having rallied a few, was attracted by
the cries of women, to one of the dwellings; he stove in
the door of the house; and rode, through and through
it, with about a dozen men; and there, in the heat
and smoke, on horseback and on foot, with the pistols
ringing in at his ears; the enemy without firing in the
windows; and the wretched women, within, shrieking
VOL. II. 17
in the arms of their ravishers, the gallant, glorious
Archibald set fire to the house; slew, with his own
hand one of the ruffians; and, amid a general hourra
and explosion, rescued three lovely creatures, in the
moment of their extremest peril. But the rescue was
only from the flame and smoke; the roof fell in, ere
the brave fellows had cleared the garden wall; and,
three or four of their horses, that were actually within
the house, came thundering through the sides of it,
their manes all on fire, and furniture ringing; and the
enemy, who gave way for a moment, and held up their
hands, at the terrible beauty of the spectacle,
immediately
contracted about him and his few followers,
reduced
to five or six now, on foot; and about as many
more on horseback, and took them prisoners. He
fought to the last moment; and fell, at length,
exhausted
with blood, and stifled with heat. But we have
heard not ten minutes ago, that he is in no danger. It is
for that reason that I write you. I was unwilling to
begin a letter, until I knew his fate. He is the talk
of the whole army; nay, of the two armies. They
say that his beautiful hair was burnt off; his clothes
burnt to a coal; and that one of the women whom he
saved, is a creature of singular beauty andbut hush,
we shall be dreaming treason, before we know it. It
is too late now, I am sure, for beauty to dream of
sharing
in the dominion of death. Yet bear up; let him
die! let me die! let us all die! it is nothingnothing,
so that we have done worthily. Let us learn to look
death in the face. It is cowardly to shut our eyes.
Arthur, as I told you, had a narrow escape. He had
a dear friend slaughtered under his very eyes; but
Arthur avenged him; and poor Bernie(Major Bernie
was his name) was literally swimming in the blood
of his murderers, before Arthur would permit himself
to think of safety; but then, a horse happened to dash
by him, a noble beast, he is before the tent now
Arthur sprang into the saddle, under a shower of balls
from the infantry, and before a dozen horsemen; but
he escaped, and joined us within an hour.
`I had a strange dream last night. I hope that it
is true. Give the enclosed to Ellen; and, if it be not
true, bid her to pray for me, that it may be, if not
now
that is, if it be too late,
now
that it may be true, at
some future day. I dreamt that I was a father; that
my babe was a boya giant, with the palest blue eyes
in the world; and a lipthe young rascal! so like his
mother'sthat, when the rough hand of Arthur past over
my mouth, to awaken me, for another battleI kissed
it again and again, under the notion that it was
Emwa's
.
What shall be his nameArchibald, I say.'
And how comes on your little ones? If I remember
rightly, John, you were in the hope of some young
horsemen, born, I suppose, saddled and bridledII
curse it, I cannot trifle. That girl has spoilt me. I
must stopit may beit
may
O, God, have
compassion
upon me, and avert the owen; it
may
be, that,
while I am jesting about my boy, I have neither boy
nor girlnor wifeOadley, farewellI cannot
write another line, my heart is too full.Write! in
mercy, write!
COPELY.
Santee,
April 16, 1780.
The letter to Ellen; and one, which we received the
same day for Mary, contained an account of another
affair with the cavalry, in which Copely had been
wounded, and about forty of our men cut to pieces, or
taken prisoners, by the impetuous Tarleton. Lincoln
too was vehemently pressed. And, ere we could
recover
from these apprehensions, there came, successively,
to us the account of Lincoln's surrender; the
humiliating
terms imposed upon him; and the destruction of a
part of the Virginia line, by Tarleton, who behaved in
a manner, for which there is no doubt that he has been
haunted by devils ever sinceno man ever deserved
it better. It was a scene of merciless, cold blooded,
taunting butchery. The men of his troop literally
practised
their cuts upon our unarmed, bare headed and
kneeling militia, after they had surrenderedthrusting
them through the face, and hacking, piece after piece,
from their arms and legs.
All this looked so like having overrun the country,
that Sir Henry Clinton, after a few more depredations
of a like nature, determined to return to New York.
Mistaken man!the elements of death were concocting
in silence. Disasters made us stronger. We fell, only to
rise, like Antus, with renewed power. It was success
that ruined usenervated uscalamity only made us
the more terrible.
The tories of the south had been overrated; the
republicans much underrated. They were impatient for
a trial of strength. A general dissatisfaction began to
prevail under the administering loyalty of Cornwallis.
The countenances of men looked stern; their hands
were clenched; and these symptoms of a troubled spirit
were punished and denounced, as downright rebellion.
Gates had been ordered to the south. The sun broke
out!But Gates was defeated, shamefully defeated;
and a series of calamities and disheartening events
followed
,
in such rapid succession, at the south, that I began
to think seriously of mounting my horse again, and,
feeble as I wasleaving all that I loved, helpless
and alone behind me, to strike one more blow at the
enemy, though I died for it.
Then came the treachery of Arnold; the execution
of Andre; the trial of General Gates; the operation
of Greene at the southoffering a changeable map, of
encouragement and terrour, to the eyes of our stout
hearted countrymen.
Still we had no news from Archibald; nay, we
knew not whether he was living or dead. But
Washington
was in negociation for an exchange of prisoners;
and our cavalry, at the south, had begun to retaliate
upon Tarleton.
At last, there was a dreary interval of some months
during which, we heard no direct intelligence,
whatever
,
from Arthur, Copely, or Archibald. Our
apprehension
became terrible. We were sick at the
heart; and heaven only knows, what might have
happened
to us, had not a line in Arthur's hand, come to
us at last, as we sat together, on a cold, wintry
evening
,
the first of March, 1781. Let that evening never
be forgotten in our blood or namenever! Let it be
a jubilee! My heart bounds now, at the thought of
our rapid and tumultious transition, from despondency
to joy. We have set it apart, for tears, and prayer, and
thanksgiving.
My boy was about a year old; as heavy and fine a
little fellow as ever cuddled in the bosom of a mother.
We were weary and cold. Poor Clara sat near me,
upon a low stoolleaning her elbow upon my knee,
and rocking the cradle, where Copely's little daughter,
and poor James lay, cheek to check, breathing like
matted honeysuckles. Ellenour, whose whole
character
had changed, of late, to a deeper melancholy and
apprehensiveness, was gazing, all the while, upon her
babe; her sweet eyes running over with involuntary
tears; and Lucia, the blessed sufferer, was reading
aloud to us, from the Bible: her voice, always full of
pathos and tenderness: her modulation, always full of
delicate and expressive sensibility: her tones and
emphasis
,
always those of passion, simplicity and
eloquence
,
as the subject demanded either the one or the
otherwere now so sweet and thrilling, that we sat
and listened to her, with our lips apart, as to musick
coming out of the grass.
`What a source of perpetual consolation it is,' said
Mrs. Arnauld, laying her hand reverently upon the
blessed book.
`Yes,' said her husband, in a low voice; `weak and
erring as we are; full of infirmities; liable to
transgression
and sorrow, from the cradle to the grave; yet,
is there in that book, what he, who has once tasted of
itthough broken-hearted and abandoned of all the
world, will never forget; but will turn to, like the
unweaned
child to the bosom, whence it hath drawn
its nourishment, and draw it again, while tears and
sobs are choaking him. Lucia! dear Luciawhat
troubles you?'
VOL. II. 17*
A faint smile played over her pallid features; and I
saw that the picture, which her father had drawn, of a
child nestling in the bosom of a mother, drawing
warmth and life from the sweet fountain of the pure in
heart; and the two sleeping babes before herwere
it was not envy; yet, there was a sorrowful
sweetness
in the dark of her eyes, which, told
me
, but too
plainly, what was the cause of that trouble which her
father spoke of.
`
Dear
Lucia,' said my mother, leaning over her lap,
and looking her in the face; `read on. There, we
may find consolation; they, that have leaned upon a
spear may be healed there; they, that are broken and
bruised, may find wine and oil there; the flower of the
grass that perisheth; the beauty, that the sun and the
wind have scattered, may revive again, ifnay, dear,
why do you weep? our sorrow is not past bearing.'
Mr. Arnauld arose, and walked up to his daughter,
and stood by her side, and pressed her white,
transparent
forehead to his bosom.
`Lucia!' he said, in a voice almost inarticulate with
emotion; `why will you break my heart! Am I to
stand, forever, before my wasting child, and see her
fading
awaydying, hour by hour, of some mysterious
malady, which IILuciaI Take
comfort
,
my childtake comfort. It is good for us to be
afflicted. We know nothing evil yet, with certainty.
I do not attempt to flatter you. I cannot; there is
little
ground for hope. I say it to all of you, my
children
;
and, while I invite you all to join with me, and,
laying your hands together, upon that book, to put up
your petitions for
their
safety, to Him that watcheth
over the widow and the orphan; while I do this; nay,
while I say to you, in the sincerity of my hearta
broken heart, my dear ones, broken by your sorrow,
and crushed by the weight of ancient transgression
let us be prepared for the worstthe
worst!
yet, do
I entreat you to remember, that God is good; that all
his ways are best and wisest; thatarise my
children
,
and let us kneel together! and once more pray for
them that are away, in the battle, or in the place of
death.'
We did kneel. We knelt together; and we prayed
together, till the sound of sobbing and distress grew
fainter and fainter; and were just rising, with the
tears of penitence and submission upon our cheek, when
a tap was heard at the door.
Some little disorder followed; for the best are more
than half ashamed, to be caught at their devotion; and
it was some moments before the door was openedand
a stranger, treading and looking like a soldier, entered,
cap in hand, holding a letter to Mr. Arnauld.
`Sit down, my friend,' said Mr. Arnauld to him, as
a faint cry broke from every lip in the room, except
mine; but the stranger remained standing.
Mr. Arnauld took the letter; while the dark eye of
the veteran, (for, though he was a middle aged man, and
evidently of the ranks, there was the air and
authority
of age upon him,) went, slowly, from face to
face of the little group about him, without any change
of expression, till it lighted upon Lucia; when his lip
trembledand he put his hand into his bosom, and
then hesitated, and sat down, as if undecided whether
to speak or not.
`My children,' said Mr. Arnauld, in a pleasant
tone; `the hand writing is one that I know; nay
naybe patientcompose yourselves. Are you
prepared
?
It is the writing of'
A murmur dropped from all their lipsexcept
Lucia's
:
she sat like a marble womanlike something,
over which life and deathemotion and change had
lost their power.
`Of Arthur Rodman.'
`O, my husband! my husband!' said Mary, who
had not opened her mouth beforeand then fell back
into her chair, almost powerless.
The stranger passed the back of his large hand
athwart
his eyes; and shook the March rain out of the
bear-skin cap, that he held in his hand, and
compressed
his lip, with a loud
hem
as if that rain had
blinded
him, and then sat down.
Mr. Arnauld read the letter; his agitation growing
at every line, more and more evident, till, at last, the
letter fell from his hands, while the tears were running
out of his shut eyes, as if his very heart were
overflowing
with pleasure and thankfulness.
Mary moved timidly toward the letter, looking up
to him, with her lips apart, as if fearing a reproof.
`Naynay, dear,' said Mr. Arnauld, catching her
hands, `nayI cannot bear, that you should be the
first to know what has happened.'
He then took up the letter, and began to read; while
we sat, hand in hand, holding by each other, and
feeling
every pleasant word, at the same moment, like a
thrill of electricity.
(The Letter.)
`I am wellvery well. We have retaliated upon
the enemy, and I shall get leave, if I can, to visit
you'
Mary's head fell upon the bosom of my mother.
`We have had a severe battle, and beaten
Tarleton
like men. The particulars, I have no time to
relate
.
The bearer, my
friend
'
The stranger shifted his position, and appeared
uneasy
crossed
his legs, and played with the collar of his
coat.
`To whom you will prove, I believe, that you
know how to appreciate the favour, has saved my life.
He will tell you all about it'
`No he wont,' said the stranger, muttering
impatiently
,
while Mary arose, and tottered to him.
`II' said she, `I do not ask your name
but, (giving to him, her two hands, while his strong
features and dark eyes, were illuminated with surprise
and delight,) you have saved the life of my husband.
God will reward you for it! I willI Will
you accept of this
this
, to
remember me by
,' (offering
him a locket, that she wore.)
The stranger started back, and stood haughtily
before
her.
`No, ma'mno! I'll accept of nothing. I did my
dutyI Yes I will I Give me a
little lock o' your hair. I my children shall have
it; and when
your
children want their blood,
they
shall
have
that
.'
My mother clipped off a lock, and put it into his
hands.
The soldier, with a look of embarrassment, that sat
amazingly well upon his sunburnt countenance, while
Mr. Arnauld smiled, was about packing it away in
some old continental moneyragged and dirty; when
a sudden thought seemed to strike him; he laid down
his cap, stood over it, swung his arms to and fro, for a
moment, and then broke out, into the following strange,
broken, but feeling ejaculation.
`Nono'twon't do'twon't domustn't find
it there Say  what may come o' this? Faith,
I'll give it to him! No, I wont. Will he like it?
will
he? What! haven't I paid dear enough for it? by
p'shawwhat o' that! he'd save my life, too.
No, I won't have itcan't keep ittake it back. I
shall lose it, if I'm taken, or killed in battle; and
thenstopI'll hide it here, (ripping open his
sword-belt, as if utterly unconscious that there was
another soul within hearing,) there! there! now let
any man touch meor the majoror the cap'un
or the cap'un's wifeorah, pretty creatures!
(stooping to the cradle,) ah, God bless them! so like
my little biddieschuck! chuck!which is your'n?
If I may be so bold. I lord! that's heI'd
know my cap'un's boy, among a thousandchuck!
chuck! bobby! chuck!'
Who could forbear laughing? The honest fellow's
eyes were running over; and he had kissed Ellen's
little daughter, twenty times, before we had leisure to
remark the reddening confusion of the mother; or the
sweet embarrassment of Ellen, who had twice put out
her hand, to pluck him away from the cradle; and then
withdrew it, quietly, trembling and colouring from
head to foot.
`Hey, Rodman, hey! my fine fellow! Faith! as
like as two peas. Eyes!nosehairho,
Rodman
!
chuck! The whole troop 'ould know you. The
very picture of the captain! Gorry! what a fellow
for a saddle!'
This was too much; we all laughed together, to see
the little girl sitting upon his arm, as he caught her
out of the cradle, and began tossing her about; while
her sweet eyes were just beginning to fill, and her
face to pucker, in the blaze of the fire-light, and the
natural fretfulness of children, when waked out of a
sound sleep. Yet she did not cry; perhaps, because
she was too much terrified; or, perhaps, the incressant
motion of his arms prevented her. But at last, Mr.
Arnauld was fain to interfere; just, it was evident, as
she was beginning to clear her pipes for a squall; and
the mother sat laughing, for the first time, for many
a week, as if she would kill herself, at the confusion of
Mary.
`My good friend,' said Mr. Arnauld, looking as
seriously
as he couldand placing the little creature in the
arms of Ellen, where, after turning its eyes for a
moment
,
at the stranger, like a mouse that has escaped
from a catand quivering all overwith its little
mouth wide openits pretty head fell on one side, and
it was sobbing itself asleep immediately. `My good
friendI'
And there he stopped, as if unwilling to mortify the
honest fellow, by a disclosure of so untimely a truth
`have you supped?'
`No Sirthat I haven't; not a mouthful has entered
my jaws, since yesterday mornin.'
A table was instantly spread; and Mr. Arnauld
continued reading the letter.
`His name is Hanson. The particulars of the letter
he will detail to you. Archibald has struck a blow
that'
`Archibald,' said all of us, together.
`Hush! hush!' said Mr. Arnauld, seeing that we
were about to overwhelm Hanson with questions`let
him finish his meal; and then you shall worry him to
your heart's content.'
`By your leave,' said Hansonfalling at once upon
a loaf, as it passed him on the waiter. `Let me draw
my rations in my own way.'
`Certainly, certainly,' said Mrs. Arnauld, assisting
to arrange the tablewhile Mr. Arnauld continued to
read, as follows.
`Archibald has struck a blow, that the enemy will
never forget, to his dying day. The affair of Monk's
corner, with twenty other scrapes, of the same kind,
is fairly balanced by this of the Cowpens. Tarleton
himself narrowly escaped; Washington was so close
to him, at one time, that they exchanged several cuts,
with what effect, we do not yet know. My last, I
hope, apprised you of Archibald's situation. I would
have you prepare yourself for a severe shock. You
will scarcely know him.'
Copely cannot write, till his hand is better; he
orders
me to say, all that mortal man should say to such
a `pestilent little creature, (his very words) as'
`
Me!
I dare say,' cried his wife,`but I forgive
himbless the creatureis he well?'
`Read on, pray read on, my dear Sir,' said Mary,
faintly`what else?'
`I shall write further, before Hanson departs,
unless'
`Unless what?' said Lucia, seeing her father
hesitate
,
and struggle, as if to suppress some violent tumult
of joywhile he folded the paper`father! father
is that all?'
Mr. Arnauld shook his headand turned to Hanson,
who sat, so as to keep his eye upon the door, at which
he kept continually glancing, whenever it opened, as
if he expected somebody else to appear; we saw it,
and smiled, for the table was already loaded with fare;
and we attributed his anxiety to the natural longing
of a famished manhe said to him.
`Did you receive any other letter?'
`No,' said Hanson, significantly`no, sirno
other
letter
.'
Mr. Arnauld breathed more audibly; his whole
countenance changed to a natural, steady tranquillity
nearly religious. I say
nearly
, for, even in the most
pious ministering of Arnauld, upon his knees, there
was a want of natural lowliness; a want of that
beautiful truth, which early habit in religious indulgence
will produce upon the manner of men; and which,
open a better habit, when the countenance is written
all over with the mysterious and deep language of
passion, and passionate thought, aye, and worldly
experience, can never entirely predominate, however
deeply the heart may be affected.
There was a long and breathless silence of some
minutes; during which, there was much pleasant
weeping
,
and pious, inward aspiration, interrupted only by
the hearty smack of Hanson's lipsnow and then, as
he plucked away the exhausted tankard from his mouth,
with a strong hand; or the rattling of his knife and
fork; which, at any other time, in its vivacity, would
have diverted us not a little. Many of the flourishes
were there of a swordsman, I saw; and, before he
threw it down, and drew a long breathpushed back
his chair, and wiped his mouth, I should have
known
that he was a great hand at a sabre.
`Well,' said Mr. Arnauldlooking at Hanson, who,
though crowded to the throat with the hearty cheer
could not forbear following every movement of the girl,
that cleared away the table, with a piteous look; now
and then, shifting his position; sucking his lips; and,
passing his broad hand down his waiscoat; and sitting
more upright; as if he thought, that, by a little jolting
and good management, he should be able to stow away
some odd pounds more, nevertheless.
It was in vain to ask any questions for some time;
his movements were too unsteady; his sorrowful, half
uttered ejaculations were so numerous; as dish after
dish went away, till, at last, by his continual hitching,
he found himself along side of the table again, just as
the girl was taking away the large tankard of cider.
`Stop,' said Hanson`I can't bear that, my pretty
dearone swallow more!'
The poor girl was in the middle of the apartment;
but, seeing him start out of his chair, and wipe his lips
with his cuff; and not rightly understanding his
motive
;
and, perhaps too, ashamed at his manner all the
while that she had been clearing away the table; and
thinking that his broken ejaculation had more
reference
to
herself
, (a natural thought for a young,
blooming
,
country girl,) than to the supper; she stood still,
with such an aspect of terrour and submission, shame
and embarrassment, that, when Hanson came near
enough to her, and then, instead of kissing her, as she
certainly expected; and for which she had prepared
herself, to see him catch at the tankard, utterly
unconscious
of her proximity to it; and then her mortification
it was altogether too much for our composure. We
could bear it no longer. Here was an excuse, such as
we wanted; and the suppressed laughter of all the
evening
,
now broke out, all at once! peal after peal! till
Mr. Arnauld was fain to put a stop to it, by main force.
`I am really ashamed of you,' said he, seeing us all
ready to break out again, just as Hanson drew away
the tankard from his lipslooked into it, with a
sorrowful
eye; turned it bottom upward; counted the
drops that fellshaking his head all the while; and
then returned it to the poor girl; whom, I verily
believe
,
he had not seen till then, for the colour ran
instantly
all over his face, and he made an awkward
military bow and scrape, which somewhat appeased
poor Kitty.
`What was this affair of the Cowpens?' said Mr.
Arnauld, `were you there?'
`
Were
I there?Yes. I'll tell himcapital cider
thatcapital!'
VOL. II. 18
`Another tankard,' said Arnauld, nodding to Kitty,
as she went out.
`D'ye see,' continued Hansonsitting erect in his
chair, and following the girl with his eyes; `d'ye see,
we'd got into a hobble; trenched upCornwallis was
arter us, on one side; Leslie on t'other; and Tarleton,
fiend take him! he was gallopin all over the country:
So Morgan backed out, and we'd got to the
Cowpens
.
`Hanson!' said the major to me. I was
always
a favourite with the major, after we escaped from
the enemy.'
`Major who?' said Arnauld.
`
Why
, Major Oadley,' said Hanson, `to be sure.'
`What! is he a major? I thought that he was only
a captain.'
`You mean his brother, Capt'un Jonathan: I mean
MajorMajor Archibald. Pray ma'm, (seeing
Lucia
turn pale.) maybe you're his wife, that he used to
talk about in his feverhisah very well! I
say nothen; but Archibald Oadley is the boy, what
might make any woman turn palehehe
hey?I '
`You spoke of his escapehow was it?'
`Well(the yankees, and Hanson was a yankee, had
the practice of prefacing almost every remark, and
every question, and every answer, then, as now, with
a
well
, or a
why
)`after he got well, they let him
go out on parol; and, one night some of 'em run off;
and, he might a' gonebut he would'ntout 'pon
honour, he saidso he would'ntnever mind 'em
they braced him upserved him all the same as
the restnow look out, said heI'm clear o' my word,
nowkeep me, if you canso, not a week after, we
escapedsee here(showing his wrist) `I had a
bay onet through, thereand here, and here---the balls
whistled like hail; they sent hundreds arter us, through
the bushesbut we got clearguns!'
`When was this, Hanson?'
`
Well
aboutlet me seeAugust's one
September's
twoOctobersay six months.'
`Six months! and why did he not write?' said I.
`
Why
, he did write, I saw him write a dozen letters
to you; and,
you
(bowing archly to Lucia)
you
, for
he cried like a child, whenI beg pardon
capital
cider! guns!what cider!'
`Never mind,' said Mr. Arnauld, smiling`so, now
for the battle.'
`Wellsaid the Major, says hespeaking to me
`Hanson, damn my blood'
`Does he swear?' said Lucia,
`
Why
no; only with his eyesdon't say that he
said
, damn my blood, ma'am; but, he looked
looked it, ma'am, as plain asasas two and two
makes four. Guns! how he flourished his sword about
best broadsword in the armysays he, Hanson,
we must score off some o' their cuts? what say you?
If Tarleton should fall in our way, remember who
used to starve us, while we were prisoners; and,
curse us, and beat us; and, leave us rotting in filth
and nastiness, with bread full of pounded glass, and
maggotty meat, that made the water hiss, when it
touched it. Guns! give it ten yards o' start, and
I'd bet on it agin a three year old cat. You could'nt
keep it still, could'nt catch it. So, we were all on
horse back; had jest come in, and Morgan was just
encampin on our left. All at oncehourra! we heard
a number of scatterin shot; and, seed two or three
of our videttes scampering, like devils, up the hill, and
along the bank of the riverthen, two or three
volleys
.
`Tarleton! Tarleton!' cried the major.
`Tarleton! Tarleton!' bawled the troopIn less
than five minutes, Colonel Washington, Lieutenant
Colonel Copely, and Captain Rodman came to their
places, crying.
Remember the prison ship! remember
Monk's corner! Remember the tories!
when Tarleton
broke down upon our rearand we were stunned with
the artillery. I say nothin Sir, nothin of what I
saw, except that, in the thick o' the battle, when
you could see the faces of our troop, through the smoke,
by the sparkles of their own swordsI heard Colonel
Copely laughin; and, saw him, as he cut down a tall
fellow close by me, rein up, and burst out into a loud
laugh, at one of the blundering rascals, who had just
exchanged a cut with him, and then rid off, frightened
out of his wits. Captain Rodman too, did famously;
but the major!wellGuns! how he rattled away
at 'em!heyno quarternone!It soon became
a racewhoop! Morgan's riflemen peppered 'em, fore
and aft, wellthe horse tumbled together, in heaps;
while Colonel Howard, the Maryland boy, with some
of the raw Virginians, blazed away before 'em, so
that the horses were frightened with the noise. We
killed about a hundred on 'em; took five hundred
prisoners
;
and some dragoon horses; about a hundred,
was jest what we wanted. So, you see, they got a
sound drubbin.'
`And how long was this? how long ago?' said
Mr. Arnauld.
`
Why
there was a matter of'
Another tap was heard at the door.
`I pray, you ladies,' said Hanson, jumping up, with
a change of deportment, that startled us---`I pray you
----be prepared for a serious trial'to which Mr.
Arnauld nodded.
The door opened.
`Rodman! Rodman! Arthur! Arthur!' shouted all
of us, at the same moment, while, after a little interval,
another faint voice followed`O,
Arthur! Arthur
---
my husband!'
`Mary! love!' said the princely fellow, putting us
all aside with his arms, and rushing to his wife, and
taking her out from the midst of us, like a giant---and
standing over her, like one tranced; while she clung
about his neck and sobbed aloud.
There was not a dry eye in the room; not one!----
Hanson himself snuffled; and unbuttoned his jacket;
while Arthur, hearing nobody, seeing nobody but
Mary, stood over her, holding her cold face to his
bosom; and, watching the bright tears that trickled
over her lips.
What could we do? we were a family of love; all
our sorrow, and all the sources of it, were known alike
to all---
all
, I should say, save one---the sorrow of
Lucia
was her own; untoldunguessed at, but by me.
We would have left the newly met; the desolate; the
widowed and widowto weep, if it might he, with
joy, unprofaned by our presence---but, no, we had no
time for it.
Arthur was standing erect, his majestick person
abundantly heightened by his close uniform and martial
carriage; his browned features radiant with
intelligence
;
and his soldier-like head, and manner, as he
stood upright, before his delicate, timid, and innocent
Mary, who looked so lovingly so imploringly up to
him, absolutely awed us. I was half afraid to speak to
him. How he had changed!---`How know we,' said
the eyes of one to another---`how know we, that he is
the same Arthur Rodman, whom we knew? nay, he
is not the same; he is an altered man; sterner, and
taller; even his beautiful hair is withered and blighted;
his voice too,
that
is not the voice of his boyhood.'
`Heaven bless you all,' said he, recollecting for the
first time, that his trooper's harness was yet upon him;
his tall ruffian cap that darkened half the room; and,
that he was drenched with the cold, uncomfortable
rain of the season. So, throwing aside his sword belt,
sword and cap; he seated himself, just as he used to,
before our great fire, and rubbed his knees, with that
expression of comfort, which we see in them that have
travelled long in the wind, his face flushed, his heart
full, and every eye glistening upon him, and every
tongue unable to articulate one of a thousand questions,
that it had meditated.
`Supper!' said Mrs. Arnauld, `supper again?'
`Yes,' said Hanson, `if you would save trouble, you
will let it stand all night longthere may be other
guests,' (significantly.)
`Oh,' replied Mr. Arnauld, taking out the letter
again, and reading a line or two, which he had
omitted
;
`nohe says nothing of the otherscan it be?'
VOL. II. 18*
Hanson nodded, and Lucia turned deadly pale, as
we heard the trampling of hoofs by the windowand
the ring of a broadsword, upon the flagged pavement in
the yardas if somebody leaped down from a horse.
`Archibald;' cried she, starting from her chair.
`O no! noit is my husband!
mine!
' shrieked
Ellen
,
rushing forward, with her girl in her arms, just as
Copely entered.
Here was another blow for us. What were we to
think! Our hearts and eyes reeled at his entrance;
might there not be another, yet
another!
our lips were
all apart, as Copely caught his wife and babe at the
same moment.
`Nell! by Jupiter,' he cried, laughing; `why,
what is the simpleton crying at? Whose brat is that?
mine! mine! hourra! hourra!' Saying this, he
caught the little girl in his arms, and began capering
about the room, like a mad creaturelaughing and
kising
it by turns, for several minutes, while Ellen ran
after him, endeavouring to catch at the child, and half
choked by her own sobs: and Hanson clapped his hands,
and tumbled over tables and chairs in his rapture
imitating
,
unconsciously, as if he had an invisible babe in
his own arms, every movement of Copely, as he ran,
hither and thither, tossing the child about.
Another step, a I know not what she
saw;
but
Lucia tottered through the doorrushed out into the
rain and darkness; and, a few minutes after, we heard
her fall, and a faint groan reached us.
Her father ran out: and, while we stood awaiting
her return, and wondering at her sudden deliriumthe
two husbands unable to move, from their clinging
wives, Archibald came in, faint, and palefollowing
Mrs. Arnauld, with the lifeless body of Lucia in his
arms, just I had seen them years before.
I was appalled. Archibald looked like a ghostso
paleso ghastly pale, and thin; but withal, strangely
beautiful; as if, while his body thinned and waned
the spirit of him, became more visibleas if, the nearer
it was to death, the body became but the more and
more intensely animate with his spirit. It was, as if his
heart and soul were transparent before me.
Lucia's insensibility continued so long, that we were
all thrown into a stillness and consternation, so
terririble
,
as to prevent our recognition of each other.
`She is dead,' said Archibald, with a patient lifting
of his deep blue eyes; `she is dead, brother'
I took his hand. It was cold as death; and when I
looked upon his face, the wan foreheadhollow
temples
,
ridged all over with his large blue veinshis fresh
lips, alternately white as ashes, and then, of a deep
blood colour, as the rapid emotion of his heart came
and went, hither and thither, over his faceI felt as
if I were suffocating.
`Yesyes,' he replied, in a low voice, bending down,
over the broken hearted mother, upon whose lap the
beautiful, dead face of his beloved lay, like that of one
suddenly struck down in prayer. `O Lucia!'
Her eye-lids quivered, at the sound of his voice: a
sweet smile broke, like that of a sleeping infant, about
her gentle lips, hitherto so haughty; and their motion
was audible, as if they articulated his name.
All eyes were upon her: all, I should say, but those
of Hanson, who, unable to support the terrible conflict
longer, had withdrawn, leaving us, like mourners,
standing about the blessed sufferer, as she lay lifeless
helpless, and worn out.
`Lucia! o' Lucia!' said Archibald, holding her
hand, to his heart, with convulsive eagerness; and
stooping over her, as if to catch the first murmur of her
mouth.
She drew a long breath, half opened her eyes, while
the tears ran slowly down through her redundant hair,
upon which her face lay, half buriedand pronounced
his name. A slight shivering followed; and, in a few
minutes, amid the dead stillness of all about, she arose,
and sat up, and put her two hands into hissaying.
`Archibald, I can now die in peaceI have only
waited for you.'
`And I, Lucia,' he replied, kissing her forehead
while the tears gushed out again at the pressure, and
her red lips thrilled and trembled with pleasure. `I
have come to you for no other purpose, than to'
`To close
my
eyes, Archibald? Heaven bless you!
heaven bless you for it! O, mother, do not break my
heart upon the spot. Why will you sob and weep, so
distractedly? Is not this, what I have always told
you?
always?
Have I not said; fathermother
sister
brother
there is no hope!
God hath heard my
prayer: His hand hath stayed me. I do not desire to
live. I do not deserve it. He hath upheld me, till now,
that I might see Archibalddear Archibald, once more.
O, Archibald! how I have wept for you!'
`And I,' said he, in a solemn, sweet voicelike one
summoned by something invisibledreading it not, and
ready to depart, whenever it shall please heaven. `I,
dear Lucia, have wept and prayed, many a night
through, for you. Let us be firmthe little time that
is left to usI'
`What! is there no hopenone for
you
, Archibald?'
said the dying girl, kissing his hands with uplifted
eyesand watching the changes of his face.
`None, dear
none
. The malady is incurable. I'
`Hush,' said Mr. Arnauld, `have done with this,
my children. It is impious, vain, and ungrateful. You
know not what death is, coming upon you in stillness,
slowlyand perpetually.'
`
Do I not!
' said Archibald, calmlyputting his
hand through his brown beautiful hair, and wringing
out the moisture, as if it had been the heavy March
rain. `
Do I not?
It is not rain, Sir,it is the sweat
of deatha night sweat, that hath been upon me, for
more than a year. I'
`Hushin mercy, hush!' cried Clara.
CHAPTER XIII.
`Of Death? Although I know not what it is,
`Yet it seems horrible. I have looked out
`In the vast desolate night in, search of him
`I watched for what I thought his coming; for,
`With fear, rose longing in my heart, to know
`What 'twas which shook us all'
`Do you really believe, sister,' said Clara, `really and
truly, that there is no hope?'
She was leaning over the chair of Lucia, about a
week after the last conversation, while I sat,
ruminating
upon the awful events of the past. Archibald
passed
the window, just as she was going to reply, on
horseback. His motion was very feeble and wayward.
`How unlike himself!' said Lucialocking her
hands; `when he rode by that window before, he was
younger, by many years, in reality; he appeared, ha,
how much younger! But sorrow will have wayand
where hath she wrought so unsparingly, as upon the
countenance of Archibald? Sister, I will answer you.
Do not believe the physiciando not. He may be an
honest mana skilful one; but, I know better than
he, what that malady is, whose approach is
felt
by the
sufferer; and
known
to be death. I
know
, Clara, that
there is no help for me. I would have you prepared for
it. I die of a broken heart. I do not complain. I
cannot. Many weeksmany weeks
may
pass away,
before you are called upon to scatter the white flowers
over my grave
white
flowers!no!let none be
scattered
there. Isee him!see him!two years
ago, he would have reined an unbroken colt, as easy as
I could direct the motion of that child's arm, (kissing
the little fat arm of James, while she spoke)yet now,
the unmanageable creature bears him whither he will
and how. Poor Archibald!thy proud heart
deserved
a better fate. Oh!brother!brother!'
I saw the movement of the animal, but it was too
late; and I was unable to move hand or foot, in my
terrour
,
till I saw Archibald, by a sudden effort, which
amazed me, rise in the stirrups, and throw himself off,
as the furious horse, ran snorting and plunging toward
that identical tree, where Archibald had been well
nigh dashed to pieces, years before.
A servant passed the window, at full speedanother!
and anotherwith Arthur and Copely:and we
were left, in the terrible suspense, that followed, for
several minutes, till we saw Archibald returning on
foot, supported between Copely and a servant. He
smiled, as he passed her window, and stopped
signifying
,
with a motion of his hand, that he had
something
to say. Clara threw up the window.
`Do not be alarmed,' said he; `it was a childish
notion. I was willing to try my horse, once more,
before I parted with him; and he threw meit is a good
lesson to me.'
`Are you hurt? dear Archibald?'
`Not in the least,' he replied, wiping the sweat from
his forehead`not in the least!I am, to be sure, a
little mortifiedbutI have been on horseback, for
the last time.'
`Shut the window, Clara,' said Ifeeling the tears
upon my cheek`it is very cold and bleak, abroad.'
`It
is
, indeed,' said Copely, dashing his hand over
his eyes.
`Indeed it isindeed it is,' said Arthur, and Clara,
at the same moment.
At this time, I was able to move, with tolerable
comfort, about the houseand, after sitting where I
was for about half an hour, musing upon the beautiful
face that lay before me, her large waxen eye lids,
fringed with shadow and silkiness; black as midnight
her dark, lively eyes gleaming under them, like some
mysterious splendour, about to break upon us, and
blind us:her round, and wonderfully beautiful arm,
lying under her cheek:her magnificent hair, all
loose upon the pillow:and her young bosom just
undulating under the pressure of her other hand, as if
a hushed infant were therewhom it were death to
stiror waken. She was insensibleor, asleep I
thoughtbut, all the while, tear after tear gathered
and dripped, like oozing lustre, from her wet lashes
and her red lips, now and then, vibrated, as if her
slumber were very,
very
happy.
After sitting and wondering at her power and
loveliness
,
for half an hour, I should think, without
uttering
a word, or scarcely breathing aloud, I heard
Archibald's
voice in the next room, and the sound of
lamentation
.
I went out.
`I
have
been on horseback for the last time, my
dear mother,' said he, `and why should I tremble to
say so? I know what I say.'
`O my son! my son!' answered my mother,
looking
up in his face, while she leaned upon him, with her
old arms about his neck`do not break my heart, all
at oncedo not leave, me again.'
`Leave you, mother! never! never!' he answered,
parting her grey hair with his mouth, and kissing her
forehead. `My mother shall close my eyesmy last
breath, if it please God, shall be breathed out upon
that bosom, where my first tears were shed.'
`I'll tell you what it is, Mr. Oadley,' said Mr.
Arnauld, disengaging my mother's arms, from his
neck, `this is unmanly. There
is
hopewhile there is
life
, there is hope.'
`Yeswhile there is life, there is hope'echoed
somebody, afar off.
Archibald shook his head.
`O, bless you, bless you!'cried my mother
`bless you for that! Mr. Arnauld.'
He continued. `It is your duty to do all that lies in
your power for your restorationis it not?'
Archibald bowed.
`And to support the spirits of your desolate and
aged mother, instead of weighing them down?'
`Assuredly,' said Archibald, with serious eyes.
`Then let her hear no more of this. Heaven hath
not told us at what day, nor hour, the angel of death
shall summon us; and, while it is our duty to be
prepared
for his coming, at all hours, it is
not
our duty
to wear our lives away in apprehension, or'
`
Apprehension!
' said Archibald mildly. `I have no
apprehension
of deathnone. But, do with me as you
pleaseI will obey you, while I have breath: for my
mother's sake, I will live, if God will let me; and
do some good before I diebut, I would have you all
prepared
you
, brother
you
, Lucia(looking about
with troubled eyes)no, she is not hereand you,
mother. Where is Lucia?'
`Would you see her?' said Mr. Arnauld---`go with
me, my son. But, I do pray you, have done with
these melancholy anticipations. Let us hear no more
of them.'
Archibald's countenance changed. `Go with me to
Lucia,' said he---`all of you---but first, Hanson, that
sword is your's---the horse---that I give to Copely---
furniture and allI'
`Brother!' I exclaimed, `you behave strangely. I
never knew you so regardless of our feeling.'
`My dear John,' he said, taking my hand, `I am
doing but my duty---no more, believe me. There is no
affectation in all this. No, as I hope to see my Maker!
But you will have me wear another face. Be it so. I
shall obey you. Let us go to Lucia.'
We all went together into the room; and found the
two children sprawling upon the floor---Ellenour
intertwining
some wild flowers with the black hair of Lucia
---poor Mary looking, as if she had never known
happiness
till then; and Clara romping with the baby; and
Lucia, herself, full of faint, spiritual self possession.
Archibald paused; and lifted his hands in
admiration
,
as he approached her.
`By heaven!' he exclaimed, smiling, `I have never
seen you so like what you were, that night, when your
tresses were loaded with peach blossoms and  ah!
forgive me---I did not mean to distress you. You
are a stout hearted girl, Lucia. Give me your hand.'
Lucia gave it to him, with a look of doubtful
astonishment
.
`Do not be agitated,' said Archibald---`our friends
complain of us. They do not understand our feeling.
It is not too much to say, Lucia, that they cannot---
will not. Have you the heartbut, I need not ask
it I know that you have toto'
`To what!' said Lucia, firmly`come nearer,
Archibald
.
There is a wildness in your eyes, that would
have terrified me once. What do you meditate?'
He said something, in a low whisperat which a
convulsive
,
tumultuous, bright emotion passed over her
whole face. A murmur or two escaped her: she kissed
him, mouth to mouthand the tears sprang sparkling to
her open eyes  and then, livid and purple flashes shot
over her forehead, as he continued, rising from her
embrace, and saying, in a cheerful tone
`We will be sad no longer, love. What say you?
shall we make glad the hearts that are about
us?and, if we
must
die, die smiling?'
`With all my heart,' she replied. `I hate this cold
philosophy, that would make the coming of death so
dreary, and desolate, and awful. Let us be prepared;
but, let us lose no more time in sorrowing.'
Again they embraced; and
we
, arguing blissful
things from the rapture that illuminated their faces, as
they stood fronting each other, giving out and
absorbing
light and beauty from their eyes, and lips, and
voices, like spiritualites conversing in some unknown
waywe were happy beyond expression.
From that hour, there was a visible change in their
countenances, and deportment. I cannot say that their
tread was stronger, in general, or their voices fuller
VOL. II. 19
of tenderness and strengthbut, at times, they walked
as in the morning of their days; and Lucia, for the
first time, during many years, sang to us, night after
night, till the period approached for the departure of
Copely and Arthurwhen we all grew melancholy
againall but Archibald and Lucia, I mean. Over
them, there seemed to be no influence in mortal change
or circumstance.
Several eminent physicians had been sent for, and
their testimony was truly encouraging. `Keep their
spirits up,' said they; `it is a malady of the heart, only
and they may yet be raisedeven
yet
.'
`God bless you, for it!' we all said together. `God
forever bless you, for the judgment! May you hear one
like to it, if ever, in sorrow and apprehension, your
spirits
are bowed to the dust, for some infinitely dear one,
for whom you would lay down your lives!'
`I shall not go with them,' said Archibald, to their
questioning. `I have done my dutyI want repose.
Whatever come of this, I am sick of blood-shed; and,
it is time that I should begin to prepare for some change
it matters little what. I am sick of battle and strife.
I want peace. Copely and Rodman have not wasted
so much Iand they have more to incite themthey
are marriedhappyandbut so am I
happy
O, merciful heaven! happy beyond all expression
beyond
all hope!Lucialittle did I ever dream of this,
love, when I thought of our earlier affectionin the
solitude, the awful solitude of the camp:when, every
sound that broke upon the ear, was the tramp of a
horseman, driven in by the enemy; the enemy,
themselves
,
thundering over our entrenchmentsor the
trumpet breaking upon us. Would that we had met
before,
that
ah, brother, I envy you!Copely, I
envy
you. You have that to live after you, in your sweet
babes, which is worth all the pleasure of life. This
boy!(he took James up in his arms, and pronounced
a benediction upon him.) `I would rather have been
the father of that boy, than the founder of a kingdom
the deliverer of nationsthe conqueror of all the earth.
This is sovereignty
this
it is, to be like a godgiving
life and loveliness to creatures, that are compounded of
all that you most love. If their children live, let them,
I pray you, be wedded. Do not betroth them; do not
restrain them, I pray you,
do
not; let it be
remembered
;
and
if
if I should die before them'
(I was delighted at his look; there was hope in it
and the
if
was a new qualification. It sounded as if he,
himself, began to feel it possible to live.)
`Let my property be theirsto be equally divided.'
There wanted but one week now, to a separation, that
was anticipated, like death, by our poor wives. Ellen,
with all her natural vivacity, was inconceivably distressed
and agitated, as the time approached; and Mary turned
pale, at the very mention of it, and bowed her head, like
one sick at heartsick with unutterable love and
terrour
,
and longing.
`I am determined, dear Nell,' said Copely, chucking
her under the chin, one pleasant morning, just as he
was about to spring into the saddle; and she stood, half
pouting, half crying, to watch his departurefor an
hour's ride; `to put you upon bread and water; little
Luce, (the name of his babe was Lucia,) will learn
nothing of your motherly, sweet qualities, except that of
crying. What am I to do? Nay, Ellennay, my dear
Ellen, do I distress you?'
`Indeed you do, Chester,' she replied, putting her
hands upon his shoulder, and lifting her eyes to his,
while they streamed with tears; `I cannot bear this
levity
now. I begin to feel serious; it touches me like
unkindness. I cannot bear it. I am a motherthe wife
of a manwhoChesterwe have been childish; let
us be so no longer. I can bear to lose you, if it must
be so; to part from you againto no matter what
for LuciaO she is the stay of all our womanly
hearts. She has taught me many a lesson of utility. If
our country must have you, I can bear it, as well as
another; but do not think, O do not, Chester, that,
because
I laugh more; or, rather, because I have
laughed
more, for I have done laughing now, that I feel less.
Nomany a woman will laugh, to keep herself from
crying. Many a time, Chestermany a time, have I
rattled away, like a mad girl, before I felt the
obligation
of a wife and a mother; merely that I might not
fall a sobbing in the deep rebuke of your seriousness.
Where was your manhood? Where your steadiness?
I have spoilt you; and you have left me to be taught
wisdom by others?
You
have become a triflerindeed
you haveand I am getting a solemnityI'
`Bless thy little heart! child!' said Chester,
catching
her up on his arms, and running into the house
with her, and placing her upon the table, before us all.
`There! stay there! by all the stars above us, Ellen
CopelywifemotherwomanI had rather listen
to thy sweet lips moving, seriously, with this plaintive
musick, than to all the parsons, chaplains, and priests
under heaven. Say on, dearest, say on!'
Arthur ran up in the same spirit, as if to give her a
hand, while we stood together, laughing at her
embarrassment
,
and the oddity of the transformation.
`Hands off! Rodmanhands off!' said Copely; `no
man shall dethrone that woman, till I have done homage
to her.'
`O, ChesterChester!' cried Ellen, bursting into
tears, and falling upon his neck; `I cannot bear this.'
`By heaven!' cried her husband, inconceivably
shocked, for the first time, at her manner; `there is
something that I cannot understand in this, Ellenmy
own, my beloved Ellenforgive mehow have I
wounded you?'
She shook her head, and blushed.
`By my gaiety? Ellen Yes, yes ah, how
little
you know my heart; how liable are we to
counterfeit
too strongly. Ellen, I have feigned so long, and so
steadily, that the feigning has become as a nature to me.
I laugh now, without knowing it. When I first
laughed
,
it made my heart ache. Do not believe that I am
weaker, frailer, or less considerate, than when we
married
.
NoI feelthou excellent and high
minded
woman! a veneration for thee now
now!
so
beyond
what I have ever felt beforethat my soul stands
more erect and haughty than ever. I will never trifle
again.'
Saying this, he kissed her affectionatelyshook hands
with her, vaulted into the saddle; and she left us,
immediately
,
for her own apartment, where she shut herself
up, till his return.
She was strangely alteredher volatility had all gone,
since the birth of her child; yet, she was not sad, nor
melancholy. She was only more serious and womanly;
more worthy of herself, and of her husband; while he,
it was evident, had been counterfeiting a spirit, that was
not natural to him, merely that she might not be
intimidated
,
or disheartened by the approaching separation.
But our hope grew stronger and brighter every hour.
Archibald and Lucia were constantly together, and
walking, whenever the weather would permit, for
several
hours at a time. Their tones were cheerfultheir
manner affectionate; and, we found them ever ready to
enter into our thousand little plans of reform. The past
was spoken of, without any dangerous emotion; the
future, calmlyand there was a look of unaffected piety
and submission, in the countenances of both, that
comforted
us exceedingly. I was now able to walk about
the farm, and superintend it; while Mr. Arnauld, for
the first time, since his early wound, had recovered his
health, and was pursuing his plan of reformation, and
benevolence, with a steadiness that delighted me. Clara
was in better health, than she had ever been in her life:
from a pale, sick girl, she had become a noble looking,
dignified woman. Our boy was hearty as a young bear,
and handsome as the dreams of painted children.
There was every thing to give us hope, even in the
affairs
of our country; but still, for it is ever thusthere
was a shadow yet, to go over the green, pleasant places of
the future. The war might last, heaven only knew, how
long; and Arthur and Copely were on the eve of
bidding
their dear ones adieu, once morefor a period,
perhaps as long as beforeperhaps longerperhaps
forever
.
What wonder that we were sad? What wonder,
VOL. II 19*
if their wives were forgetful of their blessings, in the
terrour of this anticipation? As the hour came near,
they wept, night and day, and would not be comforted.
But to counterbalance this, there was a mysterious
intelligence
growing up, every day, between my brother
and Lucia. Her hand trembled, when he took it. The
blood rushed to her templesand her look was not that
of one, who believes that a chamber is preparing for
her, beneath the green earth. Oh noit was rather
that of the young heart, newly awakened, from a long,
dark, troubled dream; half doubtful, nevertheless, if
there may not be reality in it.
I watched them perpetually. My heart yearned
toward them; and, while I saw a gradual and sure
improvement in Lucia's health, I fancied that I could
perceive a like one, in that of Archibald. Was I
mistaken
?
follow me, my childrenand the sequel will
tell you.
`I am thinking,' said Claraleaning affectionately
upon my shoulder, below her, with my new wooden
limb over a chair; while Archibald and Lucia passed
the window, locked arm in armtheir faces bright with
intelligence`I am thinking, that they are less
obstinately
resolved on death, than they used to be.'
There was an archness in her manner, that made me
smile. `Yes,' I replied`a substantial improvement
has been made by the timely admonition of your father.
But for that, one or both of them might be in the grave
soon.'
`But what possesses them, not to marry?' said my wife.
`Have you any particular reason for asking that
question, dear?' said Iobserving that she coloured a
little, as she did ask it.
She hesitated.
`Clara,' said I, gravely. `Hear me, love. Your
sister has put into my keeping a secret that materially
concerns her. I am not bound to keep it;not
bound
I say, by any promise. I may tell
you
whenever I
think it wise. I do not think it so, nowwill that
satisfy you?'
`Certainly,' she repliedputting her hand upon my
forehead. That is acting like a man; that is treating
me like a friend. I knew that there was a secretI
have known it for a long while; nay, it is not certain
that I do not know what it is; but I love to
be dealt plainly with. Do you know this letter?'
(taking a letter out of her bosom.)
`No,' I said
`Nor the writing?'
`Noyet stayI have somewhere seen it before
is itit cannot surely be.'
`It is Clinton's.'
`And how came you by it?'
`I made him give it to me,' was the reply.
`
Made
him!how?'
I met himcoming out of Lucia's chamber. I
charged him desperately; and would have wakened my
father. On one condition only, did I release him; that
was on his promise to leave the house immediately,
without meeting her again.'
`O, Claraand did she know it?'
`Noit would have broken her heart. I never
alluded to it, never troubled, or watched herI knew
her too well, to doubt that some horrible villany had been
practised upon her; but I knew also, whatever it was, that,
if it were discovered by
me
, it would break her heart.
I have kept the secret. She does not know that I know
aught of it. I love her more than ever; wonder at
her more than ever. She has not her equal among
women. It is that which keeps her bruised heart
unhealed
;
but for
that
, she had been well, long and long
ago. Read it. There it is.'
I took the letter. It ran as follows.
`O, spare herspare
her
, Clara, whatever become of
me She is not to blame. I alone have done it. Poor
Luciamy heart bleeds for her. I am a villain. I
obeyI banish myself forever. Keep the thing a secret
andI will obey.No, no, it was not her fault.
No woman, not even Clara herself could have escaped
the snarecould'
(Clara's brow contracted with haughty contempt)
`could have escaped me. She was utterly in my power,
without knowing it'
CLINTON.
`My excellent Clara,' I cried, embracing her. `How
little have I known you! What can we do for her?
Is there any thing? any thing upon this earth?'
`I believe, that there is,' she replied. `They love
each other. They have been open and plain in their
communication. Archibald knows all;
all!
Perhaps
I
speak it cautiously,
perhaps
we may bring about
a reconciliation, that will restore her, the haughty and
romantick, noble minded girl, to her own good opinion;
and give to Archibald, that inconceivably lofty and
wayward
spirit, something to love all his life long.'
`To promote that plan,' said Igiving her my hand
`which, I confess, I already begin to believe is
possible
I will spend my life blood.'
`Phophothat is too extravagant. It is so like
him
. However, (smiling) there will be no need of
spending your life blood. A little delicacy, and patience
will do it, if any thing will.'
Thus was this noble minded woman, your mother,
my children, perpetually unfolding some new attribute
of uncommon loveliness or power, which had been, all
my life long, unknown, undreamt of, by me. To her
last hour, it was ever the same; the same patient
endearing
tenderness; the same dispassionate, calm
judgment
;
the same beautiful transparency of heart; the
same unpretending piety, and lowliness, yet firmness. O,
my children, you know not your loss, nor minein the
death of that woman! She was made for dominion over
proud hearts; not for despotism, no, but for that sweet,
quiet supremacy, which the soul delights to
acknowledge
like
the sway of a mother over her babe;
a parent over her helpless sweet child. But let me not
think of herit makes my heart swell, like a fountain,
newly broken up in the desert; and I feel the tears
gushing
out, over the barrenness about it, with a power and
prodigality that sadden me. Would that there were a
garden and turf yet, for them to water and refresh!
would that I might sleep now, as I did once, with the
untiring watchfulness of Clara, leaning over me, like a
hovering seraph, to study every emotion of my face, and
interpret it to her children! You would want no other
admonition. But I
must
be done with this theme: there
is a bitterness in it, too like the foretaste of death.
Come to me, Clara! come to me! I care not how soon.
Let thy beckoning hand appear to me, this night
this
night, dear Clara, and I will joyfully lay down my grey
head, upon the wet turf, and give up the ghost, at thy
bidding.
But let me return. The hour of parting had arrived.
It was terrible. The horses, stood saddled and
caparisoned
at the door; their heavy manes flashing in the
wind and sun, like torn and wet banners, as they struck
their iron hoofs into the green turf, and snorted to the
blue skies, impatient for the sway of their riders.
It is dreadful to stand by, and see, heart after heart,
torn awaybleeding and desolate, at a time like this
the father from the motherthe husband from the wife
the parent from the childyet it must be!
`O, may God forever bless you, both,' said my
mother
,
pushing back her lawn cap, and raising her
wrinkled
hands to the sky, while the wind blew her grey
hair all over her face. `We are parting, I do fear, for
the last timethe
last
may God have you in his
holy keeping!'
`Dear Copelydear,
dear
Rodman,' said Mrs.
Arnauld
,
rushing into their arms, `I feel as if I were
parting with two of my own children. The mother
that bore you, boys, cannot love you better. We shall
meet againagainmany times, I
believe
but
farewell
.'
`
Farewell!---farewell!
' said the two young soldiers,
while the entry was thronged with servants.
`Remember your God,' young men, said Mr.
Arnauld
,
impressively. `Now is the time of peril. Never
unsheathe your sword, but with a
belief
, that you are
doing his will.
Farewell!
'
`And
you
, praywill you not say, God speed, to us?'
said Copely, giving a hand to my wife, and another to
me, while I could scarcely support myself.
`Aye, Rodman!aye CopelyGod speed you both!'
said Clara, lifting her proud person to the stature of a
queen. `Remember your country,
first
your wife,
nextand your child last. Whatever happen, we will
be its parentsfriends and advisers.'
Their noble hearts were fullfull, to burstingand,
when I fell upon their necks, and wished themnot
with tears, but with a pressure, that a giant might have
felt, through his armourGod speed!they felt a
confirmation
of all that Clara had pronounced.
`Luciadear Lucia,' said both of them, taking her
hands, `heaven bless and restore you. Archibald, come
hitheryour hand.'
He obyed, and gave them his hand.
`Living or dead,' said Copely, with a solemnity, that
shook me awfully`
living or dead
, Archibald Oadley
and Lucia Arnauld, God meant that you should be man
and wife. Do not thwart his will.'
Lucia coloured, and faltered out some inarticulate
words; but, Archibald was firm and unyielding, and his
forehead was serenevery.
Rodman then renewed the benediction, and
whispered
something in her ear, glancing at his boy, whose face
was nearwhich made her blush to the very eyes; and
look, just as she used to, in the pride of her beauty.
`Archibald,
farewellfarewell!
'said they, both
together.
`My friends, I'said Archibald, with a steady
countenance
,
stepping out to meet them`IGod knows if
we shall ever meet againI
believe
(emphatically
repeating
it) I
believe
that we shall not. Many perils
beset us. I regard this as a death bed separation. No
I understand youshe is a woman of stout heart
these things do not pain herwhy?If true, they are
better to be knownif false, they cannot injure us. So,
let me adjure you, to be merciful. We have shed
much bloodI am not at ease under it.'
`Nor I,' said Copely, compressing his lips, but I
would rather have an ocean of blood rolling over me,
than that
that
Oadley, which spun out of the brain
of a scoundrel, whom I shotI(his voice grew deep
and terrible, as it had been anciently; and his wife
shut her eyes, while he spoke)I am not easy about
that
why, I know not. There is something wrong
in this warfarecustom, perhapsopinion reconciles
me to it. But'
`Think seriouslyprayerfully of it, my friend,' said
Archibald`and now, farewellfarewell!one
embrace
,
Copely; one, Rodmanand, remember that
we have bled together. If you survive me, to
my
friends, be a friend. To your'sand your little ones
and all that love you, or are dependant upon you
if
I
survive you(smiling, with a melancholy smile)I will
be all that you are.'
Rodman and Copely then embraced their wivesin
one long, long embrace, againand, without turning a
glance toward the rest of usexcept the children,
whom both kissed and blessedleaving their manly tears
upon their sweet facesset off, at full speed, from the
house. It was a bitter cold morning for the season.
CHAPTER XIV.
O, night and darkness, ye are wondrous strong!
Yet lovely in your strength, as is the light
Of a dark eye in woman!
a noise among the leaves, like
twangling pearls
.
It
was now the middle of May; a warm sultry day,
and a hot sun had gone over it, leaving a cool, shadowy
greenness upon all the wood, near which we sat, about
four o'clock in the afternoon, upon the shorn turf, that
extended, in a pleasant slope, from the front of our
dwelling, a little aslant, to a blue, beautifully blue pond
and fountain, half buried in deep green transparent
foliage, through which the water glittered, like a gush
and sprinkle of quick-silverwhile we sat there, with
all that we loved upon this earth, save Copely and
Rodman, about usour children were rolling and
creeping about the swardtheir little fat, naked feet,
ruddy with the touch of the grassall hearts happy
all eyes, full of love and thankfulness.
`That beautiful mist! Archibald,' said Lucia,
lovingly
,
with her arm carried athwart his face, while he
sat near her, with his hand resting on her soulder
`and that hollow!how cool and pleasant it looks!'
`While the sun rains fire,' answered Archibald, `upon
the green topped trees behind.'
`Rains fire!' said my mother, smilingand then,
with a slow, serious motion, relapsing into her
occupation
of knitting.
`Archibald is given to such extravagancies of late,'
continued Clara, touching my hand at the same time,
that I might observe the vivid beauty of his deep eyes,
while they dwelt upon those of Lucia, which were
turned, full of devotion, and mysterious, sweet meaning,
toward the wood.
It
was
beautiful! Far away to our right, the green
turf faded off to a rich, sweltering brownand
gradually
subsided into a flat, yellowish soil, where a brook
had once run, and left millions and millions of water
worn pebbles:over the dried bed, there still stooped
a mass of the brightest green rushes;here and there,
the wild flag, spreading its broad, smooth leafand
a rich body of sedge, with many wild, blue flowers
showing that there was a hidden moisture, yet, at the
root. Still further off, there were a few pale green
birches, with their silvery bark, stooping different
ways, and shooting up, into the blue air, their white,
slender shafts, like pillars of light; in another spot, a
mass of herbage, half trodden down; a few scattered
rock heapsa lonely tree, leafed to the root; a broken
stone wall; a disordered and ricketty fence; while far
beyond, overgrown with ruffled foliage, and rasberry
bushes, and wild cherry treeand thorn (a very unc
mmon
shrub in America) ran a regular and established stone
wall, at least half a century oldof the substantial
New England fashion, with a line of poles all along the
topset in cross sticksanswering the various
purposes
of protecting the enclosure, defining the limits,
and clearing the land. At the extreme left, there was a
purple gleam on the dim horizonwith many little,
faint spots about itdenoting that the Delaware might be
seen; if we had patience to look for it. About us was
a group of great venerable oaks, with two English elms.
The fashion of the latter, was strangely beautiful, and
picturesque: and one of the oaks had been struck with
lightning some years before; half of it had been torn
down, from the top to the very root; and, out of this,
had gushed up innumerable branches of willowand
birch. They were now about the height of a man
VOL. II. 20
while the two parts of the torn giant, still gave out
their hardy vegetationshewing that vitality was not
altogether extinct. The colour was rather of a brown
and withered hue: but, over our heads, the other sister
trees had intertwined their branches, with the effect of
a woven, Gothic canopya firmament of leaves: some
little art had been added to the natural inclination of
the branches, when we were children: and now, there
was a sheltering, chequered lattice-work above,
exceedingly
green and vividand transparent with a late
showerthrough which, where the sun shone, we could
see every movement of every cloud in heaven, by a
correspondent
shadow upon the grass at our feet, as if the
leaves were vitrified. And the tinting too, had
became
beautifully varied, as the thickness was greater
or less, over uswhile the multiplied shadow and
light about us, were eternally shifting, with a
capriciousness
,
that we could not have accounted for, had
we been forbidden to look up, and see the interlacing
branches, separate for a momentas the matted leaves
ruffled in the wind, just long enough for the light to
break inor, for us to catch a glimpse of the blue
heaven over usthe fiery sun-set behindthe
distant
shining waterthe far smoke, hovering, like in
cense, in the solitudeor, the red glittering
windows
,
at the right and left, into which the sun looked,
as he went down; ruddy and beautifulbeyond the
tall treesscattering his lustre, with a greater and
greater prodigality, every momentlike one, ashamed
of his accumulated riches, and willing to make all the
world lament his departure.
`You look melancholy, dear Archibald,' said
Ellenour
,
affectionately, putting her little girl into his lap.
`There! take Lucia to your heartandLord!
how he blushes
little
Lucia, I mean.'
`Melancholy!' said Mrs. Arnauld`ah, yes'
`I feel so,' said Archibald.
`What! melancholy! Archibald?' said Lucia, her
eyes full of inexpressible meaning`melancholy, at
an hour like this!'
`Yesfar more so, than, in the depth and dreariness
of winter, while the bleak wind pours through our
dwelling, and the sky snows, day and night, upon
usbut, it is a pleasant melancholy'
`You are strangely poetical of late,' said I. `I do
not remember that you ever indulged yourself in such
language, when you were young.'
`I felt less, then, brotherinconcieveably lessthe
endearment of that hour, had no influence upon me; the
passionate endearment of' (he faltered.)
`But why melancholy, at such an hour as this?'
`The natural waywardness of the human heart,'
said Mr. Arnauld. `When the sun shines, it will run
into the shadow; and, when the firmament is over
cast, it wishes for sunshine; men affect distinction
and, for want of that, are content with peculiarity.
Power is not less conspicuous, where all is light, by
its darkness, than, where all is dark, by its lightness.
It is a cloud, by day; a pillar of fire, by night. You
love to be apart from other mendo you not?'
Archibald smiled, and shook his head. `An
admirable
illustration,' said he, `of that ambitionthe
disease of noble minds, which, in its dotage,
degenerates
into a love of notoriety.'
`Ah!' cried Ellen, her round, sweet voice, ringing
like the roundelay of some pipe, in our earso
cheerful
so
varied in all its smooth, delicate modulations,
`I remember something of the sortI have been at
balls, where my heart felt heavier, than at funerals.'
`Whenever there is an overacted seriousness,' said
Clara, in her sensible, mild way, `it provokes us to
oppose it:and, therefore, where we are witnesses to
any unmeaning, or unreasonable merriment'
`In the company of puritans, I should feel a
prodigious
fancy for a game of romps, I am sure,' said
Ellen, interrupting her`and, many a time, have I
run away from a noisy, blinding assembly of romps, at
a ball room, just to cry by myself.'
`It is no less true, than strange,' said Archibald,
looking Lucia in the face; `that, wherever we see any
opinion, manner, or habit, pushed to extremity, we
are apt, by way of shaming or rebuking it, more
effectually, to run directly into the contrary extreme.
Moderation, begets moderationextravagance,
extravagance
violence,
violence.'
`But why are you sad?why melancholy?'
repeated
Mrs. Arnauld.
There was a terrible, brief movement, in his
thoughtful
eyes, ere he replied; and, when he
did
reply, it
was with the air of one that feels much, very much,
but would not have it knownone that would convey
deep counsel in a light wayfluid gold in a wooden
cupmystery and powerin the language of common
conversationfrom what motive?that it might be
chosen, or not; followed, or not; taken, or rejected,
without the cold formality of advice, or preparation.
`I am melancholy, my dear madam, whenever I see
the sky of that colour; because, it reminds me of the
day, that I first did battle on. I am melancholy,
whenever I feel the warm summer air blowing in my
face, and stirring the thin hair upon my forehead;
for, it reminds me that(putting his hand upon
Lucia)  thatin the morning of my day,
she
would sometimes, at an hour like this, stir it with her
breath. Ipardon me LuciaI am melancholy,
madam, because I have feelings
here---here
that
nobody
will understand; because, I am not believed;
because
In short, tears have fallen upon my
forehead
;
and, I am unhappy, when the rain---(wiping
some drops from his face, at the moment, as they fell
through the washed leaves)---reminds me of them
mother, I would rather die with blood upon my
hands, than the tears of a broken hearted woman.'
`What book is that?' said Mrs. Arnauld, abruptly,
in the pause that followed, as if anxious to turn our
thought into another channel.
`The Vicar of Wakefield,' said Mary, putting her
white hand upon it.
`By whom?'
`By one Goldsmith,' said I---`Oliver, I believe.'
`The poet?' said Archibald. `He wrote some
verses
once, calledI forget the name.'
`The Traveller; or, The Deserted Village?' said
Lucia.
`Yes,' said Mrs. Arnauld---`and what think you of
it, Mary?'
`You know, my dear madam, that I am not well
qualified to judge; but I think it very beautiful, and
very natural---the book, I mean---I have never read
the poem.'
`I am glad to hear you say so,' said Mr. Arnauld---
`it is the best novel that ever was written.'
`Novel, pa,' said Lucia, `what is a novel?'
`Any tale, my child, like the parables of our Saviour
---the fables of men---any invention, of prose or verse
---though we call the latter a poem. This work is, of
the class to which it belongs---the most perfect novel,
that ever was written. It is worth all his other
writings---all
his poems---all his essays---his Citizen of the
World, into the bargain.'
`Do you include dramas, father?' said Lucia,
turning
about, so that the rich shadow of the setting sun
shone on her, like the lustre of a dimmed furnace,
making
a picture so beautiful and eloquent, that her father
locked his hands, and called upon us, by a motion of
his eyes, to look at it, before it vanished.
`No, my child,' said he, `dramas are a species of
novel writing---so indeed are all compositions, where
imaginary creatures, invested with all the attributes
of humanity, agitated by the passions of our nature,
are put to the task of entertaining or terrifying us.'
`I have thought,' said Archibald, `that novel
writing
has been shamefully mistaken.'
`And abused, and degraded,' said Mr. Arnauld,
impressively. `We have the highest authority for
novel writing. To write a good novel, a man should
be a poet, a dramatist, a painter, a tragick and comick
writer, a philosopher, a preacher, and an orator.
He should be able to pourtray intellectual and
invisible
things, as vividly, as the substantial landscapes and
VOL. II. 20*
countenances of the earth. Men of talents have
abandoned
novel writing to women and children; and they,
after beginning their career with a novel, disdain to
continue, but soar, as they imagine, higher, by dabbling
in poetry or the drama. No! my notion is, that it
requires
greater talent to write a great novel, than to
write an epick poem, a tragedy or a comedymany a
sermon, and many an oration.'
`And then the influence of novel writingthere is
Richardsonand'
`The influence, of which you speak, is greater than
that of all other literature. People read novels, who
never go to play or to church. People read novels,
who never read plays, sermons, history, philosophy,
nor indeed any thing else: And people read novels
secretly
,
in all weathers, from morning till nightwho
do nothing else. How material then is it, that their
power should be understood; their eliment purified;
the conduits, by which we receive this intoxicating
aliment
,
under the superintendence of people, that know
the consequence of drugging the human heart, to
delirium
,
with poison and death, in the shape of
exhilaration
.'
`Ahthat shadow! look Archibaldlook!' said
Ellen.'
It was the shadow of many birds, passing swiftly at
the time; and the water below usnay, the very turf
appeared to move, for a moment, under our eyes.
A shot rang just behind the trees, where we sat, and
the next moment, down came two or three wild birds,
fluttering through the blue air, almost at our feet.
They were followed by a troop of boys, who ran off
with them, pursued by him that had shot at the birds.
`
Oo nat les buissons, et 'es autres prennent les oiseaux
,'
said Mrs. Arnauld, smiling, while Mr. Arnauld,
throwing
a pleasant eye at his wife, observed.
`You have really a wonderful memory, my dear;
nay, I don't wonder that you laugh; that formed the
motto to the ring, that I gave you, after I came from
Italy. You have applied it adroitly enough.'
`NoI beg
your
pardon:
that
was Italiana
uno
what was it, Lucia?'
`Indeed, my dear mother, I do not recollect it;
what was the sentiment?'
`The sentiment! O, it was a hit at me, for my
coquetry
;
he had been beating the bush.'
`There is an Italian proverb,' said Lucia`
perhaps
that is it.
Uno leva la lepre; e, un altro la
piglia
.'
`Oui ma chere,' said the mother, bridling, with an
innocent affectation, that half displeased Arnauld;
while Clara dropped her head, and began pulling
flowers
for her boy.
`
Wee m'a chare
,' said my mother, to herself, but just
loud enough to be heard; `
weemarchair
beautiful
!
wee march hair
beautiful!'
I began to pull flowers too.
`See! see!' cried the delighted Ellen.
I turned my face, and saw the two children, each
with both hands full of flowerscrushed in the
pressure
;
the little girl stopped, and, holding up her hand,
to take what the boy was offering her, let her own
drop; all about them, the earth was like trodden velvet.
`The dog and the shadow!' said Clara, smiling;
`how natural and innocent is such avidity. See the
dear creatures!'
`I remember once,' said Archibald, `seeing a
beautiful
picture, which represented a mother and her babe.
The story was this: that child's handful of flowers,
held so differently from our manner of holding them
reminds me of it. The child had crept to the brink of a
precipice, before the mother had missed it: when she
turned her face, she discovered her babe upon the very
verge. God touched her heartshe tore away the
covering from her bosom; and the little nestling turned,
saw the place of beauty, and remained immoveable,
till she had crept near enough to catch him, and faint.'
The painter ought to have seen these children. I am
no painter; but, beautiful as that picture was, it
troubled
me. The child
sat
upon the verge of the
precipice
leaning
back, at the sight of his mother, and,
offering
a handful of the plucked flowers. This was
wrong. I felt it then; but,
then
I did not know, as I
now do, why it was wrong. That child held the
flowers
,
just as a grown person would, by the stems; but
these children do not. No children, so young, would
ever. Why? Because they catch at that part which
attracts their eye: the light of a candlethe
coloured
leaf, or the blossom. It is the flower, that they seize
and tear up. Of course, the flowers should be seen
only
,
crushed and broken, in the hand; and, at the sides,
or through their fat fingers, where they parted.
Another
fault.
`I remember that picture,' said Clara; `I have seen
itbut proceed.'
`Another fault,' continued he, `is this: the child is
sitting
upon the precipice. That was wrong. When
the child had gone so far, as to
sit
upon it, and let its
little feet hang over, the danger was already past; the
extreme danger I mean. The peril is not half so great
to the child, while it is looking over the precipice, as,
at the moment, when it is beginning to sit down, as
children always do sitby turning backward to the
object, and rolling over. Nay, a man that could stand
forever there, could not sit down. Now, my notion is,
that the child should not be
sitting
, but
creeping
; nay.
I would have it so, that the spectator should start, and
hold his breath, and put out his hands to save it, if he
came suddenly into the room, where the picture was.'
`Ah!' said Ellen, smiling; `and wouldn't you have
the cry of the mother painted too? so that he should
hear that?'
`You know,' said Archibald, tapping her hand, as it
lay upon the grass near him, while she kept pulling
back her little girl, like a truant robin, at every
moment
or two, and then letting her creep away: `you
know that, if we see a man falling, our horrour is
inconceivably
greater, if his head be downward; or, if he
be likely to fall upon his head. So in a picture. If
we see a
real child
, about to fall upon its feet, we should
feel much less of that desperate convulsion of the heart,
which would happen to us, if we saw the
picture
of one,
falling on its head. I would suppose then, that the
child has crept to the precipice, step after step, in
gathering
,
flower after flower: I would suppose that one
hand was resting, with all the weight of its blessed
little
body, upon the loosened turf, which, I would paint
so that it should appear falling and detaching itself,
under the pressure; nay, I would represent the loose
earth yielding below: I would show that other pieces
had fallenclod after clodfrom the overhanging
flowery, unsupported brinkand this I would show, by
the roots, and withered grass, and fibres straining and
clinging together yet, and hanging down; nay, I would
have some earth dropping, if it might be; and the calm
deep water belowbroken like a mirrour, by the
falling
gravel or dirt. You shudder! I am glad of it:
the picture would make your blood run cold. I would
have the mother appear just at this momentnot
standing
upright, but almost upon her hands and knees,
almost
creeping, through the near hedge, beneath which
he had crept; her bosom should be swelling,
on a line
nearly level with the child's eye
. I would have her
nearness and expression so great, that you would
exclaim
,
on seeing herwait one momentonly one
moment
!
and her hand will be upon his! and then, we
should all know, from the motion of her bodythe
paleness
of her lipthat she would drop dead upon the spot
yet clinging to her boynevertheless. Ah! see that
hand! there I would have the crushed flowers dropping
loosely from his little hand, just as it is from that child's
now, while it is outstretched to you.'
Just then, the wind began to rise, pleasantly stirring
the branches over our green seat; and sprinkling us
with a few water drops.
`Let us go in,' said Mrs. Arnauld; `the sky is
overcast, and there is a particular blackness at the
west.'
`O, no, no! mother,' said Lucia; `let us remain.
It is the breath of God. I feel it, like returning life in
all my dilated heart---I'
`There will be no rain, I believe,' said Mr. Arnauld
interrupting her, and looking upward, while his hat
blew off and rolled away, to the delight of the little
children, as it passed them---`but the wind is rising as
I never saw it before: and the clouds are gathering
athwart the sky---gracious God!'
A thunder clap broke over us, at that moment, with
a rush of lightning so voluminous, and so tremendously
brightlike ten thousand rockets, that, for a moment
I believed that we were all struck blind.When I
came fully to the possession of myself, I saw the
further
elm tree blazing in the windfifty yards higher
than its top; and all our little family lying about
under a shower of rain, which, as it struck the low roof
of one of the outer buildings, just below usbroke over
it, like a cascade of fire. I never saw such a
tremendous
rush of water from the skies. The dried brook
was like a mill race, before I had sense enough to
hobble round among our sweet scattered family, all of
whom, blessed be God! were unharmed, though the
lightning had broken about us, and above us, like a
volley of musquetry. We were soon in the house;
but, only in time, to see the passing of a whirlwind,
that, the old men of the country will turn pale now, at
the mention of. Lord! how it thundered!It came
onward, like a vast black column, with a blood
coloured
brightness resolving in its centre, and the point
advanced.In a moment, we saw the sky all black
with the branches of treestorn fences; shattered
frame houses; and every species of rubbish, which
clattered and shivered and broke, with one incessant
revolution for a minute, over our head. A fearful
concussion
in the heavensa crashfollowedand all
was silent.
It was some minutes before we dared to look into
each others faces, amid the silent and awful darkness
that followed; fearing, I know not what; to me, it
was like the last day; and when Clara put her babe into
my arms; and, dropped, kneeling, at my feet; it was
with the look of a mother, who sees the heavens passing
away, and the stars dropping, one after the other, into
the ocean.
The rain fell upon usand the wind blew through
and through our apartment. We lifted up our eyes.
The windows were stove in; three, out of four chimneys,
were blown down; a part of the roof swept off; and
the very earth, where we lately sat, was torn up, as by
the hoofs of innumerable horses.YetO, yetnot
a living soul had been harmed, and when Mr. Arnauld
called over our names, in the darkness, with a
convulsive
emotionservants and allnot one of the
whole family failed to answer `here am I.'no, not
one.
Righteous heaven!how wonderful and
mysterious
are the sources of our consolation. At another
hour, the least of these many calamities had made
us repine; but now, in the shipwreck of our dwelling;
the destruction, probably, of all our hope for the
season
,
there was not one heart among us, that did not
beat loudly in thanksgiving. Nay, in four hours from
the time of the devastationa devastation, which has
never been forgotten in that part of the countrywe
were reassembled in one of the large, neglected
apartments
of the mansionhappier by far, than we had
been the night before, with a strong roof over our
heads, and a clear summer sky shining in at the
windows.
`Let a man go with me,' said Archibald, with a
depth and sincerity, that I shall never forget`out
into the wilderness, on such a night as thissit with
me, as we sat together this afternoon, before the
hurricane
broke down upon us; and feel the soft air
whispering about his heart; or hear the thunder
breaking
at his feet; and see the great trees bending and
parting, in the wind and blackness of God's power
I care not who he is, or what he iswhere bornor
how educatedI defy him to stand upright!I defy
him not to fall down, with his forehead in the dust, and
acknowledge the presence of a God.'
`Yet, Archibald,' said I`you stood upright'
`Did I?'
`Yes,' I repeated`and Lucia too, stood upright,
while her hair blew about like the torn flush foliage of
yon honeysuckle.'
`I did not know it,' said Lucia`but I remember
that Archibald did; and I clung to himfor he saw
something.'
`Saw something! what did you see?' said my
motherwho had a terrible notion of portents and
prodigies; and battles in the heaven; for, when she
was young, (she was a native of Connecticut) she had
been awakened out of her sleep, by a sudden red light
in the sky; the heavens were all on fireprobably
by some passing meteor; and when others told her
that armies were seen that night, and chariots and
horsemenwith the noise of artillery; and, that the
smoke rolled down upon the earth, like a heavy fog;
she listened to it so longthat, at last, she began to
confound what
others said
, with what she had
seen
; and
before her death, did religiously believe, that she had
heard drums and trumpets on that nightand seen a
battle above the stars.`What
did
you see,
Archibald
?'
said she, pressing close to him.
`God and his angels out upon the wind! the sky
smoking under his chariot wheels! while they rained
fire upon us'said Archibald.
`Heavens! Archibald!' said Lucia, stepping up to
him, and putting her hand upon his forehead`what
ails you! you were not looking up, when I saw you
your eyes were upon the groundwhat did you see?'
`Clinton! I saw Clinton there.'
She fell upon his neck.
`George Clinton! his white bosom naked; the hilt
of my sword pressing into it; the blood
blood!
as plain as when he lived, trickling, drop by drop
O, God!--down over his side; his hands thrust into his
own hair, with the suddenness of instant and violent
death.O, Lucia, Lucia!no wonder that I
heard the chariot wheels of God; the trumpeting of
archangels. The sweat started out of me, from head
to foot; and, the turf, it appeard to me, as I bore
thee over itwherever I set my foot, gushed out with
fire, and, smoke and, I walked over broken
sword blades, human faces, and the manes of dead
horses.'
`You are mightily disordered, my dear Archibald,'
said Lucia, affectionately pushing aside the wild brown
hair, that shadowed his white brow`I have never
heard you talk so strangely; how wild you look!
Did the lightning strike you?'
`Strike me---feel here---
here
, Lucia. It is dust---
dust and ashes.
Strike me!
---it rushed through and
through me---I---O, I am very faint---
very
.'
He grew deadly pale, and his head sunk upon her
shoulder, as he finished.
As for us, we were altogether unable to reason or
think steadily, for a moment. There was a
preternatural
vividness in our recollection of the last few
hours; and a dim, shadowy---impenetrable
indistinctness
,
of those, of all our lives before. For myself, I
am willing to declare, that I could not have answered
the simplest question, till after I had slept that night;
and that all the feelings of my heart seemed crushed
and stupified, except the love of my boy and wife.
Even my mother was forgotten, in the terrour and
darkness of our disorder. Was it the effect of the
lightning? I know not; but, I know
this
---that the
clap was ringing in my ears, for a week after, with a
noise that kept me from sleeping or thinking; and
that the discharge of lightning, was incessant---and
blinding---painfully so, even to my shut and bandaged
eyeslong afterward.
But Archibald was soon more calm;---and toward
morning, after we had sent out, as far as we could, to
inquire into the situation of our neighbours, which was
deplorable indeed, where they lived in frame houses;
and to offer them an asylum, such as we had left, in
ours---we all withdrew to our rooms; but not to sleep.
Neither Clara nor I, could sleep; and I felt her tears
VOL. II. 21
trickling, all the night long, down my neck, as her
dear head lay upon my arm, while our little boy
nestled
at her bosom, and slept so quietly, that---O! it
was a comfort to feel him stir sometimes, to assure us
that he was a living child, and that his sleep was not the
sleep of death.
There was a strange brightness in the west, all the
night long; and, through our windows, which were
almost the only ones in the house, which had not been
broken in, sashes and all, by the hurricane, there was
a constant glimmering upon the wall, that troubled me
more than I was willing to confess. The night
appeared
immeasurably longI thought that the
morning
would never arrive: nay, I began to have strange
fancies; and to doubt ifin truth, the sky might not
have been torn away by the tempest.
`Would that the day would break!' said Clara, in a
low whisper, as if to see if I were asleep.
`It is breaking, dear,' said I`look there.'
`Do I tire your arm,' said she, gently raising her
head.
`No indeed, dear, I moved it, unconscious of the
weight upon it, to point to the east, where that
luminous
,
incessant surging of light appearslike a sea
breaking over its barriers.'
`That is no day break, my husband,' said she,
holding her breath, and drawing near to me. `It has
been a terrible nighta very long oneI---pray look at
your watch. It appears to me, many hours beyond the
time of day light.'
I affected to laugh; but I cannot deny that my
heart quaked, with an awful feeling, as I pulled out
my watch. You cannot readily understand me, my
children. It is impossible that you should. You have
never passed such a night. I hope that you never may.
But you will believe that my terrour was not of a
light nature, when I tell you thatI have seen some
terrible things, at nightmy father's dwelling in
flames; thronging with banditti and murderers:that
I have done battle in the night, with twenty cannon
splitting in my ears; and the ground covered with
dead and dying men: yet, nevernever! in all my
life, have I endured a sensation of such intolerable
weight, and coldness, and horrour, as when I plucked
out my watch, and held it up to the light. As I am a
living man, children, had the last day been at hand,
in realityand, I had seen the skies rushing away, in
silence; and I had been suddenly forgiven, I could not
have felt a more terrible convulsion of joy, than when
I saw the watch hand pointing at
three o'clock
instead
of six or sevenand heard it, as I put it to my ear,
clicking with life. My hand shook; and, I was not
aware of my condition, till Clara exclaimed
`As I live, John, you are crying!what disturbs
you so mightily?'
I could not reply. I was ashamed to own the true
causebut I embraced her, as I would, had we been
plucked out of the water:
We
only, from the
population
of a world, at the delugeor, been sent away,
rejoicing
,
at the last day.
Our silence continued, until the breathing of our dear
boy called our attention to him.
`How untroubled the sleep of that child,' said she.
`Thus will it be forever, that the wise and powerful
are disquieted, in exact proportion to their wisdom and
power.'
`It was a tremendous visitation!' said Clara,
fervently
pressing her lips to my cheek. `Did you see
how Archibald bore it?'
`
That
did I! He stood up like a creature of the
elements, unawed and undisturbed. I was amazed at
his calmness.'
`And II was
terrified
.'
`Terrified!why?'
`It was unnatural. Husband, there is something
in his manner of late, that will not let me sleep. Do
you not observe it?'
`I observe that he is exceedingly devoutthat he is
forever with Luciaand that the sweet wisdom of her
beautiful mouth is beginning to work its way into his
heart.'
`I am not satisfied with it,' said she. `While they
are most deeply engaged in conversation, there are fits
of musing that come over him, as if he were holding
communion with some invisible beingand, then he
walks in his sleep.'
`Yesat times, I know that he does. But that is
on account of Clinton. He has never slept quietly
since. He never will. The night sweat is upon him
and, I have heard him sob, in his dreaming, as if
some strong hand were pressing his great heart to
suffocation
.
But I have observed a change in Lucia, that
delights me. She is altogether better, happier, and
less abstracted in her look. She talks no more of
dying
.'
`Nor Archibald,' said Clara, in a tone that startled
me. `He
talks
no longer of it. They are strange
people.'
`They are, indeed,' said I. `I know not what they
contemplate; but a complaint like theirs, I think, may
always be brought on, by deep thought; and unsparing,
uninterrupted, long continued trouble and sorrow, are
often attended with a melancholy, intemperate
enthusiasm
,
which terrifies by its sublimity, while it awes
by the serenity, and sweetness, and tenderness of
its approach. Nor am I satisfied. What should be
done?'
`I have thought' said Clara, hesitatingly. `You
know Lucia's pridehaving prepared so steadily for
deathhonestly, I am sureshe would not consent to
liveshe would be ashamed to live, now, lest all her
declarations should be considered as a piece of cunning.
We have a delicate part to act. But, my opinion is
clear. I would have them marry.'
`Marry!' said I; surprised, indeed, at the
suddenness
of the proposition. `Would it be possible?'
`Yes. I will answer for Lucia. Better health,
better spirits have given her better views of happiness.
But, the proposition must come frankly, without any
appearance of stratagem, or intrigue, from Archibald.
It may save both of their lives.'
`You astonish me,' I replied. `I have never
thought of this. I have suffered myself to believe that
both would live: nay, that both were fond of each
other; for, their growing tenderness and veneration
have been evident to mebut so long a time has passed
so many years, that'
`It matters not,' said Clara. `I believe that it is
not too latewill you promote it?'
`With all my heart,' said I; `but how?'
`There is only one way. Archibald would have
married her, notwithstanding all that had happened,
the extent of which, it is probablenay, it is
certain
,
that he knows, though I do notlong ago; but a
certain high, noble principle of honour, arising from a
belief that he should soon leave her a widow, prevented
him from making the offer. He believes that he will
die yetand, before
many
months. It is a childish
notionthe consequence of disappointed affliction
weakness of heartand protracted decay.'
`You are right, dear ClaraI have no doubt that
Archibald might live many years: nay, go into battle
again, with reputation and strengthifhe could be
persuaded to forget the thought of deathto overlook
his own reiterated prediction. The fact is, that people,
who have been a long time preparing for another
worldlike them that are about to set out on a long
journeyare impatient for their departure, after they
have made up their minds, and exhausted our sympathy,
and found us, in a measure, reconciled to the
separation
.
They are sorry to gobut dare not
acknowledge
itwilling to remain, but ashamed to say so.'
`My notion isah, the little wretch!how he
bites!'
Master Jemmy had just discovered that the fountain of
her beauty was near to himand he was puffing away
at it---hands and feet, like a fine fellowwhen I
arose, and looked upon him, leaning over the mother
VOL. II. 21*
and child, with a feeling such as a father and husband
only, can experience.
It was time to get up. The blue east was breaking into
an ocean of tumultuous loveliness, the light; here and
there, issuing through the clouds, like dammed-up waters
forcing their way into the world. It was cold, all
very cold, but preternaturally beautiful and flashing.
`Good morrow, love!' said Ikissing her chaste
forehead, as I was about to leave the roomafter
standing over her for some minutes, while her fringed
lids, half shut over the dear babe that lay, cuddled all
up in a heap, under her snow white armand her
red lip were full of maternal endearment`Good
morrow!'
`Good morrow,' she murmured inaudibly
pressing
the boy more closely to her heart, and half
opening her sweet eyesfor a moment; and then,
while her voice died away in a faint breathing, like
a low summer wind among hawthorn flowers
dropping
her head down upon his ruddy forehead.I
could have fallen upon the bed and wept with delight,
at the picture before mea mother and her babe! so
young, so beautifulso innocent;her white bosom
heaving with love; and her gentle arm intertwined
about my offspring, as if it were her own heart that
had crept out into the air for a moment, and lay under
her soft hand.
CHAPTER XV.
`Who made me brotherless?
`His eyes are open;then he is not dead!
`Death is like sleep; and sleep shuts down our lids;
`His lips too, are apart; why, then, he breathes!
`And yet I feel it not.His heart!his heart.'
Cain
.
`The earth swims round me!what is this?'tis wet;
`And yet there are
no
dews'
Tis blood!
'
Ibid
.
My
heart fails me. I never shall be able to carry you
through the whole war, as I intended to do, when I
began. It is out of the question. My own return to
the army; the desolation that fell upon us; the
darkness
theno,
I cannot.I will content myself
then, with relating one or two more incidents, which
happened soon after the conversation that I related in
my last, as calmly as I canenjoining you, first,
that you religiously observe my instructions at the
beginning; and keep each package separate. Let them
be marked as letters,
one, two, three
, &c.just as I
have sent them. I have good reason for what I have
done. They are usually about five sheets, each, being a
quantity which I have calculated would be about
sufficient for an evening. Intelligence from the
southnoI will have done with the war. The
story of my brother, and the extraordinary woman, to
whom he attached himself, has taken such possession
of me, that I can see nothing, hear nothing, think of
nothing, but him and her. The war, and the men of
the revolution; my own sufferings, and those of my
family; the armymy country; all are forgotten,
or remembered, as a matter subordinate to the sorrow,
of Archibald and Lucia. It is in vain that I would
try to keep my attention any longer upon the object
that I set out with
the war
. I cannot. I can only
remember Archibald, as he stood before me at his
marriage, so spiritualized with beauty and expression.
But have patience with me. It is a disorderly story
at best; but it must be told in my own way.
Not long after the storm, we were surprised by the
sudden appearance of young Nick.
`Halloo, Nell,' said he, capering into the room, like
a wild beast, learning to dance upon a heated earthen
floor`halloo!dad has gone!'
`Gone! where?' said Ellenour
He stoppeda dark, turbid expression hurried over
his foreheadand his eyes filled.`There! there!'
pointing downward.
Ellen turned pale.`Fatherpoor fatheris he
dead?'
`Dead! dead!' repeated the dwarfkissing her
`but, don't cry Nell; don't cryhe was sensible at
the last, and willing to dieandbless your heart,
Nelldon't take on soHe died, poor old father,
in his christian senses.'
I was inconceivably shocked at his manner; it was
so unnatural and violent, and contradictory; yet, there
were tears in the creature's eyes; and, his ugly knees
knocked together, when he saw Ellen drop into a
chair.
`Sister, look you. I have no great reason to
blubber
about the old man. You know that all my life
long, I have been kicked and cuffed about by the whole
familyI----'
She lifted her face, covered with tears`except by
you, dear Nell,' he said, feelingly, `buffetted, and
shamed
,
and spit upon; and why? ask that kind gentleman
thereand thatand
that
and any woman here;
is it that I have wronged 'em? nois it that I am
devilish? who made me so? where is there a temper
so sweet and forgiving, that
no
outrage,
no
mockery
none!though continued, year after year, will turn
it to bitterness; wherewhere(I thought that
he was choaking)I had hopednot to be lovedbut
pitied
whose blood would not be turned to fire?
Look at me. I am ugly. I confess itI am sorry for
it. My limbs are jointed and knotted, like the
twisted
oakmy features are savage and threatening---my
nostrils like the race horse---raw, and red---and broad.
It is a sign of vigour. Could you see no beauty in
them? Pardon me, forgive me; nay, love me, Ellen;
for, I love you better than father did. Do not curse
me, that I rejoiced at his death. He was a benevolent
man to all the world but me; kind, to all but me;
compassionate, and forbearing, to all but his own
offspring
,
the first of his own loins, and why?because,
unhappily---God had seen fit to shape me,
not
according
to his own image. See there?there is a
woman whom I saved from death---death!no from
what was ten thousand times worse than death; yet,
she shudders at my voice. I shot a man in the
saddle
,
to whose waist she was buckled; covered myself
with human blood to save her; battled, in smoke and
flame, for her and hears; brought about a reconciliation
between her and her lover, who thought her dead----
yet she turns pale at my red fiery eyes; and the other
loathes, and curses me, for a brutewho would not
be tired of well doing?'
I was amazed! I went up to him and scrutinized him;
and Mary wept aloud upon his hands, when he offer
ed them to her; while Ellen nearly repeated to me, in
the same voice, what she had said years beforewhen
my eyes were upon him, in the very same room, and
almost in the very same spot.
`You are mistaken!'
Here Archibald entered, and prayed me to go with
him on a walk.
His manner was very serious, and somewhat
melancholy
;
while his voice was rather more cheerful than
usual.
`And whither would you go?' said I.
`Some miles,' he replied.
`Well done! my brother; I am glad of this!' said
Clara. `This will dothere is heart for all of us, in
a walk of miles.'
`And why not ride?' said I.
`For several reasons,' he replied, with increasing
solemnity; `our horses could not go, where I want to
go. And'
`No matter for the rest,' said I, sportively; `but,
as well as a wooden leg will permit, I am your
companion
,
if you believe that I
can
go, where a four footed
beast cannot. Are you ready
?
'
`Yes.'
`When shall we expect you back?' said Mrs.
Arnauld
,
while Lucia opened her lips, meekly, as
awaiting
the answer.
`Not for some days!' said he.
`Not for some days! what is the meaning of this?'
I asked.
`I cannot well explain all my reasons here,' he said,
glancing at the family; `but, go with me, and you
shall know them all before sunset.'
The thought flashed over me all at once, that he had
heard some intimation of our design respecting Lucia;
and I prepared to follow him with uncommon alacrity.
We departed immediately, and had walked two hours,
with a great shepherd's dog at our heels, without
having
spoken a dozen wordswhen he stopped suddenly,
under a large spreading walnut-tree, in the centre of a
wide enclosure.
`Do you recollect this place, brother?' said he,
pointing to the right, with his arm extended.
I paused a moment. There was something familiar to
my recollection, in the appearance of the spot; but I
had never approached it, in this direction before; and
I knew not where we were.
`No,' said I.
`It was there that I spilt the blood of a human
being
,
for the first time,' he replied, in a low tone.
I shuddered at the sound of his voice.
`Nothat is further to the right; a full mile from
here?' said I.
`You are mistaken.
Here
, I shot a man;
here
, where
I now standlong and long, before you had any idea of
my familiarity with death:
here
, I saw the brains
oozing
out of his temples; saw him writhe and pluck up
the grass with his red hands, and foam at the mouth,
while his nostrils swam in blood. Do you see that
green hillock there?'
`Yes.'
`There he lies buried. I dug his grave with my
own hands. I buried him. It was at the full of the
moonvery cold
very;
yet the sweat stood like rain
upon my forehead, when it was over.'
I looked at him in astonishmentwas he disordered?
He was very calm. But madmen have been often
calm.
`You are mistaken,' I replied, again; `when the
man fell, I did not know that you shot him. I was
just in sight.'
`
You
mean the trooper, brother. It was not the
first blood that I had spilt.'
`I do not understand you,' said I. `Let us be gone.'
`Can you lift that flat rock there?'
`Yes.'
`Heave it then: let me see you.'
I attempted it; and, after a violent exertion,
abandoned
it as impracticable.
`I am weaker than you, John,' said Archibald,
mournfully; `yet, on the night that I did this, I heaved
that rock from its place, and leaned it against the tree,
just where you see the bark scarred and bruised there
andcome, let us try it together.'
`For what purpose?' said I, getting impatient at
such solemn trifling.
`You shall see,' he replied, stooping and placing his
hands under it. `Lift with me, brother, and you will
see. Now! now!heave!'
We turned up the rock, and the first things that I saw,
were a pair of rusty pistols, and a piece of white cloth,
mildewedpartially decayed, and spotted all over with
what looked, even then, of a crimson hue.
I staggered to the tree; and Archibald stooped, as
if to touch it; but he could not. His arm shook, and
he withdrew his hand, and looked about, in every
direction
,
for a momentthen folded his arms, and the
following dialogue passed between us.
`Did you never wonder at my desolate aspect, when
a boy?'
`Neverafter that summer, when you came home
one morning delirious, without hat or shoes.'
`Do you remember when that was?'
`Yespretty well. You were eighteen just
afterward
.
Lucia Arnauld had just began to be shy of
you.'
`Right. Do you remember the sudden
disappearance
of young Hardy?'
I started. A strange, terrible light broke in upon
me. I gasped for breath. I was unable to reply.
`
There sleeps Hardy
,' he continued, pointing to his
grave; `there lie his pistols: that oneI remember it
well, (setting his foot upon one, from the muzzle of
which a broken and bent rammer projected some
inches
,)
that
is the one that killed him.'
`And whose was the hand?'
`
Mine!
' said Archibald.
`
Your's! your's
Archibald! Oh, merciful heaven!
Your's!
Archibald Oadley a murderer!'
`Yesa murderer.'
I wept aloud. I would have denied the avowal
called the man accursed, forever, who had dared to
whisper such a charge against him; yet there were the
proofthe
proof!
who could resist it! Besides,
Hardy
had disappeared the night before his intended
departure
for the armyandyes, it was too plain!
Archibald had murdered the poor fellow; while we
believed
that he had joined the army, and fallen in some
of our early battles. This accounted for Archibald's
sudden change of temper; his melancholy; his awful
steadiness in battle. Yes! I wept aloud.
`Unhappy man!' said Ishuddering from head to
foot, as I looked him in the facewhile his large eyes
shot fire upon me: `let us be gone. Ieven I, your
own brother, do not feel safe with you. Replace the
accursed stonebury the instruments of death; and
let us depart.'
`With all my heart,' said he, replacing the stone,
with a kick. `There! it is done. Men have said that
it is not possible to hide blood. See! we have found it
easier to hide than to reveal it. There! the deed is
hidden. Now hear me. I slew Hardy. His blood is
upon my hands; yet it should be upon his own head.
You have never asked me how it was.'
`I could notI dared not. I had not the heart to
ask you.'
`Yet hear me. He fell a sacrifice to his own folly
and madness. I was thunderstruck at my own guilt.
He was dead before I knew it; nay, before I meant it.
We were shooting at a markwe quarrelledand he
struck me. I had heard of duels; but I knew nothing
of how they were to be conducted. It was late in the
afternoon. He was a soldier; about to join the army;
and his air of superiority had chafed me a long while.
I fell upon him and beat himfor I would never take a
blow, as you can witness, from mortal man. He
challenged
me, as we lay bleeding upon that little swell
there; no, not thathe is buried there; but further to
the leftI scorned him for the thing. I did not
believe
that he was in earnest. But he called me a
coward
a
coward!
I knew not what the word meant.
My reading had never brought me acquainted with it;
yet his manner of uttering the word convinced me that
it was something, for which I ought never to forgive
him. I would have fallen upon him again;but he
presented his pistol. I advancedhe threatened. I
took up mine, just in time to hear Lucia Arnauld's
namepronounced(strange, that two men have died
blaspheming that woman!) and a bullet whistled
VOL. II. 22
through my hair. I returned the shotfor we were
very nearand the smoke and flash of his pistol nearly
blinded meand I was still nearer, when I fired.'
`He fell. I cannot tell you what else happenedI
was stupifiedblindand suffocated with horrour. It
appeared to me that many days and nights passed,
before I left the spot. I saw him roll upon the green
sward. I saw the grass glitter, as it arose from the
pressure of his head; and shake itself, as if the dew of
blood upon it, were hateful and scorching as fire. I
buried himhow, I know notbut I did bury him, in
the awful solitude of midnightten thousand sweet
stars looking down upon me; and the blue windows
above, all crowded with faces that wept upon me. I
buried the pistols there, and the handkerchiefand
went home. From that hour to this, I have never
looked into this enclosure. Even at noon dayeven
now
in your company, I feel that it is haunted; and
can almost see Hardy, at my feetdo not step back
why do you?he is not there.'
`Your looks, brother; I am terrified at your looks.
Let us go.'
`Aye, let us go. I have seen it for the last time.
I can describe it now, when the angel of the Lord shall
read over my sentence hereafterbut I have wrestled
with angels, all my life long.'
There was something inconceivably terrifick in the
deep calm of his look, as he said this. `I pity you
from my soul I do, brother;' said I. `You are not
the guilty creature, that I fearedI wonder now, that
I ever doubted you.'
`Infatuated man! Is my guilt the less, that I slew
a human creature here, in a passion, than if I had crept
upon him, cooly, and slain himdeliberately?Let
us go.'
`Whither?'
`Follow me.'
`But whither?'
`To another place.'
(I shuddered.) `More blood?' said I.
`Yes.'
`I will not go another step.'
`Then stay. But nocome, comeit is none
secretly shed. I have no untold blood, now, upon my
soul.'
`But why not tell of it?' said I. `Why not relate
the truth?'
`
Why!
in a place, where a death by accident, from
one so young as I, would have turned every heart in
the country against me, as a monster. No---I saw
that no stir was made about it---and I determined not
to tell. Why should I? He was to go away the next
day; and his careless, forgetful temper accounted for
his disappearance. He came suddenly among us; and
on foot. Why should he not go in the same manner?
Nay, when I knew that he had run away from his
father, to join the army, I felt safe. It stopped all
enquiry: the times were troubled; and all strange
and bloody affairs were attributed to the British or
tories.'
`At first,' he resumed, after a long and distressing
pause`at
first
, it was my intention to relate the
affair, honestly, just as it had happened---but, my
confidence
in the charity of men, diminished every hour---
and my terrour of their evil judgment, which haunted
me day and night, with a continually augmenting
force, grew, at last, into an unsupportable weight. I
should have gone mad, I verily believe, in the dark
trouble that was upon me, had not I seen other hands,
other lips, innocent as mine had been; even your's,
John, died in human blood. I arose then, and shook
off the hot fetters that bound me---they fell from me,
like an iron rain, while my spirit burnt out, in the
battle
,
like a furnace---and'
I could hear no more. He continued talking, and I
stood and listened to him, with an indescribable awe:
but I heard him not; nor did I understand him. He
stood loftily before me, dilating, in the sunshine, to an
unearthly stature, and his voice was like that of one
who has come up from the place of death. It was very
terrible and continuedincessant; and smote upon my
heart, like a cold rain: but I remember nothing of
what he saidtill we had arrived at another spot;
where he stood, and stretched out his arms with a
solemnity that kept me breathless.
`Here!' he cried`
here
it was, that my foot was
first set in the stirrup, for battle!
Here!
under the
cold moonlight, while the very snow darkened under
our swift shadows, did we ride together, for the first
time! our articulate pulses, throbbing fiercely with the
first stirring of battle!
Here
even
here
, while the
dwelling of our father was firedand the red flame
rushing upward, with the shriek of women, and the
shouting of death
here
rode we, in the moonlight,
carelessly reining our horses, in the brief, boyish tumult
of parade! O, how little we knew of the serious
business
of war? how little of what was going forward, at
the same moment, within a few miles of us!'
O my children!I have seen man fearfully agitated.
I have heard him laugh, like a devil, in the smoke and
flame of battle. I have seen men slaughtered and dying,
with their hearts crushed outthe wild beast looking
from his dark retreat, through the red mist, that rose
in the starlight, from the place of slaughter. I have
seenO, many a terrible sight!but nothing in all
my life, so preternatural and overpowering, as the look
of Archibald's eyes; while he stood, with his pale
hands outstretched toward the green, distant earth,
moving them, as if there were shadows visible to
him
,
and to him, alone, and obedient to
his
motionthe
shadows, it may be, of man and horsefoot and
horsemen
that
had died, under his eyes, since they last
rode together within this very enclosure. I could not
have borne it longer. It was like a great spell upon me
pinioning me downhand and footlungs and heart
for I felt the pressure within me, and without me, like
a suit of insupportable armour, weighing me down;
while my arteries ran with cold lead.
`Where shall we go, brother?' said heafter another
deep silence`it is getting darkcan you walk so far
as the farm?'
`Yes.'
He took my arm, affectionately, and we proceeded, in
a silence so pleasant, yet so uncommon, that I wept, as
we wandered, together, over the well known place, of our
childhood, until we approached the scene of all our
suffering. But there, wewe No, I will not,
attempt to describe our emotion. It was the first time
that we had been, together, at the farm, since it arose,
with the same features, from the ashes and blackness of
the old mansion. For a moment, it was like an
apparition
before us. For a moment, so complete was
the resemblance of the present buildings, in all their
substantial, disordered shaping and relationship, that a
delusion took hold of usand we forgot that it was a
counterfeit. We had thenafter a shock, that jarred
every nerve in our bodies, leisure to remark the
exceeding
closeness of the imitation. All was there, that
we had ever seen, even to the trees, which had been
consumedand we fell upon each other's neck, and
wept aloudwondering, for a time, by what
preternatural
agency, all this had been done for our bruised hearts,
in silence. But, we soon knew the secret. The
amiable
old man, who managed the farm, and superintended
the buildings, had transplanted trees from the forest, to
the places, where there had been others blasted and burnt
with fire. Heaven bless him for it! I shall never
sleep, quietly, in any grave, that is not dug beneath that
old tree, at the left of my window.
There!
it is!
there!
withered and sapless, like myself; but
venerable
,
even in its decay. Every wind that blows over
it; every rain that beats upon it; drenches its old heart;
or blows away a part of its strength. How like the
going down of a strong man, to the chambers of death!
The winds go by me, and my grey hair is upon them
the rains beat into my bosom; and my heart turns cold
and stony with their buffeting.
We slept together that night. I was strangely
miserable
;
and yet, I could not avoid talking, all night long,
upon the prohibited theme.
`Brother,' said I`what think you, at this time, of
your own situation?Do you despair of recovery?'
VOL. II 22*
`I despair of nothing,' said he. `It is not in my
nature to despair. But I have done speaking of myself.
I have promised, inwardly, to trouble no man, while
I live, with sorrow, or complaint, or repining. Come
what will, I am now prepared for it; what little good
I can do, I
will
do; that, when God shall beckon to my
spirit, it may depart in peace.'
`There are comfort and consolation in the very tones
of your voice, Archibald,' said I`Ipray tell me,
if I be not trespassing upon your patience. How do
you stand affected toward Lucia?'
`Brother!' he repliedsomewhat startled at my
abruptness, I could perceive.`BrotherII
hardly
know. She is evidently much better; I never saw
her so beautiful; and, if there be tenderness or truth
in woman, a broken hearted woman, I am persuaded
thatno brother, I am wrongI ought not to breathe
her name, except in my prayers.'
`But what think you of
her?
'
`Think of her!' said he, rising in his bedand
sitting up, in the troubled star light, just so that I could
see the shape of his head thrown back, and his locked
hands elevated;`think of Lucia Arnauld!
this!
that she is one of the most extraordinary women, that
ever lived; that, could we have been together, forever,
and understood the temper of each other as we do now,
she would have made meGod only knows what!
but I could die for hereven now.'
`Even
now
Archibald,' said I, significantly.
`What do you mean by that?' said he dropping his
hands.`Your voice changeswhat
mean
you?'
`It matters not,' said Irecollecting myself`I agree
with you, in your opinion of her. What think you of
her health?'
`I hardly know,' he replied calmly`they say that
she will be well again; but, they say the same of me;
poor ideots!Yet, I
do
believe that she is better.
Would that I could prolong her dear life, with my
hearts blood! I would stand over a cauldron, and let
it run, hot and smoking into it, if
that
would cure her.'
`Less may cure her.'
`Less! what?'
`Your love.'
`My love! she has it.'
`Your handmarry her, Archibald, marry her
ah!'
A deep silence followed; the bed shook, and I
leaped out of mine, and ran to his. He was lifeless
covered with dampness; and his hands were clenched like
locked iron. It was with difficulty, that I was able to
release him, from the hold that he had caught; but, I
did, at last, and bore him to the window, which was
open.
He revived; but, I was afraid to speak again, till
I felt the wind blowing upon his hot forehead, as he
leaned against my cheek. He was in my arms, like
a sick child; and, his hands hung, powerless, over the
back of my chair. I moved them, and put my hand
to his temples; they were burning hot, and the sweat
stood on them, like a summer rain.
`Do you believe?' said he, faintly`I see brother
that this question is not inconsiderately put to me. You
have thought of it beforeothers have thought of it
well, welldo you believe that Lucia would be
happier
,
for a single moment,were she my wife?'
`I do'
`But if she knew that she must be a widow soon?'
`It matters not,' said I`not at allthough she be
your
widow
, before the benediction has done sounding
in your ears; it will make her happy. She has some
doubt now; she cannot but have
some
, ofof your
respect
for her; I mean sincerely. It preys upon her. Marry
herandI know all brother
all!
do not shake
sodo not, I pray youwould you die in my arms?
You are terribly still, Archibald, terribly!what ails
you?speak! brother, speak!why do you not
speak.'
A low groan broke from his heart; he arose, and
stood up.
`
I will marry her
,' said he.
`God forever bless you, Archibald!'
`And when?'
`Immediately
immediately;
let no time be lost.'
This was the substance of our conversation that night.
By day break we were on our way to the ground, where
he broke down, to the rescue of Clinton.
He stood, looking upon it with a working lip, and
eyes full, to overflowing; but he spoke notno, not a
worduntil we had left it for half an hour.
`We are getting old, brother,' said he`very old.
I feel like one that has worn out his appointment of
three score years and ten, outstayed the sojourn
permitted
to man. Men talk about years and months and
days. I measure time by vicissitudetrialsorrow,
blood. Look at me; but a few summers have gone
over me. I am what the world calls a young man; but,
to my notion, I am older than the patriarchs. I have
out lived all the pleasant emotions of the heart, all
remembrance
of my childhood; the beauty of heaven
the clear water, the green branching tree, the sporting
birdthethe bright lip of woman, and her love
have turned to ashes, in my sightI. Let us journey
a little further.We are near our first battle ground.'
`No, it is about five miles from this place.'
About sunset, we came to the place.
It was all overgrown with sedge and rushesvery
rank and vivid.
`The soil is hot and fruitful,' said he, bitterly`fat
with human blood. This growth of vegetation is new
here. I can remember when it was all barren about
this spot. These rushes (breaking a handful and
bruising
them)should yield blood, at the bidding of a
hand like mineawfulis it not brother? to see the
material of man, his hot heart, his valourous blood, his
strong sinews shooting out, with beneficent greenness,
like this.Look!this handful of rushes, and these
beautiful wild flowersmay be but the herbage and
blossom of some young heart.'
`Let us go! in God's name, let us go.'
We departedand arrived at night, worn out and
exhausted with the walk, at Mr. Arnauld's as we
approached the house, he took my hand`not a word
of what we have spoken,' said he`until I have tried
her heart.'
`Right,' I replied, returning the pressurewhile my
blood ran pleasantly home, at the sight of his red lips,
smiling sorrowfully to be sure, but
smiling
, nevertheless,
as he departed, in pursuit of Lucia.
Just as I was getting into bed, he came to meand
embraced me.
`It is as you believe,' said he`she has owned it.
What a noble creature! she has consentedheaven
bless her!and, now all that I have to say islet not
an hour be lost. I have my reasons. No matter what
they are. It ought to satisfy you, to know that I
have
themwill you press the arrangements.'
`Will I?O, with more pleasure than I would
my own marriage, were Clara and I, unwed, at this
blessed hour.'
`Well, wellto-morrow then, let the preparation be
begun. I am sure of all the familyand sure of
her
except Clarashe is full of deep propriety.'
`I will answer for Clara,' said I.
`True, for her
consent
,' he replied, `but not perhaps,
for so precipitate a consummation when will she
return
?'
`To-morrow, with her father,' said I.
She is a kind creature,' said he, never to leave you,
till you have left her. Good night.'
`Good night!'
It was now Wednesday; and, before two days had
gone over our heads, all the necessary preparations had
been made; and the time of the nuptials settled for the
coming Sunday night. Ah, how happy we were! All
our faces were, literally, wet with joywe could not
pass each other, any of the family, though it were a
hundred
times in a day, without a shake of the hand, a smile
of congratulation, or a blessing.
Sunday came. It was a beautiful day. Archibald
was very cheerful, or rather equable and serene; it was
not so much cheerfulness, as the serious countenance of
a good man, about to prove his religion. The morning
was spent in the presence of our clergyman, the same
that had married Mary, Ellen and Clara, in religious
devotion. The dinner was late; and, to our happiness,
there came a bundle of letters, containing the most
grateful intelligence from Copely and Rodman: of their
healthcomfort, and the prospect of
peace
.
The pious man remembered it in his prayer; and,
after
a bumper to Washington, and `
absent friends
,' of
currant wine, that made our hearts leap, with
recollection
;
(for the last time, that we had tasted that
vintage
,
was at our marriage before,) we adjourned to the
large parlour. A walk was proposed; and we
sauntered
about, Archibald and Lucia dropping behind, (for
an unpleasant illness had fallen upon him, suddenly,
twice within a few days; and he was not able to walk
far, though he never looked fuller of life and power,)
and conversing with a tender solemnity, which, though
we heard nothing of the words, came to us in the sound
of their voices, with the effect of prayer.
After a pleasant ramble, we returned, and entered,
altogether
,
into conversation, with a freedom that
astonished
me. The windows were all open; the light, in our
room, was pale and beautifully dim; the wind was blowing
about, scented with the blossoming wilderness at the
portico, where innumerable plants and flowers were
flourishing, and sweating perfume and lustre.
`How sweet and holy!' said Lucia, uplifting her
dimmed eyes, to Archibald, who stood leaning over her,
as she sat, and holding by the open casement above.
`Pray, sit down, brother,' said I; you will stand in
need of all your self-possession.'
`I shall, indeed,' he said, in a manner, that I
remember
well, had a slight effect upon my feeling then; but
it was soon forgotten.
`You are serious, Lucia,' said he, affectionately,
putting
his hand upon her shoulder.
`Should I not be, at such an hour, with such a man,'
she replied, putting her's upon it. `I never saw the
marriage of another, but with a feeling strangely unlike
that of women in general. It is not that I am more
timid, or less sanguine, or steadier; but, somehow or
other, there is a deep
deep
solemnity in the ceremony
that awes me.'
`Yes, Luciaknow each other, as we may; there
may
be, untold, and terrible things within us; thoughts
that cannot be uttered; a hidden temper, that no man
dare avow. You smilelove. I do not speak of
myself
;
and then, there are trials and sorrows, unknown
to any other than the married heart; obligation, to be
encountered
,
that he, who dares not think of, must be an
ideot; and that he, who thinks of, without trembling,
must be a a  I hardly know what to call him.
He should never be a father. Sudden blows too, may
fall upon us. They that have loved us
they
may be
smitten sorely, while we have no power to help or
comfort
them. We may be weary of the worldwidowed
and desolate. A fearful survivorship may happen. You
weep Luciaweep on, dear. It is our duty to be
prepared
for
all
that may happen.
I am so
. I regard our
existence here, but as a continual favourcontinually
repeated; a protracted miracle; for sorrow and
disappointment
,
and illness have taught me, that there is no
wisdomin looking for one hour of certain happiness.'
`For shame, Archibald,' said Ellen; `would you
make us all hide our faces? come, come, no billing and
cooingyet Gracious heaven! whatcrying!
crying
together! absolutely crying together! WhyLord
help you! you are not married yet!'
`Hush, hush, saucebox,' said Archibald; `we are
only rehearsing.'
Ellen tugged at his arm, and finally led him away
from Lucia, to where the clock stood.
`See!' she exclaimed, `fifteensixteensixteen
minutes
and a half, left to you, yetto repent and be
saved.'
The minister looked serious. Archibald stopped
before
the clock, and stood, looking at it, in silence.
`Yes,' said he`
yes!
What a remarkable
coincidence
!'
`What are you muttering about? Some incantation
I suppose,' said the implacable Ellen; `to stop the hands;
Lucia Arnauld!Lucia Arnauld! he is in treaty with
evil spirits already.'
Lucia arose with a pleasant step, and came near to
him. He turned.
`You are very pale, Archibald,' said she.
`I am,' he replied, fixing his eyes upon the clock.
`Yes
very
pray sit downpray do.'
`No, dear Luciano. It must not be. Let me take
your arm. There is a faintness hereit will soon be
overa mistiness. Sir! Mr. Arnauldmy friend
let the ceremony begin. This suspense is insupportable.'
`Not till six,' said Mr. Arnauld gravely, `
that
is the
hour.'
`Immediately. I
pray
you,' said Archibald, very
earnestly; `
immediately
I pray youit might be too
late.'
Lucia moved nearer to him, and pressed his hands,
while she turned her dark eyes wistfully in his face;
but, though there was a mortal paleness on his forehead,
yet his blue eyes were pre-eminently expressive, tender
and beautiful.
Where I stood, which was about five or six feet from
him, I was astonished at a phenomenon that was
visible
to me. A thin vapour rose, continually, from his
hair, like the mist from wet ground at night; and his
forehead glittered with the dew of his heart. Yet it
was not unpleasantly warm. I was on the point of
speaking; but, at that moment, the clergyman stepped
forward
placed
her hand in Archibald's, with a
benevolent
smilewhile a look of noble compassion was bent
upon Archibald, as he did so, expressive of uncommon
respect and love.
And who would not have felt the same? His
remarkable
expressionfull of wisdom and corrected
passion
;
the tamed haughtiness of his red lips; the deep,
passionate blue of his eyes, tempered, in their brilliancy,
by some hidden and mysterious feeling, as if he were in
the expectation of something, that
we
were all
unprepared
for. Such, at least was his appearance. It may
be that I have fancied this,
since;
but, my belief is,
that, at that time, while I stood before him, the same
opinion arose within me.
The ceremony went on; and, such was the solemnity
and low tenderness of the clergyman's voice; the
profound
devotion apparent in the countenance of Archibald:
the beautiful conlusion, and quick tumult of pale and
red, upon the face of Luciarushing like sun-set
shadows
over summer foliageas rapid and varied, that
most of us were affected, even to tears.
The benediction was pronounced. Archibald turned
bent forward, and put his lips to the mouth of his
bridetrembled from head to footattempted to rise
but he could notagain and againbut his head fell on
her shoulder.
`God of heaven!' cried Mr. Arnauld, thunderstruck
at his mortal paleness, and the strange helplessness that
came over him; `I never saw a human being, so
agitated
in all my life: why, even Lucia is firmer. Lean on
me, Archibald.'
`No, father,' said Lucia; `no! I am his wife now.
He shall lean on no living creature, while I am able to
support himmy
husband!
'
`Lucia, my
wife!
' he uttered, faintly, pulling her
forehead down to his lips, while she stood over him,
pressing his damp temples to her heart. `I ah!
one kiss love!
oneone
be prepared LuciaI
ah!'
He stood suddenly erect upon his feet; the light
flashed over his face. It was the face of a dead man.
He fell upon the floor: a loud shriek followed. Where
were we?
Where!
We ran to himwe raised him
up. It was too late! Almighty God!
it was too late!
HIS WIFE WAS A WIDOW!
THE END.